"Princeton University"
Location(40.349287, -74.658233)
Shoutout to the Penn students on the Ivy League snapchat tryna play it cool. We all know you're just here cuz you still haven't found the dinky.  (2 upvotes)
Hearing Work reminds me of all the fuckin work I have to do  (0 upvotes)
This is what ORF majors do in their free time (5 upvotes)
I wanna find preceptors/grad students I could take shots with before I graduate but most of mine this semester seem like extremely motivated hardasses who wouldn't be down for that.  (6 upvotes)
You know you love him when you've already said bye thrice and yet end up talking for another hour (5 upvotes)
so I can wish for anything? (6 upvotes)
Uwire is ass as usual what is pass/list/PUID tonight? (7 upvotes)
Closest place to campus to get lettuce? Forgot to get some at Wegmans today. :((( (2 upvotes)
Best way to prepare for mat 202 quizzes. (1 upvotes)
i hope flagpoles feel cool about themselves cuz they r the superheroes of poles (7 upvotes)
me irl (13 upvotes)
2 things I never have (27 upvotes)
sometimes I forget that I'm fat and life is glorious  (1 upvotes)
Was so excited to learn that I can have one drink an hour. I didn't know I could have that many glasses of everclear so often! (5 upvotes)
Sat down to continue another demoralizing afternoon of thesis attempts; as I sat some of my chapter planning notes fell into the trash. A voice in my head: "Leave them. It's where they belong." (18 upvotes)
Any rap songs in Phrygian mode? (7 upvotes)
Go to the men's volleyball game this afternoon at 4 in Dillon (2 upvotes)
General Election: Trump v Clinton v Banana sandwich. Who wins? (7 upvotes)
A big thank you to dhall workers for washing the dishes well. So far I haven't gotten sick. Keep it up! (11 upvotes)
Mood: eating marshmallow fluff out of the jar (9 upvotes)
Join the Princeton MMA Consortium! Get ripped whilst learning real life fighting skills + making great friends. Ppl of all genders, sizes, fitness lvls welcome #pmc #fightclub #kravmaga #bjj #muaythai (3 upvotes)
Asian parents: K-12 they were always like "do school, forget about relationships" and as soon as you're a senior in college they're like "why aren't you married yet"? Damn where did this come from?  (38 upvotes)
If you ever feel lonely, know that my friend is at a hackathon and he saw someone with a framed picture of a blond anime girl next to their laptop (23 upvotes)
It's not serious, but it's not a joke either. (7 upvotes)
Catalina in Whitman is the sweetest woman omg (25 upvotes)
Even though I get bummed out that my crush may not like me, I just look in the mirror and realize I'm pretty awesome so his loss (37 upvotes)
Gripped by sudden terror and purposeless. Happy Saturday, Princeton. (16 upvotes)
While everyone else seems to be falling for their best friends, I'm starting to realize that the guy I've liked for the past month has become one of my best friends in this time period (15 upvotes)
Me-"Majority of people in the United States are European American." Friend-"You can't say that, it's racist!" I think Trump is literally driving people insane (12 upvotes)
Procrastinating so hard I'm looking through my venmo feed (13 upvotes)
I feel like I depend too much on my friends for my emotional health when I shouldn't.  (16 upvotes)
five minutes into great gatsby and chill and she gives you the green light (71 upvotes)
Damn, seems like everyone is falling in love with their best friends all at once. Is there something in the air?  (8 upvotes)
When your Touch ID won't recognise your fingerprint so you have to unlock your phone like a muggle (56 upvotes)
Always impressed at the durability of the toilets around here. Every day I test them to their max, and they never cease to amaze me. Keep up the good work.  (10 upvotes)
Best way to get to boston from here? Approx. cost? (5 upvotes)
Just saw my ex doing cardio in the gym, I mean what's the point? Not like he has a heart (57 upvotes)
Serious question: did anyone here ever get pregnant accidentally? (4 upvotes)
A $5 gift certificate to Small World! What'll that get me, a single granole? (26 upvotes)
Is the innovation gala worth going to? (3 upvotes)
Hi, this is Joe from mail services. Just calling to let you know that I have a huge package waiting for you. *Click* (29 upvotes)
Just realized I'm in love with my best friend. Great.  (15 upvotes)
Anywhere on or around campus where I could buy a MacBook Pro charger, my cable just snapped and my remaining 3% battery unfortunately will not last forever. (12 upvotes)
I cheated on my gf by accident. How do I tell her without causing drama? (3 upvotes)
How did I end up at this school, I don't feel worthy at all (10 upvotes)
Do you need to know anything about coding for COS 340?  Or is it all just pencil and paper? (4 upvotes)
Is it crazy to start dating a senior right now? I didn't intend to like him this much, but i do. (10 upvotes)
Did anyone else see Jessica Simpson on Campus?!? (1 upvotes)
such cute animals (11 upvotes)
I knew so many kids who went by their initials BJ in elementary school, but mysteriously, they were all just Bill or Bob by the seventh grade  (41 upvotes)
Sometimes when I'm staring at a wall, I'm not zoning out... I'm just staring at a wall  (16 upvotes)
New birth control found to be 100% effective: Forbes (68 upvotes)
I loooove Mehek!! (1 upvotes)
Where my InterMSA Summit peeps at?!?? (4 upvotes)
I WANNA BE THE VERY BEST. LIKE NO ONE EVER WAS. (34 upvotes)
Does McCosh give notes for period cramps? Dying. (11 upvotes)
When will I get out of terrace imitations? Srsly need to know. (9 upvotes)
If only guys understood how painful period cramps are.. (20 upvotes)
yak of appreciation for Lesly at Forbes  (34 upvotes)
When you're trying to just poop in peace and the guy in the stall next to you is loudly wanking it (22 upvotes)
I fucking overanalyze everything help me pls (22 upvotes)
Obsessed over perfecting first cos 340 pset and the feedback says: "It works." I guess that's better than "it doesn't work"?  (8 upvotes)
What I'm most worried about at the thought of the government using our phone cameras to spy on us, is that all the footage will be of my face looking like Jaba (30 upvotes)
What if the only reason why Ted Cruz ran for president was cause he wanted to show up the people who hosed him from Tower? (80 upvotes)
Are there any hot tubs/saunas/steam rooms accessible to any student on campus? I want to chill today but don't want to spend a fortune going off campus (9 upvotes)
The old nassoul newbie arch was fuckin lit  (15 upvotes)
Just woke up with a guy next to me whose name I do not know (6 upvotes)
when you submit your R1 at 4:57am cuz you thot the deadline was 5am instead of 5pm (52 upvotes)
Is the Frist food gallery open this afternoon? (8 upvotes)
I get ads for fighting social anxiety. Even ad sense notices : ( (19 upvotes)
To be with me you have to accept that I proudly rock out to Aerosmith at any time of day. If you can't be okay w that then we can't date  (13 upvotes)
Why tf do people respond to Yaks with someones initials and their year? I honestly doubt that any of the yaks are actually about that specific person. Princeton is bigger than you think. (21 upvotes)
Yik Yak is kind of depressing here. Let's all share awesome stories so this animates a little bit, shall we? (10 upvotes)
You know you've been here too long when you dream that sleeping is graded and you spend the night worrying you aren't in the correct sleeping position (141 upvotes)
Do you guys add your professors on LinkedIn?  If so, when? (6 upvotes)
Grades, sleep, social life: supposed to choose 2, joke about getting 1, actually end up with 0 (165 upvotes)
Went on a school visit. For the first time in four years, felt like people cared about me like they care about  top students here. I guess that's what respect feels like...Maybe it's bc open house... (21 upvotes)
You know when you are taking out the trash and you realized you forgot to bring the trash? You just stand there for a second, you think to yourself "Am I the trash?" (111 upvotes)
Is early meal on rn (13 upvotes)
Good luck to everyone for Crash P's. You're going to kill it. ' (44 upvotes)
When you see the other kids in your writing sem dropbox with R1 handed in at 5 am too and you just stand in solidarity (88 upvotes)
Mad respect for dining service/cleaning crew workers who begin their day as I am trudging to bed after an all nighter and still tell me to "get some rest". So sweet, tbh. (257 upvotes)
Flashback to tenth grade when I was freaking out about an 800 word paper (218 upvotes)
Dead Grindr has me wondering if Princeton has an incredibly low number of gay/bi guys or if most of them are just very discreet like me.  (20 upvotes)
Years ago my ex dumped me, saying she never loved me as much as I loved her. Since then I've been terrified of asking out girls I like because what if they never love me back? The pain was too much. (41 upvotes)
When you accidentally pull an all nighter #week4 (25 upvotes)
Why am I still awake (19 upvotes)
I did not have sexual relations with that woman  (24 upvotes)
I think I've fallen for my ex fwb, which sucks because I didn't have these feelings when we were actually hooking up (17 upvotes)
Think I'm falling for one of my best friends again. Didn't have the courage two years ago but now she's a senior with a thesis grind (14 upvotes)
Text me SB '18 (13 upvotes)
I think I've reached a new low--spending 45 minutes gathering ingredients to make the perfect sandwich is not what my stomach intended right now (11 upvotes)
This is the first time I've lost someone and I feel like I'm coping badly because everyone else seems to be okay, but I don't know how to get better. (32 upvotes)
Spent five months hopelessly crushing on a gay dude #justgirlythings (58 upvotes)
It's been 5 hours and I've gotten through 1 paragraph of my R1 help (20 upvotes)
Cute guy at Studio 34 was cute (21 upvotes)
starting to fall for a friend who has zero interest. welp. (21 upvotes)
Why does it still hurt so much to see my ex with another girl?  It's been a year... (27 upvotes)
Yes our teeth and ambitions are bared... be prepared! (28 upvotes)
"Why do you have yik yak?" Fuckboi: "just for kiks" (106 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"Harvard University"
Location(42.380098, -71.116629)
Such a nice day out :) makes me happy!  (0 upvotes)
im broke but I have a car what can I do for fun (0 upvotes)
To any of you who feel like they aren't good enough, Or are too confused to be happy. I'll be thinking about you. We all get through it together (7 upvotes)
I am working on my thesis right now but for the past few weeks, it seems that my liver has been working much harder than I have been (1 upvotes)
I know why we have so many science majors now- because Tufts is a breeding ground for disease. Perfect storm.  (3 upvotes)
One does not simply engage in platonic sex then continue to hold hands all night.. Right? Now I want a relationship, feels caught me like  (2 upvotes)
Seeing the damage on your bank account after a good night. Ouch. (1 upvotes)
Anyone at WECode? (3 upvotes)
This week has been a bad massage. I need a happy ending (6 upvotes)
Melissa Click was fired a few days ago (1 upvotes)
A student in bed will remain in bed unless acted upon by a large enough panic (41 upvotes)
Well, it was nice knowing you all. (56 upvotes)
MBTA employees man. So salty, all the time. (0 upvotes)
Why don't we pronounce pronunciation the same way we pronunciate pronounce? (10 upvotes)
What is your longest streak of meals eaten alone at tufts? (4 upvotes)
Ok, we used condoms both times, pregnant sticks says negative, period a week late, I'm freaking out (0 upvotes)
Every university: "yes, our students are well-adjusted individuals who are happy, secure, and have low stress levels." Every student: if someone hit me with a bus, I'd probably thank them." (62 upvotes)
There's a girl at the movies who's really cute and alone. We keep making eye contact. Should I go up to her? (12 upvotes)
YOU get a drunk text and YOU get a drunk text and YOU get a drunk text!!! (14 upvotes)
Action Bronson for spring fling (6 upvotes)
Healthy living at its finest  (22 upvotes)
I'm glad that I came for the Nigeria Business Conference at Harvard  (0 upvotes)
Put contacts in after eyeliner. On the first try. No smudging. Feel like a super hero. (6 upvotes)
Who here listens to System of a Down ? (-1 upvotes)
Benefit of a 10 foot long iPhone charger: I can comfortably charge my phone while using it on the toilet. (2 upvotes)
Why are people here so afraid of feeling emotions? (11 upvotes)
Just took my first shit in days and I want to thank the kitchen staff at Dewick for making this moment possible (15 upvotes)
I'm in the mood to be in hot summer weather and crack open a beer by the pool with my friends.  (21 upvotes)
Some days I just feel horrible for no reason  (8 upvotes)
I wonder if online dating, and tinder in particular, has resulted in a net increase in dates and whether this has any economic impact on communities (2 upvotes)
my miracle hangover cure: eggs, corned beef hash, a six pack of beer, a large pot brownie (or copious bong usage), and a near-limitless supply of episodes of "The West Wing" on Netflix. In a dark room (8 upvotes)
all I want is a muscular athletic guy to pound me in the shower (I'm a guy lol) (13 upvotes)
Can someone at the CC tell me if the smoothie place is open? (0 upvotes)
Most prestigious school, yet I still find stupid people (3 upvotes)
Any suggestions for good barbers nearby?  (1 upvotes)
Fixing my drunk brain's mistakes (25 upvotes)
When the most exclusive party of the night is carm late night. Noguestswipesallowed (22 upvotes)
Today both me and my balls got a haircut :) (3 upvotes)
Yak poll: how long is your hard dick? (5 upvotes)
Reaching that point where I think every little stinking thing he does is cute. And his laugh is like music to my ears and even his freaking nose is adorable. God help me (17 upvotes)
I start my morning by reading Yaks because Yik Yak is just like The Bible: inspirational quotes, cringeworthy stories, and personal accounts. (10 upvotes)
Don't get me wrong, Harvard is wonderful, and I'm so thankful I got the opportunity to come here. But, it really sucks when your friends don't understand what it's like to have to watch your money. (11 upvotes)
To the tour guide in the gym who said the guys might want to use the regular gym rather than the one for athletic  teams because there might be prettier girls, way to represent tufts loser (43 upvotes)
If anyone from Syracuse sees this while at the Yale meet: Tyler Olander has more national championships than Jim Boeheim.   (0 upvotes)
Jeremy Lin is the only good thing to come out of Harvard. (2 upvotes)
Is this an Arts School? (1 upvotes)
The world's longest nose hair is 1.8 cm. I swear I can beat that (3 upvotes)
Harvard is only good for Puppeteering majors (3 upvotes)
Where the Harvard bitches at? Hail Susan. (3 upvotes)
Yale > Harvard (-1 upvotes)
Any girls like to get smoked up (0 upvotes)
Good morning baby  (6 upvotes)
So when tf do we get to know who's performing for spring fling? (1 upvotes)
I swear people act like homeless people are a whole different breed of humans  (5 upvotes)
I never understood why I use to see people crying in college, let's just say I've been humbled.  (10 upvotes)
I stay in the bathroom for a long time in the morning because I know that when I leave I'll have to get my life together.  (12 upvotes)
Does anyone else find it sad that for so many people the mirror is a source of self-shame, not self-love? #reclaimthemirror2016 (0 upvotes)
I always hear about girl scouts selling cookies on Harvard campus, but never see them. I need some fucking thin mints, where are they at? (4 upvotes)
When a homeless person compliments your hair and says "Look at you! What a lady YOU are!" (6 upvotes)
Team Steve or Team Matt? (0 upvotes)
what are epdc hours on weekends? (2 upvotes)
I'm really nice, unless you get to know me (5 upvotes)
How come every time I walk outside it's like the refrigerated section of a Costco?  (9 upvotes)
How was late night at Carm last night? (3 upvotes)
Depressing AF (7 upvotes)
tfw your LDR sucks at communication (3 upvotes)
My anxiety is ruining my life (12 upvotes)
I had a sex dream about another guy.. do i tell my boyfriend?  (5 upvotes)
Who do we think is going to win SC today? (-2 upvotes)
Boyfriend knows I don't ever want sex without a condom on. Last night, Boyfriend wants to have sex. Me, twice: "Do you have a condom?" Him, twice: "Yes!" When he came I realized he never put it on. (8 upvotes)
When he came inside the last time you hooked up and you finally get your period  (5 upvotes)
2 dates in and I'm so into this girl, it's a bit absurd. What to do, play it cool or lock it down? (5 upvotes)
Been talking to a girl on tinder who seems cool-we already have something in common. Unfortunately that thing is not being on tinder much so it's taken us 2 weeks to discuss what we did 2 Fridays ago  (28 upvotes)
Just tried anal for the first time (2 upvotes)
Painting somebody you know is so strangely erotic  (3 upvotes)
How do I (nude) model for an art class/school?  (7 upvotes)
I hate when guys agree to hang out and then just suddenly don't text back ever again. Like u could've just told me ur not interested. How hard is that (29 upvotes)
The world is a dark, dark place (3 upvotes)
My brain is disintegrating.  (6 upvotes)
Pretending to be a horny girl for yakkarma.  (7 upvotes)
Drunk advice girl: who needs it  (0 upvotes)
STEVE HOLT! (13 upvotes)
Do real people actually get "triggered" by things (14 upvotes)
Overheard in south: "imagine if you died when sucking your own dick, like if you just broke your neck while sucking it. (30 upvotes)
I'll pay someone to get the bitch outside my room to stop complaining (13 upvotes)
Tilton fifth floor our in the hallway having a conversation. Shut the fuck up, please. (1 upvotes)
There's no feeling like watching your best friend get a new best friend. (71 upvotes)
Got myself pregnant by looking at mirror every day  (19 upvotes)
Wondering if guys will ever stop treating me like garbage  (2 upvotes)
Can someone shed light on this recent sexual assault that went down?  I just want to know more about it after seeing some yaks  (1 upvotes)
When republican politics actually turns into an Onion article.  (10 upvotes)
That awkward moment when Tufts puts the trigger warning at the end of the sexual misconduct warning email. (83 upvotes)
"Do they have senses of humor at Harvard, or do they have to buy those too?" (13 upvotes)
People on the first floor of south watching a movie in the fucking hallway... Considering it's 1:30 am you should really take this into your rooms. So damn rude. (2 upvotes)
If I gent turnt 360 am I still on the right track? (-3 upvotes)
Chickens don't clap! (1 upvotes)
Im seriously considering leaving a goodbye note saying 'fuck it im out' and transfering to Arizona state (32 upvotes)
I really wanna have a threesome... (12 upvotes)
Nothing like roaming around at 1am in search of batteries for your vibrator  (13 upvotes)
Anyone want their sick sucked near the Harvard quad? I'm serious (2 upvotes)
Was way too high for everything I went through tonight  (7 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"Yale University"
Location(41.3111, -72.9267)
I'm from out of town. What's the best bars in downtown new haven?  (-1 upvotes)
Why the fuck do I always find myself back in this damn app. #DeathByYikYak (-1 upvotes)
Why isnt there a free the dick campaign? I've never seen one on mainstream entertainment (0 upvotes)
The complete want and need for each other and the idea of someone being so enthralled with another is just so captivating.  (1 upvotes)
Just saw the most beautiful black woman ever!!!!.... (0 upvotes)
I'm not even focusing on the sexualization of the film, but the relationship and immediate connection between them gets me (0 upvotes)
Why the fuck is this movie emotionally hurting me so much I just need to watch it again and read the books (0 upvotes)
I am dead. 50 shades has killed me (0 upvotes)
Just watched 50 shades of Grey and I threw my phone across my dorm crying when it ended. I need February 10, 2017 right now.  (1 upvotes)
Fundamental problem with politics is the existence of two parties constantly opposing the others point and not willing to try and find common ground on key issues  (3 upvotes)
All I want to do is eat my girls pussy  (1 upvotes)
When you're all caught up with homework, ready to head out to party, and discover your roommate pooped in your sock drawer .       \_()_/. (-2 upvotes)
don't get me wrong I want sex as much as the next chick but I can't do anything with a dude who's not genuinely interested in me as a person.. that's just me (7 upvotes)
Who wants to fuck right now. Right fucking now. (2 upvotes)
Life hack: Haven't seen your crush lately? Drunk text them. You'll see them eight times the next day.  (10 upvotes)
I love my boyfriend. he fucks me, then feeds me (:  (3 upvotes)
Why don't white chicks wanna hook up with Asian dudes but white dudes keep going for Asian chicks? (-3 upvotes)
I'm so hungover (3 upvotes)
People, If you are going to do something dumb, be smart about it!!  (8 upvotes)
Any y'all eva suck a titty? (0 upvotes)
Could really go for a good slow-blow rn (-1 upvotes)
People up here are too focused on getting people to think like them rather than understanding other people's points of view even if the dont agree. How will you guys ever learn from one another? (5 upvotes)
Dimes 3 for 25 6 for 45 LaQuinta hotel or SCSU campus lmk (-1 upvotes)
Whats lit for tonight? (-2 upvotes)
If i girl hots a guy , she deserves to get hit back. No if ands or buts! If a guy hits a girl first he deserves to get his ass beat. Thats just how i see things (-2 upvotes)
You ever watch a movie about slavery and want to kill every white person you see but then remember the people today didn't do it . I wonder if white people get just as angry at their ancestors  (0 upvotes)
gave my bartender tonight my number and I'm only just realizing he's probably a fuck boy. hate this.  (2 upvotes)
anybody wanna hit a diner? just leaving work fucking starving  (0 upvotes)
I can't do this anymore  (0 upvotes)
Go home. You're drunk!!  (6 upvotes)
Any girls looking to get smashed? (-3 upvotes)
APD is lit (0 upvotes)
Ugh, the guy I'm talking to sucks so bad at texting we had a little mini convo at 9 am but then he didn't respond so I texted him again at 7 pm and he didn't text me until 1 am. Should I text back.. (4 upvotes)
I heard a rumor that the Yale squash team  is making a commercial for Kanye West (3 upvotes)
That glo that you have after getting rid of a fuckboy  (13 upvotes)
What is flop? I'm a commuter  (-2 upvotes)
Best late night show? And why??  (0 upvotes)
What is flop and where is it?  (-2 upvotes)
Drunk texting is dangerous. (10 upvotes)
nipples  (3 upvotes)
             (2 upvotes)
COME TO FLOP (3 upvotes)
Is townhouse 24 and flop, SCSU or Yale parties?  (2 upvotes)
Townhouse 24 is about to throw down don't listen to what u hear (4 upvotes)
24  (3 upvotes)
I have an hour and 15 minutes to write and hand in this paper. CANNOT CONCENTRATE HOLY FUCK. (8 upvotes)
Can people stop posting basic questions that they could just look up the answer online?  (19 upvotes)
So apparently petals was made by an 8 year old girl and everyone is playing it. I'm 20 taking computer science and still can't put together a working iPhone game. How the fuck did I even get in here?? (-4 upvotes)
Flop! (-2 upvotes)
Tonight is so dry it's unreal someone throw a party (6 upvotes)
If you can purr you have my heart (-1 upvotes)
Get you a guy that will text u good morning, will rub your feet when you're tired or having a bad day , asks you about your day + actually listens, makes you poems and will put a smile on your face :) (6 upvotes)
One thing I hate the most is when a friend decides to unfollow you from a social media platform for no apparent reason (3 upvotes)
Find a women with a brain. They all have vaginas. (54 upvotes)
So, Wheat Thins or Triscuits? With Swiss cheese or cheddar?  #options (6 upvotes)
I've been having flutters and bubbles in my lower abdomen over the past 5-6 days  what could this possibly mean? (0 upvotes)
"I don't worry about going to hell cuz hell is on earth for me." (6 upvotes)
Pretty sure Connecticut economy plunging deeper in debt means tuition will skyrocket. 8% of the entire deficit is the cost of the new grass at SCSU.   (38 upvotes)
Best places to go out to eat in new haven?  (4 upvotes)
Anyone I could buy weed from at Yale? -kid from Boston  (-1 upvotes)
My roommate talks to herself more than she talks to me...  (11 upvotes)
does anyone here watch the oscars? (4 upvotes)
Bored and alone once again on a friday night (7 upvotes)
People. I know you guys probably don't care.. but the best things that happened ever to me was this weekend I went to the store and finally I bought Nutella. It's heaven...  (2 upvotes)
Just got an email from my grandma with the entire email in the subject line (46 upvotes)
What time does student center close on Friday? (3 upvotes)
Just got in the worst fight with my imaginary boyfriend. He says he needs his space and wants to see other people fml  (19 upvotes)
Some horney people over here by southern (2 upvotes)
Any girls down to watch porn? (7 upvotes)
How is it that you managed to see your boyf 5 weeks in a row but can't manage to see your friends  (1 upvotes)
So many websites where you can watch the newest movies illegally and no websites where you can read any book illegally  (54 upvotes)
Nothing beats a nice warm vagina (13 upvotes)
so stressed out man (6 upvotes)
I just want to tie a girl up and lick her down. Maybe spank her, show her a few things she's never experienced. I'm tired of all the vanilla, gets boring.  (16 upvotes)
When you're a guy and after sex  u ask her " so what are we now" (2 upvotes)
Can i give your rack a squeeze?? (4 upvotes)
need someone's opinion  (3 upvotes)
I love trolling on here  (4 upvotes)
FML F IT HARD (3 upvotes)
the same thirsty guys always posting the same thing 3-4 times  (15 upvotes)
childish (7 upvotes)
decent facial hair can make a dude 200x more attractive hashtag fax (14 upvotes)
I wish I had one of those super cute smiles some girls have  envious  (12 upvotes)
the attraction i have for men with beards is serious  (18 upvotes)
love is a really good show  (8 upvotes)
this boy in my math class is rlly fucking attractive, never really noticed until today  (11 upvotes)
That movie Dope is eye opening af everyone can learn something from that  (14 upvotes)
How can any sane person still want to vote Republican after the shit show that was last night's debate? Someone help me understand (22 upvotes)
when you gotta jiggle that one piece of poop just dangling there  (11 upvotes)
"I don't repeat myself. I don't repeat myself." -Donald Trump (34 upvotes)
Whenever I go on a date with this guy, he just like smiles, stares at me, or laughs...I try to make conversation and he'll answer but afterwards he'll just keep looking at me is that a good thing? (10 upvotes)
Just coughed while eating rice and now a piece is stuck in my nose.  (13 upvotes)
I always do well first semester but then shit always hits the fan second semester lol  (24 upvotes)
Not like I'm ugly or anything of the sort but I feel like white guys are less likely to approach me bc I'm black. It's silly but I kinda feel like that deep down  (6 upvotes)
If I listened to my own advice that I give to people, id have my life together by now  (6 upvotes)
Mother: "Once upon a time, there was a student who had money..." Me"No, no there wasn't and there never will be" (18 upvotes)
So this girl in my math class was wearing a brazzers hoodie and it took me a while to remember what it was until I googled it.. (8 upvotes)
Laundry sucks (6 upvotes)
I got 2 out of 3 quiz questions wrong and got an 80. What? (11 upvotes)
Going to end a 2 year relationship, any advice? (0 upvotes)
Yup I'm ready for today to be over (7 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"Stanford University"
Location(37.43, -122.17)
I'm a low income Latino student and I don't support FLIP leadership and their arguments against the Review (3 upvotes)
FLIP lied-the student exposed himself and wrote a post on medium  (2 upvotes)
Okay parents, it's Coupa, not rocket science. Get your shit together.  (4 upvotes)
Two hordes swarming lag right now: parents and middle schoolers in suits. (4 upvotes)
S/O to the girl at Xanadu who told me I was a great dancer. Tequila helps (2 upvotes)
So many parents here. So many sugar mom's and sugar daddy's. Welp, this should be fun (3 upvotes)
Why does the dining hall coffee have micelles of unknown substance floating on top if you let it sit for 5 minutes? (-1 upvotes)
Is CS109 as difficult or nearly as difficult as STATS 116? (0 upvotes)
It was just confirmed that FLIP suspended someone from FLIP's core after he supported SLE's western Civ focus. Disgusting. (8 upvotes)
Are Econ 135 and 140 too similar to take both? What are the differences? (-1 upvotes)
Feeling guilty about sleeping in even though it's Saturday because you know you have work to do #stanford (6 upvotes)
Overheard parent/child interaction outside arrillaga dining: Dad: but I thought Late Nite was served at the Ace, right Kid: uh... Yeah. No. The Axe and Palm. Mom: this isn't even real grass! (19 upvotes)
Is it normal for a girl to tell all her friends after she hooks up with a guy? I feel angry and betrayed (1 upvotes)
Stanford men's gymnastics today vs Japan is going to be sick. Get hammered and go support the gym team because they rock!! (9 upvotes)
I'm really uncomfortable with the cluster fuck of parents in arrillaga right now. (5 upvotes)
Yo all the hype for men's bball is great but can we take a second and acknowledge that the women's team beat Oregon state last night 76-54?!?!? And they weren't even expected to win?  (17 upvotes)
When you don't know if you have a girl or not so you have a maybae (8 upvotes)
FOMO? More like FOBLO, fear of being left out. (10 upvotes)
Assert your dominance by asking your girlfriends parents what they want to be after they graduate (12 upvotes)
That moment you realize The Fat Jewish is really just Tito from Rocket Power  (4 upvotes)
Nothing makes you want to drink more than having your parents follow you to class (8 upvotes)
Parents take 20x longer to order at Starbucks  (18 upvotes)
Anyone need a ticket to the game this afternoon? We have 1 extra ticket (3 upvotes)
College is like losing your mom in the grocery store for 4 years  (14 upvotes)
Hey Marco did you forget that this debate wasn't sponsored by Google. (17 upvotes)
When your parents come for the weekend, and ask to meet your friends and girl friend, but they don't exist and neither do your parents, and you don't actually go to Stanford. (40 upvotes)
Girls, any opinions on anal? (4 upvotes)
Tbh I want to vote for Rubio now just because he went after trump like that. What a savage. I like that. So funny (12 upvotes)
Let's dispel the notion once and for all that telling the audience to google someone is an effective debate strategy.  (21 upvotes)
I think I didn't do well for a date. I blew it lol.  (15 upvotes)
I swear entry level jobs are like, "Must have 3 years prior experience, a husband, be eligible to retire..."  (26 upvotes)
Dog! (15 upvotes)
I just wanna call him mine  (1 upvotes)
The top republican candidates are an actual joke right now. It's embarrassing and sad.  (37 upvotes)
Is it okay to date a woman 5 years older than you?  (22 upvotes)
There is a man in a red shirt and hat pretending to be a student here and offering people vodka and weed. Be careful.  (70 upvotes)
When you live in FroSoCo and you wish you wrote an essay to get out of it, rather than in it  (103 upvotes)
Excited for Viennese Ball tonight! It will be so lit (22 upvotes)
Tonight I learned we have dekes at Stanford. (25 upvotes)
Welp telling my parents that I'm gay went terribly (60 upvotes)
I still don't know where the lower/upper row are..... I just think of it as the row  (20 upvotes)
Can I buy weed from someone at stanford? Just graduated and work at Google and need a hook up lol (7 upvotes)
Where is this Stanford grade inflation I've heard so much about from my friends who don't go here?  (137 upvotes)
Xanadu is trying so hard hahahahaha (13 upvotes)
When you feel so overwhelmed by upcoming midterms, papers, and finals that you do absolutely nothing but lie in bed stressing #week8 (113 upvotes)
When did it become socially unacceptable to watch Aladdin while drinking? I'm just really not okay with all the judgmental looks.  (42 upvotes)
Any parties tonight  (5 upvotes)
Your mom takes you on guilt trips? I go on shamecations (41 upvotes)
Thoughts on anal? (0 upvotes)
Men: does sexy vs plain underwear on a girl make a difference to you? (6 upvotes)
Sig chi has never been so lit BRING PARENTS (47 upvotes)
Where are the parties tonight? (8 upvotes)
Xanadu is going hard! Shit is going. (9 upvotes)
Deke party at Xanadu  (10 upvotes)
Xanadu is killing it tonight  (10 upvotes)
if the cute guys aren't at frat parties, where do they all go? pls help  (10 upvotes)
Shitload of alcohol @ Xanadu rn. Get lit. Turn up.  (10 upvotes)
I think I'm just gonna sleep with my rich friend's dad instead of applying for jobs  (27 upvotes)
Cops at GSB beware (8 upvotes)
Where do Stanford students get boyfriends?  ...The d.school (73 upvotes)
Party at sig chi tonight, bring your parents!! (23 upvotes)
Are there any gloryholes on campus or in Palo Alto? (1 upvotes)
Is Sig Chi happening tn? (-2 upvotes)
Why was there a fire truck outside stern (11 upvotes)
Are the dining halls doing anything special for parents' weekend? (9 upvotes)
Is there a party tonight? (8 upvotes)
GPA does not matter until it does. So long dreams of grad school. (72 upvotes)
When your ex wears the tie and shirt you bought for him to formal with another girl :'( </3 (54 upvotes)
Trump University gave kids debt and unemployment? Isn't that what Universities do best these days? (21 upvotes)
Just matched with one of my fraternity brother's little sister on tinder. #Shes18 #FratBrotherInLaw (63 upvotes)
Where's the party tonight (13 upvotes)
Comfort to those students whose parents/families couldn't make it  (126 upvotes)
I'm a Jew.  (12 upvotes)
10 minutes into Finding Nemo and chill and  he's already touched the butt (88 upvotes)
How I feel about week 8  (147 upvotes)
You don't know controvery until two of your yaks have 20 votes but net votes is still 0 on both (23 upvotes)
After all these drills, when there's an actual building on fire everybody's just going to be chilling in their rooms when the building burns down  (68 upvotes)
*lag fire alarm goes off* *make mixtape jokes* *everyone groans* (62 upvotes)
Stop calling us a student body. We refuse to be objectified in this way! (73 upvotes)
Like I need a boyfriend so that I can post cute pictures of us with lyrics from Disney songs (23 upvotes)
My parents are you going to meet my boyfriend tomorrow, but they don't know he's Jewish yet. Should I tell them now, or wait until we're more serious...? (7 upvotes)
It seems like every day JFL finds someway to piss me off.  (2 upvotes)
Just saw my ex doing cardio in the gym, I mean what's the point? Not like he has a heart (267 upvotes)
I'm about graduate with my masters degree. I've finally lost appetite for school.  (49 upvotes)
SSO tonight at 7:30! SUID to Bach, 21+ to roll.  (32 upvotes)
Would it be possible to get a sibling into the gym? (13 upvotes)
Whole wheat pasta is a crime (46 upvotes)
You know you've grown up when a "headshot" means a linkedin profile photo and not a Call Of Duty kill (133 upvotes)
Any parties tonight? (14 upvotes)
Tip: bone ur girl's mom during parents weekend to see if the relationship is worth it in the long term  (84 upvotes)
Overheard at Green: "yea but she was hella fugly so I pretended I had the flu, went home and jerked off"  (41 upvotes)
Yes laawd (3 upvotes)
I say this every night, every day, every afternoon, and it's so true. (12 upvotes)
Sitting right under the TA's box at Hewlett right as you finish the pset #just41things  (46 upvotes)
When your parents ask you about celebrities on campus, and the first person that comes to mind is the Thai Cafe lady (142 upvotes)
I will live and act ONLY for superficial reasons, henceforth. (9 upvotes)
stanford: where parents' weekend and alumni weekend are essentially the same thing (205 upvotes)
Parents Weekend: the time to eat real food and become reacquainted with your parents' wallets (167 upvotes)
Theres something about a mans sweat that makes me wet af and makes me wanna jump him and ride his cock fiercely (10 upvotes)
That moment when you're completely not ready to meet your girl's parents (100 upvotes)
I'm going to find me a millionaire milf on campus and be her boy toy and never need to work again.  (68 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"University of Chicago"
Location(41.7897, -87.5997)
"University of Chicago" sucks
"Massachusetts Institute of Technology"
Location(42.3591, -71.0934)
remember eating dinner at your friends' houses? (0 upvotes)
That moment when you take off your bra and let the girls loose  (0 upvotes)
curious guys? I have the room to myself for a while  (0 upvotes)
Don't be with people that treat you like Kanye treats the cousin that stole his laptop  (2 upvotes)
I've accepted the fact that Ima do shitty on this quiz FML  (2 upvotes)
When a cute boy makes eye contact with you and you stare at him ferociously to assert your dominance and later question why you're single. I'm so bad at flirting.  (6 upvotes)
im broke but I have a car what can I do for fun (0 upvotes)
They love each other  (8 upvotes)
I really fucking don't want to live with my roommate again, and I don't know who else to ask. Wtf do I do lol (5 upvotes)
I have two midterms on Monday and I haven't had a chance to study because I've been out all day for a school extracurricular activity but all I wanna do is sleep. Like I desperately need sleep (2 upvotes)
I'm singing irony by the wonder girls and annoying the crap out of my roommate  (-1 upvotes)
Who needs weed? (0 upvotes)
Me:" hey what do you think is the longest way to kill a person?" Roommate:" You wait" (10 upvotes)
How many people cheat on their tests? (0 upvotes)
Sour diesel, blue dream, white widow, and hindu kush in my stash. Prohibition is working out great! (2 upvotes)
Everytime after leg day: FUCK, I CAN'T WALK (1 upvotes)
What should I do tonight?  (0 upvotes)
It's 2016, the remix to ignition is no longer hot and fresh out the kitchen (1 upvotes)
Reuse coconut water bottles thank me later (1 upvotes)
I don't mean, to seem like I care about material things, like a social status. (5 upvotes)
I could be in Maine by the time the green line gets here (7 upvotes)
Bitches crazy  (5 upvotes)
One does not simply engage in platonic sex then continue to hold hands all night.. Right? Now I want a relationship, feels caught me like  (2 upvotes)
Whenever I go out there's a 1000% chance im ending my night at Beantown tacqueria  (6 upvotes)
Any anti-anxiety prefs besides weed? Was thinking a nootropic or some script (1 upvotes)
My roommate's shit smells like 13 rotten bodies. Even febreeze can't fix the horrid smell (3 upvotes)
Sometimes I just wanna have fun with a titless girl (1 upvotes)
I just took a poop so big that it tired me out  (5 upvotes)
My uber driver is using a Morgan Freeman setting on his gps. What a time to be alive. (37 upvotes)
Trying to poop with a tampon in  (3 upvotes)
So emotional that I'm crying for Freddie Mercury's death  (-2 upvotes)
What are the best PCs under $500? And why? My mac crashed and I need a new computer asap (2 upvotes)
Getting deep (37 upvotes)
It feels so weird to use a stall that someone just walked out of because their bare ass was touching the seat less than a 30 seconds ago. Like that seat hasn't had any cool-down time.  (12 upvotes)
#marcomentum is real  (0 upvotes)
Anybody listened to the slowed down version of the weeknd? (-1 upvotes)
Anyone at WECode? (3 upvotes)
Everyone says you should always think you're beautiful, but when you actually bring it up to someone, they think you're too full of yourself. Like wat (2 upvotes)
How is it a crime to reward myself with McDonald's everytime after I work out? I'm still fit as fk (-2 upvotes)
Should I add and message a girl I have a crush on on Facebook if I don't know when I'll see her again? (6 upvotes)
About to buy Pokemon Red after watching full house all morning. Am I in 1996 or 2016? #qtc (7 upvotes)
PSA there is a club penguin app. And it is a game changer.  (10 upvotes)
Only in college: Sleep at 3am, wake up and breakfast at noon-2pm, lunch at 3-5pm, dinner at 10pm, repeat (7 upvotes)
I'm still in bed lol (3 upvotes)
My mom is here for the weekend, and yepp  (10 upvotes)
The worst part about wearing Heelys around campus is when girls get too wet and I hydroplane (10 upvotes)
Last night I was walking home and a guy pulled out a knife to rob me. During the exchange my sleeves rolled up to show my scars from cutting. He dropped the knife, hugged me, and left.  I'm so numb rn (-1 upvotes)
help can someone please tell me where to buy a 3DS charger around here (-1 upvotes)
MBTA employees man. So salty, all the time. (0 upvotes)
When you break up with your boyfriend and you realize you lost all your friends  (9 upvotes)
Sexual tension is rough. She's so hot... And so my type.. But I'm with someone. I'm a dick right?  (3 upvotes)
Wanna slap some boody right now (-1 upvotes)
Stop wearing Canada Goose (6 upvotes)
Cheeto fingers turn to dorito fingers. (4 upvotes)
When watching crimes shows I sometimes think about what a terrible witness I would be. Like I don't think I could describe my own mother to a sketch artist   (5 upvotes)
getting an IUD and am supposed to get it while I'm on my period but I got my period 2 weeks early so now I don't know if I get it now or wait till I was supposed to get my period. Men have it so easy. (2 upvotes)
Ok, we used condoms both times, pregnant sticks says negative, period a week late, I'm freaking out (0 upvotes)
Shotgunning 3 beers before going out last night was a great idea... (2 upvotes)
Fuck you sinus drainage (2 upvotes)
La Vie Boheme (5 upvotes)
There's a girl at the movies who's really cute and alone. We keep making eye contact. Should I go up to her? (12 upvotes)
tenni slap (1 upvotes)
In female shopping stores they should have like a super smash bros corner or just a gaming area for guys. #thinkingselfishly  (14 upvotes)
YOU get a drunk text and YOU get a drunk text and YOU get a drunk text!!! (14 upvotes)
Just wanna fuck a midget right now (0 upvotes)
Lost my virginity in a whopping 30 seconds last night!  (7 upvotes)
The em dash is the greatest typographic mark of all time (2 upvotes)
I'm glad that I came for the Nigeria Business Conference at Harvard  (0 upvotes)
The wheels on the T go *unintelligible screeching* (140 upvotes)
Pro tip: have a page requirement for that essay? Struggling to write quality material? Highlight all text, right click > font > advanced tab > spacing: Expanded by: 0.2 pt > press OK. You're welcome (2 upvotes)
I hate shared bathrooms so much on weekends...its like the toilets turn into Jackson Pollock paintings  (10 upvotes)
Put contacts in after eyeliner. On the first try. No smudging. Feel like a super hero. (6 upvotes)
"How do I find out if a girl is interested? Great question. I usually just assume they're not" (18 upvotes)
Who here listens to System of a Down ? (-1 upvotes)
Bong Hits 4 Jesus (22 upvotes)
Nationalism lead to both world wars (3 upvotes)
Anyone have lots of "school friends" but no "weekend friends" (30 upvotes)
I genuinely tear up whenever I see the scene in Rugrats in Paris where Chuckie doesn't have a mom to dance with (17 upvotes)
When you realize that your roommate is a complete piece of shit (4 upvotes)
You know it's real when he's not grossed out when you throw up from food poisoning and he just wants to take care of you  (10 upvotes)
Think I like girls too.. (18 upvotes)
Number one reason I can't get out of bed in the morning: I'm too comfortable. Number one reason I can't fall asleep: not comfortable enough to. Hmmmmm (13 upvotes)
Would a girl purposefully make something up to make her bf/ex jealous?  (1 upvotes)
They feel when you pull into a parking space and notice there is a sign in front of it saying "Reserved for JOHN CENA" and next thing you know you're getting rekt (5 upvotes)
I wonder if online dating, and tinder in particular, has resulted in a net increase in dates and whether this has any economic impact on communities (2 upvotes)
Are guys attracted to girls with small boobs? I've been an A cup my whole life  (-2 upvotes)
The fact that the guy sitting across from me at the BPL and I keep making eyes at each other is making studying very difficult this afternoon but I also don't want to move.  (6 upvotes)
Feel like someone threw a brick at my face and hit me straight on. It's gonna be a good day. (9 upvotes)
When ladies squat  (7 upvotes)
Deleted tinder last week for many reasons but now I just want to get it back. Someone talk me off the ledge (-4 upvotes)
I wonder if, in the history of the universe, a political Facebook argument has ever actually changed someone's opinion. I swear people just argue craving the attention of those who think like them (14 upvotes)
Not hungover thankfully but definitely too exhausted from last night to do anything productive (9 upvotes)
If you could be told right now who your future spouse will be, would you want to? (4 upvotes)
Daddy 2016 (4 upvotes)
I really want a girlfriend, but I really need a casual fuck buddy until I can get a girlfriend (11 upvotes)
I miss the way we'd chill on the hillside  (2 upvotes)
Pre-2010 moment when trying to play a dvd, but turns out its "region locked"  (3 upvotes)
Where is the Bernie Sanders rally today? (1 upvotes)
My internal monologue.  (61 upvotes)
I want cheese  (8 upvotes)
Quick way to lose 10 pounds?  (7 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"Duke University"
Location(36.0011, -78.9389)
"Duke University" sucks
"University of Pennsylvania"
Location(39.95, -75.19)
Who's at the Sheraton for NCEMSF? (1 upvotes)
TB to that time when Donald Trump swore he saw Muslims celebrating after 9/11 but he couldn't remember where the footage was and couldn't provide any evidence it ever happened. Still waiting Trump.. (0 upvotes)
Hagerty library closing 8 on Friday and Saturday is its passive aggressive way of saying go out and do something you nerds (1 upvotes)
I'm in philly  because I'm waiting between trains at 30st and I have to say this is the weirdest yak I have seen in a while  (2 upvotes)
Who's trying to meet me at the Atomic comics? (1 upvotes)
I really want a dog (0 upvotes)
Is there any space left in vp? (0 upvotes)
"I don't think I've had beer in 2016" "I did - I was in Canada"  Overheard in Huntsman (0 upvotes)
Someone please hook me up with the tall guy here at the hotel with the high top fade haircut (-2 upvotes)
The best part of being single is being able to sleep around. I can sleep all over my lonely bed. Left, right, middle, wherever. (5 upvotes)
I just had a salad but I still want chick-fil-a  (0 upvotes)
What UPenn frat is throwing down tonight? (-1 upvotes)
Why is it so difficult to find a sex budy... think about how nice it would be if asking someone you see in class was just socially acceptable. (2 upvotes)
Is it possible to party and socialize and lose weight? (1 upvotes)
People always find something to complain about. (0 upvotes)
UMass Amherst; who's the worst, UMass Lowell, Amherst College, or Pike? (0 upvotes)
Has anyone successfully lost weight in college? (3 upvotes)
Took a shit at NCEMSF Conference got an art degree from Drexel  (3 upvotes)
Bilyk is a hottie (-4 upvotes)
I want waffles (1 upvotes)
Dark humor is like food, not everyone gets it (10 upvotes)
What is ncemsf and why do we all hate Boston college? (2 upvotes)
Accepted Students Day: To your left you can see a group of ratchet hungover freshmen retreating into the dorms  (1 upvotes)
I'll fucking corn on the cob you, Boston College  (1 upvotes)
Just woke up 20 minutes ago  (5 upvotes)
Blowjobs > Handjobs ??? Wat do u think ?  (10 upvotes)
The yoga pants and job shirt look is really in rn  (6 upvotes)
I feel like the selection of sessions is week this year compared to last.   (0 upvotes)
NCEMSF better have free food and drinks at the snack break lol (3 upvotes)
Circle jerk in saloon B rn  (0 upvotes)
Anyone know why here was a PFD Ambulance outside the hotel this morning?  (-1 upvotes)
Any guys want to experiment? 10 floor.  (0 upvotes)
Why doesn't go puff deliver pot (1 upvotes)
Is going to NCEMSF as an alum even socially acceptable?   (2 upvotes)
Bumpin some punkaj udhas and smokin that loud, ustad (-2 upvotes)
This tournament is running slow  (2 upvotes)
What frats are people in at this NCEMSF conference?  (2 upvotes)
What the fuck is everyone taking notes on? (1 upvotes)
Something I learned from this conference: Wawa has great coffee! (10 upvotes)
My bed smells like vagina and I should probably clean it  (7 upvotes)
BC needs to go home now  (3 upvotes)
Me: Ehh, Funyuns are breakfast food, right? *Proceeds to eat a whole bag of Funyuns at 2pm* (6 upvotes)
Straight guys do u completely shave ur pubes or just trim?  (-1 upvotes)
Sweater guy with the ems bars, the real mvp (6 upvotes)
Boston College, can you even transport? (8 upvotes)
Everyone, slow down with the note taking. There's no midterm or final for the 45 minute lecture.  chill. (6 upvotes)
I walked into the lobby of the EMS conference and got both my bs and MD from Temple. (6 upvotes)
Hillary for prison (9 upvotes)
S/O to the Eckerd girls for being hot as fuck (4 upvotes)
Hey man, Ik Umass Lowell sucks, Boston College EMS is a bunch of queers, but FUCK that kid in the cow boy hat. You look like a cartoon character (6 upvotes)
Ppl are complaining but be honest it's not that big of a down grade from the tempe/drexel/penn yaks. (5 upvotes)
I'm from Umass Lowell and just peed standing up for the first time. I don't like it. Felt so unnatural and now my floor is wet with pee.  (7 upvotes)
Squadtard game is strong today (3 upvotes)
I hated iggy azalea before it was trendy to do so  (5 upvotes)
I'm a little slow. What's with all the Boston College jokes? (5 upvotes)
Real talk are there any bagels left at hub bub?  (2 upvotes)
Boston college pees sitting down (7 upvotes)
MGS masturbates to YouTube videos of CoC war base reconstructions (2 upvotes)
That annoying moment when you realize Virginia Tech brought the hottest squad yet again  (31 upvotes)
Uri sleeps in bathtubs (2 upvotes)
I stop smoking pot two years ago now and admittedly enjoy life less. (10 upvotes)
BC stimulates the vagus nerve manually  (-1 upvotes)
Smolka eats poo (2 upvotes)
My phone just autocorrected "week" to "werk"...  what does this say about me as a person  (4 upvotes)
Is this some sort of middle conference going on? Idk yik yak makes it seem like a bunch of middle schoolers but it keeps referring to colleges.  (3 upvotes)
In younger than the original cast of full house and they still look better than me.  (5 upvotes)
She: "What's up?" Me: "Same old, same old." She: "I have a boyfriend." (10 upvotes)
Daaaaaamn DJ, lost your mom and your husband.  (10 upvotes)
Ugh this exactly like when those model UN high schoolers come to Philly.  (10 upvotes)
Why cant people realize that after a certain point, it really doesn't matter, if things aren't worth the stress, walk away  (8 upvotes)
I have never seen so many trauma shears in one place #ncemsf (27 upvotes)
Today I learned rupture my liver in philly not North Dakota  (0 upvotes)
Any whackers have a cold pack on them?  (4 upvotes)
Is the tall skinny guy with curly hair from CMUEMS single? (5 upvotes)
Being a dick because this is anonymous shows how immature you are. You were probably bullied in high school  (3 upvotes)
Where can I get a decent cheap haircut in West Philly? (0 upvotes)
People on here are so mean????? (10 upvotes)
This entire conference is one giant dick measuring contest. I would never want any of you petty children treating me.  (25 upvotes)
UMASS LOWELL. GO HOME (16 upvotes)
Yank it til it pops.  (-1 upvotes)
Don't be mad at me cause you not poppin  (0 upvotes)
BC EMS gets off to PCR refusal narratives  (16 upvotes)
I heard if you don't transport you are a bitch. Can anyone conform this? (-4 upvotes)
Shout out to al like Greek life members here. These EMS whacker a don't know what a party is  (4 upvotes)
Hey friends! Someone might have grabbed our job shirts by accident last night and it's really cold! If anyone finds a UVM black job shirts that belongs to Wallace and Snyder let us know!  (6 upvotes)
When your bartender adds more than the required alcohol to your drink, does that make him a friend or an enemy? (8 upvotes)
Time to bake and hit the GYM, join me. (2 upvotes)
Temple EMS: "our city sucks and our girls look more like guys than most guys at this conference" (11 upvotes)
My piece just broke :( anyone know a good head shop in university city/center city? (2 upvotes)
When do you ems guys leave?! No one knows what you're fucking yaking about. (4 upvotes)
Is it time to go out and drink yet? #NCEMSF (18 upvotes)
I bet half of you don't even have raptors , what type of college whackers are you  (7 upvotes)
Is subtweeting on yik yak subyakking? (19 upvotes)
My mom's response to Neko Atsume: You're 24. (10 upvotes)
Pokemon day, NY, here I come! (15 upvotes)
Sleepy circle child.  (13 upvotes)
anyone going to flyers vs coyotes today? (-1 upvotes)
I don't even know why I'm supposed to hate umass Lowell but even I do now. (31 upvotes)
damn what happened between everyone on here and boston college??? (5 upvotes)
Boston College youtubes "boobs" (52 upvotes)
Boston college hates babies  (2 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"California Institute of Technology"
Location(34.1386, -118.1255)
I need a sloppy beej before work. Any takers?  (0 upvotes)
*rides bike to in n out because I'm watching my health* (1 upvotes)
*rides bike to in new out because I'm watching my health* (0 upvotes)
If Trump wins I'll leave the country. If Hillary wins I'll leave the country. Not because of them, it's because my visa got revoked  (1 upvotes)
Anyone here for the Bernie Sanders rally? (1 upvotes)
Berkeley (0 upvotes)
Anybody else here at PCC on a Saturday morning (3 upvotes)
Anyone at hacktech want to get smashed right now? (1 upvotes)
ACDA sr high crew  hmu at the Sheraton  (-3 upvotes)
I think I have a crush on an anti-hero serial killer named Dexter :-)  (0 upvotes)
If 3% of a population is gay, and PCC has 35,000 students, then we should have about 1050 gay people's on campus (0 upvotes)
Anyone at the langham? (-2 upvotes)
I have to take a piss so fucking bad and there's nowhere to go please god help me (1 upvotes)
when your feeling a bit narcissistic and suddenly hate everyone. *cancels all plans and prepares for marijuana and Netflix  (4 upvotes)
Had my rinky dink iPhone 4s for more than five years now with a 12 case. The champ is still pulling through!  (4 upvotes)
Back in dena  lets be friends  (2 upvotes)
Anyone go to 24 hour fitness? (-3 upvotes)
Where the free condoms at PCC??? (1 upvotes)
So you know how some girls won't suck a dick, like for whatever reason, but they just won't. Is that a thing some gay guys do? Because I don't think I've met a gay guy who won't suck their bfs dick.  (2 upvotes)
Dropped my phone on its face last night. Still, it decides to crack today... (-1 upvotes)
This Asian guy that sits next to me is so rude, I want sock the living out of him.   (1 upvotes)
He's coming home this April from deployment. I can't wait to have sex with him.  (13 upvotes)
What happened at chick-fil-a? (0 upvotes)
Cute guys that got their own cars and they shit together  get it daddy you in the right track  (-1 upvotes)
I'm gonna say to hi to him today. Fuck it.  (9 upvotes)
This girl in overalls talking on the phone  is cute (1 upvotes)
My only friends at school are the squirrels lmao  (14 upvotes)
Damn Daniel (2 upvotes)
I feel like taking one of those maintenance carts on a joyride at some point... (2 upvotes)
The line at Subway... Holy fuck. (5 upvotes)
I'm being a caring friend but you're not taking the advice of not being revealing towards your clothes. This is for a guy, and you guys ain't bf/gf shiiiit bitch. I'm being a caring bestfriend.  (-2 upvotes)
How do I tell my boyfriend to stop doing me hard when we have gay sex. I tell him to stop and slow down, he slows down but he rushes again. I was crying all last night afterward  (-2 upvotes)
I purposely come to class knowingly spreading Strep so that all of you get the Strep Throat!  (-1 upvotes)
The stomach flu sucks :( (1 upvotes)
If your battery is extremely low, you shouldn't waste whatever precious milliamps of power left posting a 2 second snap to your story that people will care 0.01% about. (11 upvotes)
Girls width or length? (-1 upvotes)
It's kind of sad that I only have like 3 straight friends haha  (3 upvotes)
Anyone know a smog place that takes bribes ?  (-1 upvotes)
So besides sex, weed, and misdemeanors, what else are people on Yik yak in to? (1 upvotes)
Male, 5"9, athlete and an averaged sized dick looking for fwb (2 upvotes)
Just so you know, the gays are laughing at the small dicked, pussy assed straight guys who are too insecure to use the urinals.  (1 upvotes)
Looking for a F interested in a sugarbaby type situation. (-2 upvotes)
Sometimes I'm so horny that masturbating does nothing. I wish a had a girl I could call (8 upvotes)
Let me help you with that  (10 upvotes)
Need a big booty bitch to sit in my face (3 upvotes)
Lesbian and gay people who picks up the tab on the first date? (2 upvotes)
Favorite Starbucks drink? (1 upvotes)
I'd like to have a meaningful discussion about sexual orientation because I'll admit it seems I'm a bit ignorant about this subject. Is there anyone I can talk to? (2 upvotes)
I actually really like Pasadena (11 upvotes)
3ds charger anyone? (-2 upvotes)
I got into a fight with my ex Roommate's and they keyed up and vandalized my new BMW..so while they were away at work the next day..I put tiny holes through all the Condoms (3 upvotes)
Spring break in Mexico here I come  (4 upvotes)
What age did you lose your virginity? (3 upvotes)
Any girl down to kick it in like 30 mins?  (-1 upvotes)
Yearbooks honestly distort the reality of highschool and middleschool.  (9 upvotes)
Bitch I can hold onto my boobs running down the stairs better than you can hold onto a relationship  (8 upvotes)
Who needs a BF when my GPA goes down on me everyday.  (25 upvotes)
"Lets do away with prejudice dont discriminate, tolerance is bliss, we got to get together on this, cross this problem of our list. Its not trigonometry, inside we are the same" (-3 upvotes)
I have determined that being gay is not actually a sin, it's just a misunderstanding. The truth is, Satan's gay and God keeps sending gays to hell to set the devil up on a date.  (8 upvotes)
Whose at the library  (-1 upvotes)
As a tall person, sorry to everyone sitting behind me, it's just that I can't see the board very well \_()_/ (8 upvotes)
Shoutout to the person who sits in front of me. Sorry. (5 upvotes)
Ladies, does having a deep voice matter? (3 upvotes)
When your keys won't turn and you have school soon  (0 upvotes)
When someone asks me to watch their stuff.. um I'm not prepared for whatevers about to fight me for it  (21 upvotes)
Anyone what's the give me head in my car?  (0 upvotes)
what math do I take if after 131 if I'm a nursing major? (0 upvotes)
I'm so fucking hungry and broke I want to die  (3 upvotes)
Students are taking an exam and I'm bored. (0 upvotes)
On the real why is it always fucking freezing in the library, like, I can't feel my toes man /:  (7 upvotes)
TEN TRILLION LIONS (3 upvotes)
I just want a fwb to relieve stress with during break :'( (1 upvotes)
Got a girl's number today. She put the blower fish  emoji by her name. so I asked if that was her favorite animal and she said no it's a cat and winked. Does that mean she wants to blow my fish? Lol (17 upvotes)
I'm having conversations with myself but Im getting into arguments  (3 upvotes)
Come check out my new boot camp style class. It's the shit. MWF 6-650 and 7-750 (-2 upvotes)
I throw a fusion boot camp style fitness class MWF 6-650 and 7-7:50 in South Pasadena. First week free. Hit me up (-2 upvotes)
A suh dude (0 upvotes)
What happened to all the people asking for bjs here? I loved reading the comments on those (6 upvotes)
I need weed, can anyone hook me up? (-4 upvotes)
Damn ass hole bus driver left even though I was right in front of him  (3 upvotes)
I need dick asap (-2 upvotes)
I wanna talk to this guy but I'm too shy  (1 upvotes)
My class got cancelled and now I have nothing to do til 5:30  (1 upvotes)
$350 for tinting car windows is expensive or nah? Need some help LOL (2 upvotes)
Save a horse, ride a cowboy. (10 upvotes)
It's so weird how little teenagers are so free about sex and desperate to have a relationship.  (13 upvotes)
Can anyone sell me a semester tap card? (-3 upvotes)
Pcc looks so empty today.  (1 upvotes)
Look at LAVISHILASH !!! best eyelashes Ever !!!!  (-4 upvotes)
Hot guys and tattoos  #whereyouat (9 upvotes)
My bitch can tell I'm addicted to pussy and she looks past it  (-1 upvotes)
Someone at the councilors office is "loud"  (-2 upvotes)
Any glory hole nearby NOT in pcc? I need discreet head ASAP.  (-1 upvotes)
Are some of the doors at pcc really weirdly heavy or am I weaker than I thought??  (7 upvotes)
Shout out to that prick that cut the whole line just to steal a fucking muffin (7 upvotes)
*mfw you have to wait for someone to flush or turn on the sink in order to drop your deuce :-)* (0 upvotes)
Who's in this Bus14b class rn?  (-1 upvotes)
Lil shin shin turns two today. Best pet ever (29 upvotes)
Wen u get to class and find out its cancelled  (4 upvotes)
In n Out or the Hat ???  (0 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"Johns Hopkins University"
Location(39.241773, -76.936365)
"Johns Hopkins University" sucks
"Dartmouth College"
Location(43.7033, -72.2883)
KSA Overheard: "If I don't get Phi Beta Kappa my dad's gonna send me to a comfort house." (2 upvotes)
Real Talk: If you're in South its less than 1/3 chance you're gonna get stuck in the lodge (2 upvotes)
Too many chinos in one town (1 upvotes)
Dartmouth rugby just got destroyed by Navy :( (2 upvotes)
If you take a gander out towards Carson Hall, you will happen upon the mass migration of the elusive MUN students. They come out of hibernation once a year, and prey on studying college students.  (3 upvotes)
So many hs nerds (5 upvotes)
I got Slytherin suck it losers  (5 upvotes)
You MUNs look so poor in your quicksilver chinos (8 upvotes)
Anybody have any idea what all that shit last night cost? (2 upvotes)
The high schoolers have taken over Starbucks FYI (4 upvotes)
hhaha mun kids are fucking nerds (4 upvotes)
A quick note from me at week 8: GETTHEFUCKOUTOFTHELIBRARYHIGHSCHOOLERS  (18 upvotes)
Why is everyone and their mother here for MUN?? I thought I would escape from them in Starbucks but no place is safe (7 upvotes)
It's 2016, the remix to ignition is no longer hot and fresh out the kitchen (6 upvotes)
So many MUNions around (7 upvotes)
If you accidentally acquired three frackets tied together at psi u last night, we will trade you for the ones we accidentally acquired in return! Much love, 3 '16s (12 upvotes)
As someone a bio major who lived in Lodge, it wasn't that bad. Honestly, Choates is infinitely worse. Lodge has private bathrooms and the rooms are huge. It's also not as far as people think.  (14 upvotes)
A Side: School and South (12 upvotes)
//"So I guess we're in the same housing community?"  //"Sorry, I have a boyfriend." (10 upvotes)
The New Housing System building strong community (55 upvotes)
The lodge is downtown, near the HOP, Starbucks, Ramuntos, the gym is like a block away -- it's a pretty sweet location  (18 upvotes)
tbh i'm so ready for green key already (8 upvotes)
Lodge is basically Choates round 2 fuuuuuuuck (6 upvotes)
The last thing Dartmouth needs is more in-group favoritism  (9 upvotes)
Do the people in the north get direwolves as pets? Or just the spiders that come in from the BEMA? (9 upvotes)
Friendly reminder we're all being oppressed by the manocentric male-ocracy (7 upvotes)
19 fracket @ psi u it's in the hyphen Russell sage.  (0 upvotes)
I'm confused - West house is more North than North house? They're also more West, but that's to be expected  (11 upvotes)
You can switch houses if you find someone willing to. Just email housing communities  (6 upvotes)
Vapers vs. hoverboarders vs. Betas vs. people who are sick cage fight for green key 2016. Oh wait. They're all the same people. Never mind.  (8 upvotes)
new house, who dis? (8 upvotes)
I love Cornell  (-4 upvotes)
4 cherry tomatoes in a KAF salad? Is it Christmas? (5 upvotes)
What if you already hate the freshman friends you signed up to be clustered with??  (13 upvotes)
Listserv is the best way to promote some pussy (6 upvotes)
"So, how has your Greek organization contributed to the Dartmouth community this year?" "Well, we didn't try to burn down Streeter" Thanks for doing us all a solid, tri kap! (7 upvotes)
Middling athletes vs. vapers cage match for green key (8 upvotes)
Leather jacket and cowboy hat guy is a straight baller  (8 upvotes)
First one to get a faceswap with souleyman wins  (23 upvotes)
I anticipate this newfound enthusiasm for the house communities will last until...room selection. (39 upvotes)
"Is there a remedial sequence for rocks for jocks" - my middling athlete friend  (7 upvotes)
South House = SoHo;    School House = ScoHo (17 upvotes)
Real talk: I think that all these yaks against our administration are useless. We need to go back to the good old days of constantly pissing on Cornell (18 upvotes)
Honestly, it's on us to make the new housing system a good experience.  Complaining constantly isn't going to change anything.  Start thinking about how to make the most of it (8 upvotes)
How do we find out our house if we didn't go ystd? (3 upvotes)
My current pillow cost $3.99 and that's how I know I hate myself (21 upvotes)
can we have a road house (9 upvotes)
About 1100 students/class. In the future, only sophomores, juniors and seniors will live in these houses. There are six houses. 3300/6=550. Some dorm clusters only house 300. Where will 250 ppl live? (3 upvotes)
Anyone want to trade houses  (7 upvotes)
Regarless of house color, we will always bleed green!!  (31 upvotes)
Pbpl 5 people. Are we supposed to make up an organized interest for this brief? (5 upvotes)
Hi  (4 upvotes)
School House & Allen House = Bloods & Crips (10 upvotes)
Overheard: "my only extracurricular activities are Netflix and banging"  (10 upvotes)
Allen House and School House should have a party...  (17 upvotes)
Yo anyone tryna dirty rush South House? (47 upvotes)
Is East wheelock a good house to be in? (4 upvotes)
The D had that article about a band playing for brews and bands (?) tonight - anyone know where that is? (1 upvotes)
Lou's  +  in Collis 101 !  (0 upvotes)
 (4 upvotes)
Reinforcing Stereotypes 11pm TDX tonight!!! (105 upvotes)
Upstaging Stereotypes 7pm Collis Commonground tonight!!! (12 upvotes)
Instead of stealing other schools colors, couldn't we have just gone all Scottish and had custom plaid/tartan patterns made for each house? (92 upvotes)
Mother and daughter on a tour wearing matching Canada goose: do much less (60 upvotes)
But did you jizz in her face though?  (3 upvotes)
South house = Slytherin (42 upvotes)
Lou's + Sunflowers? Come find out at Collis 101  (2 upvotes)
Fuck this Princeton orange, Harvard/Cornell red, Columbia blue, Williams purple, and Yale blue. We bleed GREEN. (78 upvotes)
THE SOUTH house WILL RISE AGAIN (43 upvotes)
House rankings? (3 upvotes)
I'm here to tell the world I'm from ramona park... (3 upvotes)
Which colors are which house again? (5 upvotes)
High st vs. streeter 1 cage match to see what's more lit for green key (11 upvotes)
Kept saying I'll be fine as long as I don't get east Wheelock house. Than I get east Wheelock house. Wonderful (10 upvotes)
SCHOOL HOUSE ROCK (20 upvotes)
So since I'm in East Wheelock house now are you guys stoked on me? (10 upvotes)
Fuck off model UN hardos (26 upvotes)
You guys sound like conspiracy theorists with this "they just want to turn us against each other" bs. That's like some Hunger Games shit. Settle down, tin-foil hats. (7 upvotes)
What are North dorms like? (7 upvotes)
Why is everyone hating on founder's day? (2 upvotes)
What are the different colors? (1 upvotes)
Final papers and chill  (11 upvotes)
Unpopular Opinion: House system is actually going to be cool and will not phase out the Greek system regardless of the administrations effort.  (53 upvotes)
Is novack open  (3 upvotes)
So who's gonna step up and be the official West House drug dealer?? (54 upvotes)
Does sushiya deliver? (4 upvotes)
If I never see another snapchat face swap again I will live a happy life (29 upvotes)
Columbia's yak scene rn (17 upvotes)
If school house doesn't have an event called School House Rock I'll be mad (147 upvotes)
Soho for the boys (4 upvotes)
Freshman year, not in a "house", sophomore summer, not in a "house", junior fsp, not in a "house", Senior year in a Greek actual house. 4 terms makes family? (15 upvotes)
Soo... which one do I wear around today? (57 upvotes)
Administrators tried to put me in north park. Jokes on them I'll be living in my Greek house for the rest of my Dartmouth career (58 upvotes)
are freshmen living in the river apartments?!?  (9 upvotes)
South House will be holding a seance at midnight.  (32 upvotes)
Old friends please stop talking to me im A side now (45 upvotes)
Had a nightmare I got a blitz from a YY admin moderator scolding me for being critical of the housing system and suspending me from school. (39 upvotes)
Can't believe they used "swag" in the email to describe ugly scarves and shirts nobody wants (9 upvotes)
School House Rocks! (12 upvotes)
Yall are just jealous of East wheelock people. You know you want that four person suite (11 upvotes)
Thoughts on Prof Jen Miller/ link/ Haynes? Last term at dartmouth... Can't choose (6 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"Northwestern University"
Location(42.0531, -87.6742)
Am I the only one who goes to movies by themselves? Shit is so relaxing  (1 upvotes)
So has anyone else just come to the realization that they're absolutely fucked for this math 230 midterm? (-1 upvotes)
Well what's going on tonight? Only here till tomorrow.. Lets see how well northwestern throws down! (-2 upvotes)
I'm too anxious to ask anyone to hang out because I've been around too many people who complain when a friend texts them asking to hang out  (4 upvotes)
I think there needs to be an artisan milk shake place near campus.  (3 upvotes)
DARTYYYYYYY (-2 upvotes)
i dont know what im gonna do about anything (1 upvotes)
Go cats! (2 upvotes)
I love talking to psych majors because they can tell me all kinds of shit about myself on a whole new level. Like that I'm stressed and lonely....oh wait I knew that already (12 upvotes)
Take advantage of this weather. Week 9 is going to start of cold....just like last week.  (6 upvotes)
Shout out to the girl who logged me into the wifi  (1 upvotes)
I'm just a guy who needs to get laid.  (1 upvotes)
Wake up sheeple  (17 upvotes)
Would people be interested in a powerlifting club? (2 upvotes)
Why do I have to network with people? Why can't I just get a job because I'm fucking brilliant? (9 upvotes)
All I want are friends who I can do shit outside with. Its so nice outside and I'm trapped for a lack of things to do. (14 upvotes)
Are sororities already doing initiation? I saw a few people wearing white dresses  (6 upvotes)
Free tacos on demand postmates!!! First time users use code h3hv for free delivery too!! Gogogo (-2 upvotes)
Why do people want photo credits when usually the photo they took is shitty as hell?  (0 upvotes)
PSA--Girl Scout cookies at the arch.  (12 upvotes)
When the food place in Norris plays slow jamz  (3 upvotes)
Turn off: when you have to explain your memes to him (6 upvotes)
when he viewed your snap story but still doesn't reply text  (9 upvotes)
according to the laws of thermodynamics, waves don't die (-1 upvotes)
I feel like nu is mostly ugly girls who are rich enough that they can make themselves look kinda good but like they're still not cute (4 upvotes)
There was this girl in Theta at senior bar night last night and she was so damn fine (3 upvotes)
When you're so emotionally fucked up that you can't even cry because you're just numb now <<< (9 upvotes)
Please let me know if there are girl scouts on campus today!!!! & where (0 upvotes)
Is it weird that my boyfriend is friends with 2 of his exes?  (3 upvotes)
Why are there so many white guys in suits at plex? (14 upvotes)
WHO ARE THE SHARPLY DRESSED MALES IN ALLISON  (15 upvotes)
Remember when YY used to auto downvote any yak containing NU?  One of our herd was persistent enough to get that changed.  Props persistent NU yakker! (7 upvotes)
I saw a lady walking a cat and it made my day (11 upvotes)
I never heard of Canada Goose til I came here.  Why all the hate? I get they are expensive af but how is it different than wearing any other designer brand?  (11 upvotes)
Who are all the sharply dressed males in allison right now? (2 upvotes)
What the hell is up with all the guys in suits in allison? There are so many of them! (6 upvotes)
There some kind of stomach bug going around?  (2 upvotes)
If I were the Sarg dining hall DJ every new would be lit  (-1 upvotes)
Was high as fuck last night and wondered if soy milk was just regular milk introducing itself in Spanish.. (22 upvotes)
Michigan started spring break? What the fuck? (15 upvotes)
Being at NU has given me an intense but irrational dislike of foreign born asians (-2 upvotes)
Dan Vitale has been in a relationship for more than two years. Can confirm that my heart is broken  (11 upvotes)
Bernie only opposed the war in Vietnam because he supported the other side  (1 upvotes)
We claim to be the greatest nation in history and it looks like we're going to choose Hillary or Donald as our leader. (6 upvotes)
I don't think I've ever gotten such cold vibes from anyone as much as I do from the purple haired worker at Lisa's  (12 upvotes)
"Wow it's so nice out today!" *watches It's Always Sunny but with window open* (39 upvotes)
"Hey, I've worked hard to get where I am!" They say as they put on their CG coat and grab the third iPhone their parents bought them, then call daddy to see if he sent the $100K NU donation check yet. (5 upvotes)
Overheard: Desperation   "I'm hoping to find the love of my life at Bar Night." (20 upvotes)
I really want to be President of the United States. I know it's a long shot but I'm going to try. (26 upvotes)
When you're still having sex dreams about your highschool crush <<< (22 upvotes)
My ex and I broke up amicably because I thought long distance wouldn't work but I get jealous seeing his pictures on social media. Is it rude to delete him?  (6 upvotes)
Met an absolutely amazing girl last night. Her name was Reney. But it was just in my dream. Reney, if you're out there somewhere... (10 upvotes)
I don't wanna die too young (-1 upvotes)
Why do asians use ~ on text  (1 upvotes)
Get out to the bball game yall (7 upvotes)
Why am I always hungry ????  (0 upvotes)
The only place I'm not alone is my dreams (0 upvotes)
Everyone should go watch the "NU Spread The Word 2016" video posted by David Gordon on YouTube. It has a very good message that everyone should hear. Also, my brother is in it and I'm proud of him.  (11 upvotes)
Can someone please explain political apathy to me? Given that politics governs all parts of our daily lives, to me not caring about politics is in effect to ignore reality. Convince me otherwise. (3 upvotes)
JS it is your birthday today. Want to have a threesome?  (8 upvotes)
When you almost sleep through a breakfast with a relative from out of town and rush to the restaurant only to learn they're 15 minutes late  (23 upvotes)
My love life fell apart, I have a midterm I'm not ready for on Monday and I'm super hungover.  Yayyy college  (11 upvotes)
Chill homies. I got homework to do.  (168 upvotes)
Trying to get over someone then dreaming about them is not a good combo (18 upvotes)
HAPPY BIRTHDAY ANYA (7 upvotes)
How do I know if I'm pan or bi? (2 upvotes)
All this hate over Canada Goose, it's time to come together and have a Canada Truce (44 upvotes)
Why did I wake up this early  (11 upvotes)
How have you guys turned acquaintances into genuinely good friends (without Greek life)? I have people to hang out with and talk to but no deep connections yet like so many other people have here.. (10 upvotes)
Hahahaha. I love it. (136 upvotes)
Laying in bed anxious as shit about literally nothing #mytruenorthwestern (55 upvotes)
My roommate moans in her sleep and it's so fucking weird  (37 upvotes)
Ladies, any tips on how to avoid getting razor bumps down there? (2 upvotes)
Who dafuq up (5 upvotes)
I've always been raised with some level of wealth, but it never played a big role in my life. here, I feel like people constantly talk about money and base social status upon it  (36 upvotes)
Upvote for roller coaster tycoon 2 (66 upvotes)
Fuck beta 2k16 men of principle my ass (16 upvotes)
Anybody got bud late night in the E? (3 upvotes)
I feel like Sig Chi only gives bids to somewhat annoying people (39 upvotes)
When you get the "hey what are you up to?" text at 1 am and know someone didn't get laid tonight (90 upvotes)
Dear 4th Floor room in Allison jamming to Kanye- I love y'all  (21 upvotes)
All I need is a sloppy blowjob (23 upvotes)
I really miss having friends I didn't have to pretend to be happy with all the time  (21 upvotes)
Dirty Dancing (37 upvotes)
The tragic situation when you want to get turnt with other people but you've got no friends because no one will tolerate your obnoxious ass  (5 upvotes)
Anyone in US foreign policy--how's Krcmaric? (1 upvotes)
My parents forbid me from marrying someone ugly. They say they want to save their grandchildren from humiliation  (34 upvotes)
"There was a love song with all the women in white dresses and veils and the guys in tuxes--it was so creepy and heteronormative; I was freaked out." --my mom on my sister's high school talent show. (18 upvotes)
i want to learn how to use excel but dont know how to get training (1 upvotes)
When your SafeRide is here and you accidentally press "cancel ride" <<<< (28 upvotes)
Anybody up to give me some head? (-1 upvotes)
Good recommendations on a dentist? Evanston Dental Associates have near perfect reviews, which makes me skeptical. Has anyone been here? (0 upvotes)
When someone snaps you all the time but u never hang in real life <<<< (34 upvotes)
This is one of the shittiest weeks of my life. Happy birthday to me.  (41 upvotes)
how do i go about building good relationship with a professor for asking for recommendations letter. I want him to know my out-of-class commitments? (3 upvotes)
surprised b the big short...how can people at NU still aspire to go into finance when banks are fucking innocent people over everyday....? (2 upvotes)
My friend David is so hot. I wish we could jerk together sometime.  (4 upvotes)
Never have I ever: used snapchat to sext my girlfriend  (52 upvotes)
Why isn't there birth control for men? (11 upvotes)
I snapchat u all the time, but I wanna hang out with you in person.  (17 upvotes)
So what happened to all the gophers from last night?  (8 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"Brown University"
Location(41.8262, -71.4032)
IM A VIRGIN AND I HAVE A BONER (1 upvotes)
Full House is back, Jurassic Park was one of the highest grossing movies of last year, and Clinton's running for office. What century are we in?  (1 upvotes)
i like licking hairy ass (0 upvotes)
I enjoy it (0 upvotes)
Fillet O dick in your mouth (-1 upvotes)
Remember those McDonald's fillet O fish commercials (0 upvotes)
Need a guy to come fuck me  (0 upvotes)
Anyone know how math 520 exams are with Maloni?  (0 upvotes)
When u go to a white Mexican restaurant and the put marina sauce on the nachos  (0 upvotes)
I  tour milfs  (0 upvotes)
"What're you giving up for Lent?" "I'm giving you up for Lent." (0 upvotes)
Look at the bright side: if Trump become president, then we'd have our first blonde president! ... (-1 upvotes)
I want to take a girl out for some drinks tonight (0 upvotes)
Is it normal to have nightmares every time you sleep? (0 upvotes)
I now masturbate to procrastinate  (0 upvotes)
30 years later they'll release "Even Fuller House" (3 upvotes)
Everything and everyone is annoying today!! (0 upvotes)
can someone do something about my life  (1 upvotes)
My life's a fucked up mess and there's only one person I want and I probably only want him cuz he doesn't want me (2 upvotes)
I've never been so happy to see Kimmy in my life #FullerHouse (3 upvotes)
The word bully doesn't have the same effect it had before, need something with more of a hit like fuckboy does  (1 upvotes)
Canada Goose jackets are too much.  (1 upvotes)
In 1770, British parliament banned lipstick, saying it had the power to seduce men into marriage, which was classified as witchcraft.  (5 upvotes)
My gf has been watching a lot of Trump videos lately and I don't know what to do. (3 upvotes)
Anyone in McNulty still here and want to hang out later? (1 upvotes)
We live in a post 1D world where at some point the Jonas bros got cool and Justin beiber is winning Grammys and Trump is the gop front runner. Holy shit.  (5 upvotes)
Nick Jonas "Levels" Pandora station. Best decision I've made all week. And I'm 24, completely missed the Jonas boat. (0 upvotes)
A dependable booty call a.k.a. Unrequited love (2 upvotes)
Loved smoking pot naked on Saturday mornings with my x. Now it's just me and my coffee  (3 upvotes)
Life tip: Drink and smoke or drink and blaze; but never drink, blaze, and smoke.  (1 upvotes)
Embarrassing drunk stories? I humiliated myself last night, make me feel better (0 upvotes)
I get insulted when Pandora starts playing the new Zayn song. Like how dare you. Team 1D. (1 upvotes)
Can't tell if the guy I like is trying to play it cool or just uninterested  (2 upvotes)
I don't want to finish Fuller House today but I know I will.  At least Kimmy Schmidt's coming back soon. So tired of all this dark and serious tv. Life's serious enough.  (3 upvotes)
The fact that Peter Pan Bus came on time for once is amazing  (5 upvotes)
At college: I wanna go home. At home after a day: wow I'm so bored wish I was back at college. (13 upvotes)
Why is every girl trying to be a model ! LIKE EVERY GIRL. #monkeyseemonkeydo (4 upvotes)
I absolutely love my gf, but passionate orgasmic sex is what I crave.  (1 upvotes)
I.don't.still.love.you (-1 upvotes)
At this point I can't tell if it's him or someone else when we pass by one another. I only know what we had. (0 upvotes)
need a dependable bootycall srsly  (2 upvotes)
tfw- you look back on all the matches made from right swiping when you were thirsty af... wtf was I thinking?? (7 upvotes)
staying in for high sex > going out and partying, anyday  (8 upvotes)
When you really want to get with this guy but you never see him. And then you finally see him. On your way to another guy's dorm.  (5 upvotes)
Any ladies here ever get a Brazilian wax? I'm really scared my first time is going to be so painful. How bad is it? (2 upvotes)
Yes (0 upvotes)
I blocked my ex on Facebook two years ago. I'm desperate now to see what he's up to. Help.  (1 upvotes)
Snowden is mad quiet.  (1 upvotes)
Empty room with no action.  (0 upvotes)
First rule of college: all clothes are pajamas.  (16 upvotes)
I just found out the guy I like likes another girl. so now I'm lying on the floor because rejection sucks  (9 upvotes)
Let's cuddle (6 upvotes)
Being the high guy at a drunk party is terrible (12 upvotes)
This is my first time yakking while on the shitter. The first of many. (2 upvotes)
When you get out of the shower and spend 40 minutes sitting on your bed in your towel contemplating life (32 upvotes)
Wishes there's a way to talk to my crush with this distance between us.  (0 upvotes)
As the years slipped thru her hair, she realized herflings were becoming missedopportunities were becoming failures. Bythe time she realized her bill ofsale had been forged, the years were growinglate (2 upvotes)
And 300 miles away, he paced about his apartment, full of unpacked boxes and empty bottles, sunken with the understanding that what was once would never be again. (3 upvotes)
why do all the fuckboys hmu once i have a boyfriend ?!  (1 upvotes)
Did she want me to act uninterested? Would that have worked? I'm not good at lying or hiding my intentions. (1 upvotes)
Murhhhhhhher fuuuuuuckerrr in WHITE GIRLWASTED LIKE AMUH FUGGGG BIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIATCH (3 upvotes)
Guck did (0 upvotes)
What does everyone think about Fuller House? (3 upvotes)
Dorm parties? (-2 upvotes)
Any girls wanna smoke all my roommates went home (4 upvotes)
Just cooked and ate the mac daddy of steaks. Must of killed like five cows for that slab. (3 upvotes)
Can't tell what's wrong with me. (2 upvotes)
"I've seen your browser history and I still love you" (28 upvotes)
Fact: you never know how wine drunk you are until you stand up (18 upvotes)
Is $15 too much for 30 mg addiii? (1 upvotes)
Turkuaz at The Spot. Winning. (1 upvotes)
"What's going on?" Just responded the classic, "Good, how are you?" (5 upvotes)
Quit porn and jerking cold turkey... Feelin' like a new man! (10 upvotes)
If their phone automatically connects to the Wi-Fi, you know theyre cheating (2 upvotes)
God gave rock and roll to everyone (1 upvotes)
Ey (11 upvotes)
 (2 upvotes)
Rehearsing to make an order at chipotle  (9 upvotes)
The past two years of my life have just been shit (-1 upvotes)
Current status:  (0 upvotes)
I miss spelling tests (0 upvotes)
We're doing ok  (11 upvotes)
 (2 upvotes)
I want to question my establishment democrat politicians but I know if I step out of line with the narrative, there will be consequences. Thankfully the ballot box is private. (1 upvotes)
Tryna cop some edibles at Brown. Anybody wanna hook me up? (-2 upvotes)
Saw a picture of Mark Zuckerberg jogging and kinda wanted to give him a blow job...that's enough studying for today  (0 upvotes)
Who wants to take random pictures and send to eachother  (0 upvotes)
When a straight white male is really progressive so you test him and he's still progressive and then the sexual tension rises but he refuses to take advantage of the change in power dynamics  (9 upvotes)
Brown is known for...... (0 upvotes)
Help, I've fallen (into bed on purpose) and can't get up!  (7 upvotes)
Never have I related to something so much in my life.  (37 upvotes)
Ripping off a band aid is even harder when you're a hairy dude (7 upvotes)
I swear I saw malia Obama at the Nelson fitness center today. Anyone else seen her around? (1 upvotes)
Just want and endless supply of burritos (2 upvotes)
Ripping off a band aid is even harder when you're a dude  (1 upvotes)
We're way too old for, "my friend thinks you're hot." Bitch where. (22 upvotes)
If you're not watching Judge Judy, I highly suggest watching it right now (0 upvotes)
Wish I had a time machine  (-1 upvotes)
Harpo calling women sexist to elevate his quasi-liberal credentials at their expense  (-1 upvotes)
My labmate is so hot (0 upvotes)
All alone now :/ (2 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"Cornell University"
Location(42.2665, -76.2822)
"Cornell University" sucks
"Vanderbilt University"
Location(36.1486, -86.805)
Any idea what kind of charges the sr dealer that got arrested is facing? (0 upvotes)
Did anyone see a blue coach wallet on Thursday night in the metered parking by Cole/rand? :( (0 upvotes)
Cant spell suck without UK (5 upvotes)
Honest question to Bernie supporters: Why do y'all feel so entitled to other people's money? (0 upvotes)
Anyone who has gotten the salmon patty from Rand, what is that yellow stuff that comes with it? (0 upvotes)
I hate it when Asian girls act like they're perfect 10s just because a few ugly white guys hit on them (2 upvotes)
Wish I hadn't gone home for the weekend so I could March for the Bern  (-1 upvotes)
I don't care if the freshie 'came from money' or is privileged. I still feel terrible for him. How many of you haven't made a dumb mistake as a freshie? Granted his was really dumb, but still (-3 upvotes)
Professor: The grades were much better than I expected on the exam!  Me: FUCK (7 upvotes)
What are the people chanting on West End saying? Whats it for? (4 upvotes)
Planet money is the best podcast  (1 upvotes)
PSA: There was a drug bust in Towers last night (1 upvotes)
FREE FREE FREE. I will make everything you want free.  Make me the president.   (-1 upvotes)
I am honest enough with myself to realize I could never survive in prison  (10 upvotes)
Better strategy for minorities? The suave image or the bad boy image? (2 upvotes)
Accurate (4 upvotes)
Do you guys think that the two drug dealers will have to serve time? (-3 upvotes)
When your snap story is filled with cash and drugs, you're gonna go to jail (17 upvotes)
Last night a bouncer tried to turn me away because I don't have a beard in my ID picture (19 upvotes)
VUNet not working for anyone else? (0 upvotes)
SigConvict should be all sorts of uncomfortable next year  (19 upvotes)
I truly believe in the power of my left testicle. It shall prevail. (4 upvotes)
Damn, the "warning" posted on here yesterday was legit  (3 upvotes)
Wish my friend would stop making fun of me for being autistic.  (5 upvotes)
What frat is fucking blasting that Life of Pablo?! Kids got me thinking its Sunday morning church cuz of Ultralight Beam (3 upvotes)
I literally dont know how to wake up in the mornings  (-2 upvotes)
Gee! Theta Tau regionals sure are lit! (5 upvotes)
I almost feel like this year's Rites lineup is merely an attempt to prove that last year was not the worst Rites lineup ever. (5 upvotes)
The pretty boy sig chi who got arrested would def get destroyed in jail  (5 upvotes)
Fingernails are weird  (3 upvotes)
Just got completely desensitized to sex. Scared that it happened so suddenly. I feel no more attraction to girls. What do I do.  (2 upvotes)
I never knew girls had sex with drug dealers for drugs :0 (5 upvotes)
Why doesn't VUPD raid McGill? (16 upvotes)
When your drug dealer gets arrested  (18 upvotes)
I need to meet my wife either in person or on an obscure dating service that has a name that could pass for a bar name (3 upvotes)
For all my Northeast people Vermont or CT will legalize  (-2 upvotes)
Both dealers will cut deals and testify against bigger people for immunity or probation. (6 upvotes)
Wow last week was so hard I feel amazing now that it's over. (6 upvotes)
The stupidity of being small time drug dealers on campus for a little money while paying egregious amounts in tuition.   (4 upvotes)
If a homeschool mom is talking to herself, is she crazy, or just a parent-teacher conference?  (15 upvotes)
Yikes.  (31 upvotes)
When you completely drain your phone's battery before you even get out of bed <<< (3 upvotes)
Sig Chi presents: Frisky Felons (70 upvotes)
I woke up early to go do work but I forgot my headphones and I can't do this (18 upvotes)
Is the rites lineup normally this shitty? (11 upvotes)
Some guy wandered into our dorm room last night and when my roommate and I woke up he said "Wait, is this the right dorm??" And ran out (26 upvotes)
Ah, alcohol. My old friend...and enemy (0 upvotes)
If marathons came with a confidentiality agreement, no one would run them.  (55 upvotes)
Showers are great for washing up, relaxing, but most importantly winning imaginary arguments.  (66 upvotes)
Really needing an update from that kid who crushed his testicle (20 upvotes)
Was one of the dealers busted a Sig Chi? (7 upvotes)
Mkay children (49 upvotes)
Heard Sig Chi is selling some gnarly skunk weed (23 upvotes)
#vandydrugbust2016 (50 upvotes)
#feeltheverm (12 upvotes)
#feeltheverm Vermin Supreme (26 upvotes)
Why does no one talk about the fact that Donald trump has no political background and is wholly unqualified to be president?  (50 upvotes)
Say it's Hillary vs Trump. Who is the lesser of two evils? (-2 upvotes)
Writing the fuck out of this paper right now at 6:28 in the morning (15 upvotes)
What's better:  yaks with lots of net up votes, or yaks closer to net 0 with tons of votes either way?  I say the hover-yaks (3 upvotes)
I am in the fucking bed with you guys. Please stop making moves on my drunk friend. (7 upvotes)
Miss Stevens top tier (44 upvotes)
Someone told me to go drink some grape soda. I didn't know the black people grape soda stereotype still existed. When was the last time ANYONE drank grape soda?? (11 upvotes)
When u have a great fuck buddy at home and nobody else here can measure up :( (5 upvotes)
not sure if I need cuddles or just need to masturbate (0 upvotes)
Yaks from 2d ago just goes to show how far vandy yak has fallen, I remember days where 1h was the oldest yak you could find (16 upvotes)
When a hot girl flirted hard with you at a tailgate earlier so you feel good but every attempt with women afterwards has been a hard rejection so you're like ???  (14 upvotes)
I sleep naked. (13 upvotes)
Any girls wanna duck? That wasn't a typo. Do you want a rubber duck? (11 upvotes)
Nothing is sadder than doing homework until 2 am in your underwear alone in your room on a Friday night (30 upvotes)
I like us better when we're wasted (42 upvotes)
They make rogaine for women  (3 upvotes)
Best line I heard all night: "Hey, man, how do I get into ZBT?" (89 upvotes)
Ms. Stevens is queen  (41 upvotes)
Ms. Stevens is a Republican. This is an interesting Vandy van debate.  (37 upvotes)
Fairfax  (1 upvotes)
Sluts wanna get filled tn (1 upvotes)
Somebody deliver me some chickfila (2 upvotes)
I just discovered edible cookie dough. Shit is too good and don't have to worry about salmonella  (3 upvotes)
To the girl that sucked me off tonight... I've only ever gotten blowjobs from my last girlfriend and you blew my mind. Who knew getting head could be so hot... (15 upvotes)
When you haven't been fucked properly in weeks and you finally get pounded like a slut so goddamn satisfying (12 upvotes)
I'm very good in bed - can stay there 17 hours straight no problem (148 upvotes)
Kinda wanna cry, kinda wanna fuck. can't do both.  (22 upvotes)
When a cute guy is grabbing your tits and grinding on you and you feel his "importance". (29 upvotes)
If you sell drugs on this campus, they are coming for you. Fair warning. They have all the names.  (51 upvotes)
I want what Jen and Ben had. A lot (0 upvotes)
Girls are so pretty (109 upvotes)
I sucked dick on accident  (4 upvotes)
Question, if a girl keeps trying to sneak a look at you does that mean she's onto you? (0 upvotes)
Guys, if a woman isn't obsessed with you after you fucked her, you didn't do it right  (29 upvotes)
This guy fucks^ (32 upvotes)
Will commons have a full fruit bar tomorrow? Really just interested in the mangoes. Please help me out. Deciding Rand vs commons for breakfast. This is serious. (-1 upvotes)
"I want to STOP, and grow up again." (4 upvotes)
Got a job related to my major. To the kids that think that their major is useless, it probably is so that's why I switched.  (32 upvotes)
Pike is a flop (5 upvotes)
Got a girl that actually wants dick pics.  Tips for taking them? What do you want to see ladies? (-1 upvotes)
I'm literally terrible at making friends. It's pathetic. (-1 upvotes)
Life is one's journey through life.  (-1 upvotes)
how funny would it be if ted cruz actually was the zodiac killer like this big joke ends up exposing him (60 upvotes)
Can you really blame them? (161 upvotes)
What's going on at zbt tonight (-1 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"Washington University in St. Louis"
Location(38.648, -90.305)
I'm so salty about people who don't realize vegetarians exist (-1 upvotes)
Anyone know how/where I can print in color? (-1 upvotes)
Saw my ex doing cardio at the gym. What's the point, she didn't have a heart anyway (1 upvotes)
i feel like i finally want to start trying dating and romance things but i feel a bit late to it all, like isn't this how 14 yr olds feel (4 upvotes)
College classes are like juggling balls that are on fire and weight 20 poinss (-1 upvotes)
I want Jeb back!  (-1 upvotes)
want a slutty mixer costume? dress up as my professor then barely cover anything important (11 upvotes)
Girl Scout cookies outside kayaks!!! (4 upvotes)
Hello 911? My girlfriend's been kidnapped "stay calm sir, what's your girlfriend's name?" oh she goes to another school you wouldn't know her (39 upvotes)
Fuck man I wanna get out of here. Just for a day or two. (18 upvotes)
When you realize loving them isn't enough to make it work.  (5 upvotes)
Why did the wustl student cross the road? (5 upvotes)
That point in life when you get a match on tinder but assume it's fake. (5 upvotes)
1-877- Kars4Kids  (11 upvotes)
*someone is having a heart attack* person: is anyone here a doctor? RA: I'm an RA (62 upvotes)
Why Aepi sucks... They post things like this (29 upvotes)
I'm actually NOT looking forward to spring break since all my friends are leaving  (4 upvotes)
I met this super cute girl at an event today. And I want to befriend her but I'll probably never see her again. Plus I'm graduating soon. Why. (11 upvotes)
@ frat guys: if a girl needs medical attention in your house your rep is never more important than her health  (75 upvotes)
If one more person tells me its "adorable" that I never drank in high school heads will fucking roll. (33 upvotes)
What if someone combined the damn Daniel jokes with the "what are those" jokes? (7 upvotes)
The only kind of cat calling that is acceptable is meowing at cats to get their attention (18 upvotes)
weekly reminder  : Week 1  Week 2  Week 3  Week 4  Week 5  Week 6  Week 7  Week 8  Week 9    (74 upvotes)
One of my friends constantly complains about how all frat guys are the same and that they are all fuckboys. Every weekend she goes to frat parties or out with frat guys. I think she's doing it wrong (50 upvotes)
Imagine being a dog. You get to piss everywhere, hump everything... It's kind of like being a AEPi but you have a better understanding of the word "no" (72 upvotes)
Two weeks until Spring Break!  (13 upvotes)
i miss my dog more than any person ive ever met (8 upvotes)
What's a reason to not kill myself right now? I can't deal with the hurt anymore ... (2 upvotes)
How was Olive Bar? (-3 upvotes)
Unpopular opinion: use the Fall WILD budget to get Sal Khan to teach here  (79 upvotes)
Last night, I dreamed I was making out heavily with a complete stranger. I think I need some action... (1 upvotes)
Trying to hang on to my GPA like  (76 upvotes)
Confession: I never pay people back for ubers (30 upvotes)
Every university: "yes, our students are well-adjusted individuals who are happy, secure, and have low stress levels." Every student: if someone hit me with a bus, I'd probably thank them." (168 upvotes)
If I lost my wallet on campus, do you think someone will turn it in to WUPD or should I go ahead and cancel my credit cards...? (5 upvotes)
paying 20$ to whoever lets me into fycking Greene hall (7 upvotes)
After that snapchat update with face swap and seeing but everyone's stories, everyone's face looks super weird in normal pictures and I can't tell if they're swapped or not  (17 upvotes)
But can I just get food to go and a bottle of wine at ibbys tho? (11 upvotes)
I need a vacation...I need to go somewhere no one knows me and make really bad decisions. That or a massage (21 upvotes)
"Great Fireplace" - Peter (150 upvotes)
I wanna be that bitch with the bottle of Andr.  (2 upvotes)
Chickpea wat  (6 upvotes)
I love you. Also, can I borrow some money? (27 upvotes)
Listening to a couple guys speaking Mandarin. I could not make out any of it, until one said "sine" and the other said "cosine." I guess Lindsey Lohan was right, math is the same in every country.  (118 upvotes)
Ladies, I'm very good in bed... I can stay there for 15 hours straight (128 upvotes)
I've decided I've hit rock bottom and it's time to loose some weight. I have become an unpleasant person because of my weight gain. So, does anyone have any tips for working out?  (14 upvotes)
Going to bed at 10... did too much adulting today. (45 upvotes)
Friday night, romantic date with my laptop and some Doritos... (36 upvotes)
My life is kind of shit right now.  (38 upvotes)
To the boys that cat called on campus today: grow up.  (34 upvotes)
Is anyone else waiting for marriage to have sex? I've never been in a relationship and I don't know how to approach the subject of sex when it comes up.  (40 upvotes)
Advice for a sophomore still trying to make friends?  (14 upvotes)
Procrastination level: checking 20 facts on official 2020 group.  (17 upvotes)
House of Cards S4 will be out on March 4. FML.  There goes my midterm studying time. #gottabingewatchthemall (24 upvotes)
When you want to go party, but you don't have any invites to parties :( (28 upvotes)
So sad big little week is over. I will miss the daily batch of baked goods and candy in the common room :( (46 upvotes)
I'm just a thirsty girl looking for another girl to make out with (23 upvotes)
Fuckin A i'm soo nervous about hooking up (8 upvotes)
Trump keeps saying he's gonna build a wall. But if he won why would anyone want to immigrate here? They wouldn't.. Surprise! It's not to keep people out.. (80 upvotes)
Anybody else with Verizon having trouble getting texts from girls (120 upvotes)
Yeah I text my bb all the time.....bb.wustl.edu (201 upvotes)
My financial advisor says that I am worth more dead than alive.  After the day that I had, I would tend to agree (4 upvotes)
I'm all in the spirit of green cup and what it's trying to promote, but please don't be a dick about it. People are injured. They know it's green cup. Don't ostracize people for using the elevator... (44 upvotes)
The mean exam score was a 67.4. I got a 67.5. I guess you can say I'm above average (131 upvotes)
Professor McGonagall: "Sorry Harry but I can't let you go to Hogsmeade because those abusive assholes that I knowingly left you with when you were a baby wouldn't sign your permission slip. Too bad" (158 upvotes)
Sometimes, I'm so afraid I'm in the wrong bathroom, I peep through the stall and check for urinals. Then I worry that I'm actually a girl so I have to double check that I have a penis. (34 upvotes)
The human body is amazing. To counteract my receding hairline on my head, it gave me an extending shaft hairline on my cock. (9 upvotes)
To the people going to all the other res halls and raising the thermostat in the common rooms to 90 degrees, FUCK YOU (56 upvotes)
Proof2: By the second Law of Thermodynamics entropy never decreases in a closed system, thus Green Cup is pointless, because all the energy is gonna be dissipated eventually. (23 upvotes)
Proof: By the first Law of Thermodynamics, energy is always conserved in a closed system, thus Green Cup is pointless (18 upvotes)
My feelings going into this weekend (33 upvotes)
Trump talks about slashing common core but I wonder how many of the people at his rallies know what that is  (16 upvotes)
.....same (63 upvotes)
Classic Florida  (203 upvotes)
Why don't we get Killer Mike to come to wash u? (2 upvotes)
This Tuesday we find out if Trump is coming to WashU or not.  (27 upvotes)
Trump's the color of an orange and Christie's the shape of an orange, so I guess this makes sense (40 upvotes)
Congratulations to all new RAs!!! Welcome to the ResLife fam (165 upvotes)
Why is cupples II a dead zone (5 upvotes)
What do you call Rubio in business casual clothes? Marco Polo (116 upvotes)
Tour group leaders be like: "welcome to lopata gallery, where you can see engineering students dutifully copying solutions from chegg"  (216 upvotes)
The number of face swap snap stories right now oh my lord.... (21 upvotes)
At the point where I'm not even drinking coffee to stay awake, I'm drinking coffee to avoid the massive withdrawal headache I'll get if I stop (32 upvotes)
Vikaram straight up creating a new religion centered around Maxwell's equations in physics today (26 upvotes)
My life in one picture  (132 upvotes)
"Meth and math sound the same but one is a life ruiner and the other is meth" (125 upvotes)
Such unfair bullshit that in quidditch Harry Potter gets a fucking ballistic missile for a broom while playing the only position that matters cuz of his prisoner godfather he didn't even know he had. (140 upvotes)
Ran out of clean underwear so now I'm wearing swimsuit bottoms... this is a new low (113 upvotes)
imagine a snapchat filter that says the name of the song you're currently listening to (106 upvotes)
By God, Isaac Newton, how did you conceive of such a brilliant concept?  *Hiding gravity bong behind back* Ummm. An apple fell. (91 upvotes)
that feeling of sinking dread when you realized you left your headphones in your last class (95 upvotes)
Damnnn Shapiro, back at it again with the cute proofs.  (25 upvotes)
What's with the circ that's been in the village for the past couple days? (13 upvotes)
When your accounting test comes out and you literally failed (-2 upvotes)
Reply yak: What would hurt more: getting slapped with the cheese side of a slice of pizza, or the crust side?  (9 upvotes)
The hardest part about being a vegan is waking up at 5 am every day to milk the almonds. (428 upvotes)
When the prof says "now this one may be a little bit tricky" (29 upvotes)
Beheshti should never use the mic again.  (2 upvotes)
I'd like to study via osmosis, where sleeping with my notes under my pillow transfers all of the knowledge.  (28 upvotes)
Best LCD courses? (2 upvotes)
Tokyo Sexwhale is trending on twitter.  I'm gonna skip my first class, go back to bed, wake up, and try this day again. (10 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"Rice University"
Location(29.7169, -95.4028)
"Rice University" sucks
"University of Notre Dame"
Location(41.703, -86.239)
"University of Notre Dame" sucks
"UC Berkeley"
Location(37.87, -122.259)
I think I just broke up with my boyfriend? And I don't know whether I'm happy or about to cry? (0 upvotes)
Missing the Beardbert lizard pics/yaks tbh  where is he? (1 upvotes)
People who live in Co-ops are like vegans. They gotta tell everyone they see. (1 upvotes)
Pro tip: guys with confidence are super sexy. Even if you're not attractive at all, if you come up to me and ask me out, it would only increase your chances of me saying yes, bc I'd be impressed  (3 upvotes)
My idea of living the dream: having both orange juice and coffee with my breakfast  (6 upvotes)
I've been enjoying being single and the freedom to have sex that comes with it, but I have so much pent up love to offer the next girl I feel a serious connection with. (1 upvotes)
Writing a privacy policy is hard!  (-4 upvotes)
I recently started talking to this guy... We have a lot in common/genuinely like eachother but he used to hookup w a friend a yr ago. She's in the east coast now. Should I ask her if she's ok w it? (-3 upvotes)
It's 65 degrees and my roommate is wearing a sweater and a coat (6 upvotes)
Tfw you feel terrible about your past but just wish everyone would forget it so you can move on with your future (9 upvotes)
I feel like 20% of the guys I know at Berkeley have a boyfriend or have done sexual things with another guy  (0 upvotes)
straight girl going to the oscar wilde party tonight hoping there will be straight boys to take home with me :-)  (2 upvotes)
On Uc Berkley campus: why are people up this early? (6 upvotes)
I don't know why I call my parents because they just criticize me every time and lower my self esteem  (3 upvotes)
My friends want to do shrooms with them what do I do and what can I  expect from a trip? (0 upvotes)
My friends want to do shrooms with them what do I do and what can I  expect from a trip? (-1 upvotes)
My life is basically a constant struggle between wanting food and being too lazy to get up... (10 upvotes)
I saw a couple jogging together today and it inspired me to stay on the Internet  (25 upvotes)
Ibuprofen is my best friend when I'm on my period.  (5 upvotes)
My homework isn't done but I sure am (33 upvotes)
Procrastination level: Frank Ocean (16 upvotes)
I'm at that point of the semester where I'm drowning in the work I should have done weeks ago :( (14 upvotes)
If my bio lab partner says to me: "I hope we can be partners again! You're so cute! "Can we exchange your #s to do prelabs?" That means I have a shot with her right? She's beautiful  (18 upvotes)
When your friends take your phone and spam your kik across yikyak  (5 upvotes)
When you come to school so high they ask you if you are sick . Oops (3 upvotes)
My hair just liked a yak. Like "ooo this is interesting." I'm basically Medusa. (3 upvotes)
What's bridge? (-1 upvotes)
Anyone going to SF to see Kizumonogatari? (-2 upvotes)
Hey! Friendly reminder to use gender neutral language when referring to animals as they cannot communicate their preferred pronouns (*) (8 upvotes)
That paint party last night was fun as fuck (9 upvotes)
Make Sushi Great Again (99 upvotes)
I was constipated for like an hour this morning. Then I imagined being constipated for 9 months. I am now pro-choice (44 upvotes)
What do classy girls call their vaginas? Calling them pussies seems wrong, but everything else sounds evasive. (3 upvotes)
I got high AF at 7 last night. That's all I remember now that I woke up (17 upvotes)
Does anyone have any follow ups on what happened at unit 2 yesterday? (3 upvotes)
Everyone fantasizing about their GSIs here has allowed me to realize the whole concept of "notice me senpaii." Thanks, Bears? (60 upvotes)
My friend started seeing this girl and since then she's been drinking and taking (hard) drugs all the time and put on a lot of weight and had a car accident but she also seems like she's happier  (9 upvotes)
Uber driver's car reeks of weed (5 upvotes)
Anyone else experienced derealization/depersonalization? Shit is literal hell (18 upvotes)
The only time i ever enjoy anything is when im drunk. damnit (7 upvotes)
Anyone else feeling completely sleep deprived lately? (36 upvotes)
Should I get red, blue, or yellow version? (5 upvotes)
Sketched out about stds from the bj  I got last night  (0 upvotes)
I wish I had more opportunities to shout "Culeeeeero! Culeeeeero!" at things I don't like. (0 upvotes)
I use a straight edge razor to shave. Tried manscaping with it. Big, big mistake. (19 upvotes)
Fuck went out last night but also start my job at Starbucks today. So stressed haven't memorized the drinks yet  (4 upvotes)
Fuck. My head is pounding from lack of sleep but insomnia decided to hit me. Thanks body.  (24 upvotes)
White van circling college Bancroft area. Be careful  (44 upvotes)
Why am I still awake? (3 upvotes)
All these laxatives and you still ain't shit (33 upvotes)
Shattuck is so bizarre and slightly eerie this time of night.  (30 upvotes)
tybg for washable paint  (2 upvotes)
How do I ask my friend if he wants to fuck? Maybe the "chemistry" is just in my head  (3 upvotes)
I wanna hook up with him again :(  (8 upvotes)
LF someone to play wow with (2 upvotes)
Anyone want to exchange some noodles? (3 upvotes)
Went to a party and my crush was there drunk off his ass. Too sober to watch him flirt with other girls lmao (3 upvotes)
I JUST DID THW WORST THING POSSIBLE FUCK FUCK FUCK there go my chances with a cute boy :')))))))) brb while I die of embarrassment  (7 upvotes)
My friends tell me my dating issues are in my head and my standards are too low. But I think they're too high that's why I'm having no success (5 upvotes)
So I didn't end up getting tacos  (5 upvotes)
I like a guy so much more than he likes me. I hate this feeling (37 upvotes)
I'm so disappointed in the stereotype that guys are more averse to commitment than girls. For me, girls always seem to evaporate when I try to introduce some commitment or exclusivity... (38 upvotes)
Are there any restaraunts open past 2? (1 upvotes)
High is a literary entity that succinctly describes my current state of mind (2 upvotes)
I quit using this app a few months ago and it doesn't seem like the thirst changed (13 upvotes)
Roommate's food smells like hot garbage (14 upvotes)
im so high #berkeley (-4 upvotes)
Who's horny (-1 upvotes)
I don't know you yet, but I swear that I'll give you every ounce of love I've been holding on to. (30 upvotes)
Just made this huge pizza and I'm gonna eat all on my own  Let's fatten up a little  (12 upvotes)
Freshmen who just wants to make another guy cum (-3 upvotes)
I just wanna be happy again (7 upvotes)
So high I'm making jello and ribs (8 upvotes)
Are brojobs for real lol? (1 upvotes)
How do I broadcast the gay when I meet cute queer ladies (5 upvotes)
Do girls like guy's butts? (3 upvotes)
Why is the estimated cost 25$? (0 upvotes)
I want cuddles and kisses rn  (28 upvotes)
Why does financial aid go to the junk filters on Berkeley's own email service? Seems shady to me.  (28 upvotes)
So I handcuffed my floor mate with plastic handcuffs and now he looks even more attractive. What do I dooooo.. (5 upvotes)
Just realized that I don't know why I care so much about wearing a bra. Freaking A-cups are big on me, so it's not like I'm supporting anything (27 upvotes)
ok so there's this third year student I really would like to do the sexy things with. a) would he be interested in a freshman and b) how do I ~*put the moves*~ on him (3 upvotes)
Woahhhh anyone hear that car accident? On telegraph+Channing  (8 upvotes)
The fucking Yik yak hotline  (5 upvotes)
Where's a place that I can be alone so I can cry without worrying about people seeing me (6 upvotes)
Food trucks will be relocating to the La Palm Democratic Socialist Humanistic Cooperative. Now no need to boycott anyone; La Palm supreme dictator has granted new food permits to both vendors! (7 upvotes)
Jesus motherfucker bafoons? (0 upvotes)
I just want to give girls head. I'm a guy. Don't want bj or sex (unless girl wants it too) but for real tho. My tongue is getting impatient (1 upvotes)
Just blew out my knees trying to twerk to Work (18 upvotes)
Davis goblins! (-1 upvotes)
1:02 AM, bong rips, it's a good start to my Saturday  (-2 upvotes)
Asked a girl from my class out and she said yes. I gave her MY number but she never texted me. Back in class she acted like nothing happened and we were friendly but now she just ignores me. WTF (29 upvotes)
To the motherfucker with the goddamn barking dog on Warring. Please kindly go fuck urself. Why are u bringing a new dog into apartment buildings. (4 upvotes)
Damn Davis! (2 upvotes)
Where do gay guys find other cute gay guys? (0 upvotes)
When you invite a girl over and she spends more time with your friend. Damn I'm depressed and lonely. (76 upvotes)
What's with the term Davis. Just because you feel smarter doesn't mean you are, I've met a lot of UCB students that look good on paper and are complete idiots at making real life decisions! (4 upvotes)
Almost cut my finger off. Thank God I didn't. (13 upvotes)
Listening to William Singe covers. His voice is heaven  Actually helped me get through my day today! Applaud  Keep on rocking!  (3 upvotes)
I wish I had a girl to send sexy pics to  (7 upvotes)
God damn crackers! (4 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"Emory University"
Location(33.7911, -84.3233)
"Emory University" sucks
"Georgetown University"
Location(38.9072, -77.0728)
I had a cousin pass away when I was young, like maybe five or six and I have zero memory of her... Is that normal? (0 upvotes)
something about right-swiping someone on tinder with my dog's name makes me question my morals (1 upvotes)
Any good parties tonight?  (2 upvotes)
I want to exclusively eat Nutella for the rest of my life.  (1 upvotes)
I always feel an incredible amount of shame after I masturbate... (3 upvotes)
Any good parties tonight?  (-1 upvotes)
I'm such a fat fuck.  (7 upvotes)
When you wanna turn up but you're also trying to get fit... #weknowehatipickedthough (2 upvotes)
If your Instagram name or bio looks like this  , I'm not even letting you follow me  (7 upvotes)
I just ate a 7-11 hotdog, and I genuinely feel a little bit less human  (13 upvotes)
Jet black hair color is so pretty. (5 upvotes)
I may be stressed about classes, but at least I'm not RNC chairman stressed (9 upvotes)
Vita Saxa kids scare me (3 upvotes)
I love French guys   (1 upvotes)
When you see someone walking around in a Class of 2010 high school hoodie.  (8 upvotes)
My legs are so fuzzy rn (6 upvotes)
I could literally sleep the entire day away..... But midterms (6 upvotes)
Aesthetic: photo shoot by the Jesuit graveyard  (3 upvotes)
When you care too much for people and they just treat you like shit... (0 upvotes)
Yes or no? (7 upvotes)
Does being born on February 29th make you a loser? (2 upvotes)
Some people need to learn that not every minuscule detail is necessary when telling a story  (5 upvotes)
Do i study for midterms or hang out with this chick (1 upvotes)
JR Smith @ Nike Store on M st  (4 upvotes)
Old meme, but it's true: If Britney can get through 2007, you can get through these midterms.  (13 upvotes)
A big get-together of singles fed up with hookup culture and looking for something meaningful is probably something that needs to happen around here. (15 upvotes)
Overheard by visitors at Leo's "I'd never go to Georgetown- too many hills" Preach sister, preach. (8 upvotes)
Now that being a savage is a good thing, do you think Native Americans want it back? (3 upvotes)
During my sex dream I stopped the guy since he didn't have a condom on. Good to know I'm committed to safe sex. (47 upvotes)
Ughhh I just woke up. I wish I could be one of those people who get up at 9, but I just go to sleep at 5am every night :/ (6 upvotes)
Reverse racism isn't real  (9 upvotes)
Do people born on February 29th just not have Facebook birthday notifications on non-leap years?  (19 upvotes)
Do people born on February 29th just not have Facebook birthday notifications on non-leap years? (6 upvotes)
When he wants to take you out to drive around DC when you pay $2000 in rent so that you can walk the city and not sit in traffic (3 upvotes)
I did something really creepy today. I feel bad now.  (0 upvotes)
When he asks what your biggest fear is and you say heights while he says being alone. (1 upvotes)
Leonardo DiCaprio is willing to eat a raw bison liver and crawl inside a horse carcass to win an Oscar. I think you can skip one night of partying to get a better grade on those midterms. (22 upvotes)
What happened with one of the fraternity presidents last night????? (1 upvotes)
Sensing a theme, you two might not be compatible when... (2 upvotes)
When you order whiskey and he orders a beer (0 upvotes)
Want a friend  (8 upvotes)
I'm young and I've never been thin but what's the point of trying if when I hit 30 my body decides to get fat anyway (again) (7 upvotes)
12 days everyone  (2 upvotes)
My mom's visiting me today and I'm honestly so excited (13 upvotes)
Hello from The University of Utah. Where do I find food on campus? (9 upvotes)
When you're a lady and you finish your drink far before before your date finishes his... (7 upvotes)
Always feel like I'm wasting a day when I just lay in bed. GET UP (3 upvotes)
When the spin studio front desk lady asks if it's your first time here every time you go (13 upvotes)
Dang this yak location is lit  (2 upvotes)
Fuck I'm in the depression cycle again (17 upvotes)
Math is either too obvious or makes zero sense (34 upvotes)
Splash-back pisses me off so much  (1 upvotes)
When bae starts getting creative with his booty calls (49 upvotes)
HALT THE HAVOC (2 upvotes)
Opinions on one night stands? (-2 upvotes)
I'm going to stop wearing bras with oversized shirts, dresses, and sweaters. My babies need to breath more than they already do. (17 upvotes)
Why does sneezing almost always feel as good as an orgasm?  (5 upvotes)
"If you ask a girl out on Feb 29th, you save 75% on anniversary expenses in the long run." (86 upvotes)
Voting for Trump is like shitting after a shower, it's just never a good idea (17 upvotes)
When the sex is way better than you imagined  (16 upvotes)
Going to the hair salon and getting a mani pedi after blacking out last night #Ideserveit  (6 upvotes)
I thought I would have this novella finished in just a couple hours but it's so damn boring that I keep getting distracted. But on the bright side I've also cum three times, so there's that, I guess. (7 upvotes)
How do I ask this girl I have a crush on out (6 upvotes)
Professor: 1 out of every 5 of you will develop an anxiety disorder. Me*looking at my row*: I gotchu fam  (98 upvotes)
When you realize you have enough credits to graduate a semester early and get the hell out of here (13 upvotes)
Real talk: If I'm sick (but no longer contagious) and I can't go out tonight, is it wrong that I'm kinda mad at my boyfriend for choosing to go out instead of staying in with me? (5 upvotes)
Mistakes were made last night. I'm not sure which parts they were, but some of it was definitely mistakes. (20 upvotes)
Rah Virginia Mil  (1 upvotes)
Making A Murderer drinking game: drink anytime anyone says "I believe so," "I believe that's what I said," or "That's what I believe" (10 upvotes)
When you realize that some of the freshman at your school were born in 1998 and you feel old.  (6 upvotes)
Is your penis really that small that you need to compensate by vandalizing dorm hallways while you're drunk?  (59 upvotes)
Do you ever just get up bc you have to pee so bad but at the same time you are thirsty af? why's my body so freakin conflicted  (20 upvotes)
Is it weird to be into someone just platonically? (6 upvotes)
When your boobs are too big for normal bras  (9 upvotes)
Why is there so much drama?? Why can't everyone just be with who they want to be with??? (14 upvotes)
I want a DC bf like ilana and abbie in broad city  (10 upvotes)
There needs to be an app like tinder but instead it's just for meeting new people and make friends  (25 upvotes)
yall.....hamilton is the best musical of all time (13 upvotes)
People think time slows down when they're high because they're waiting for the microwave (18 upvotes)
Yeah so I'm probably gonna beat the shit out of my fraternity's president tomorrow. I look forward to reviewing the scars your teeth leave on my hand. Rapist piece of shit  (33 upvotes)
Watching the west wing drunk is my shit  (8 upvotes)
Sleeping on a sofa bed at an iffy hotel and itchy all over  SOS (-4 upvotes)
My ex is such a man whore (1 upvotes)
"I don't want to talk about the Holocaust I just want to talk about queefing" (3 upvotes)
Haven't shaved in weeks and tbh it makes me feel MORE feminine because my hair is so fine. Like, look at me, even my leg hair is dainty af. (5 upvotes)
I think I have reached the point where I have absolutely nothing left to watch on Netflix  (46 upvotes)
When you're roommate's about to sexile you so you roll through real fast to grab your computer because yo ass ain't about to be stuck in the common room without Netflix (156 upvotes)
That song that goes "lucky I'm in love with my best friend" is a dirty fucking lie.  (44 upvotes)
Tfw someone gives you their opinion even when you didn't want it and you're just like...I didn't ask for this bullshit. (2 upvotes)
When Touch ID won't recognize your fingerprint so you have to unlock your phone like a peasant  (264 upvotes)
Not eatin' good, just pregnant (9 upvotes)
is the Georgetown internet refusing to connect for anyone else? (2 upvotes)
When you drunkenly ask out your crush and they say yes (199 upvotes)
So apparently my friends witnessed the suicide by subway that happened tonight (1 upvotes)
I really wish hillary would just do the unconventional thing and try an convince bernie to be her running mate. Kinda afraid of the dem voter turnout seeing as so many younger dems resent hillary. (34 upvotes)
I want a mommy (4 upvotes)
ISFLC 2016! (7 upvotes)
The only way to save the Republican Party is to resurrect Reagan...unfortunately most   Republicans don't believe in science.  (72 upvotes)
Highlights of this week include crying in chemistry class and crying in the middle of the student center (59 upvotes)
Whenever life gets you down, keeps you wearing a frown, and the gravy train has left you behind... (4 upvotes)
When you have so much in common with someone... (15 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"Carnegie Mellon University"
Location(40.400921, -80.103623)
"Carnegie Mellon University" sucks
"UC Los Angeles"
Location(34.0722, -118.4441)
Had a nightmare I ran out of swipes for the quarter with like 4 weeks left it was so stressful (0 upvotes)
Name your Greek house :) wanna see what Greek life is on yak! (2 upvotes)
When you're lurking through someone's profile and accidentally like their picture  (2 upvotes)
Why did the bicycle fall over? Because it was two tired (4 upvotes)
Who's playing some Red, Blue, or Yellow? (-1 upvotes)
Is Rende open (0 upvotes)
My roommate set her alarm for 8 this morning and is still snoozing it at 12 smh (4 upvotes)
Never been hungover in my life until this morning. FUCK I HATE IT! (1 upvotes)
Bj squad bat signal (2 upvotes)
I'm going force myself to accept that I'm not ready to lose my virginity.  It's easier to do that than to beat myself up about it. (4 upvotes)
I always get horny or have to poop at the worst times. (4 upvotes)
I have an extra ticket for Jhoomti Shaam tonight if anyone wants to purchase...  (-3 upvotes)
Honestly, how could anyone not like sucking dick? They're magnificent and tasty. (4 upvotes)
Quickest way into my pants: Watch a romcom with me. (4 upvotes)
I'm a guy who likes dicks in his mouth.  (1 upvotes)
I dreamed that my ta has posted my grade in my ucla. but I didn't get to see what that grade was.  (4 upvotes)
Shrunk my dress in the fucking dryer and now it's so short my ass is hanging out . Hopefully can get a new one ugh. (0 upvotes)
When you look good on snap chat so your ex starts sending you private messages  (4 upvotes)
Why is six afraid of seven? Cause seven eight nine (12 upvotes)
I hate having to be the one to reach out to people all the time.  (9 upvotes)
My life  (17 upvotes)
Just for the record, I was going to wear my boob shirt last night, but when you were running 20 minutes late, I figured it was just the universe giving me time to change back into my turtleneck.  (10 upvotes)
This conclave blows  (4 upvotes)
Anyone else not going to the #oscars ?  (4 upvotes)
Drinking decaf is basically the same as intentionally smoking oregano instead of weed. (11 upvotes)
An entire generation is being raised without the pivotal question: paper or plastic?  (7 upvotes)
Do you ever get uber excited for something only for it to go horribly wrong and then just wonder what the fuck you're doing with your life?  (3 upvotes)
How to bake a cake. 1: grab a bowl. 2. Trip over your cat while carrying said bowl. 3. Cry. 4. Go to Ralph's and buy a cake. (20 upvotes)
Boredom level: eating expired food from the fridge  (5 upvotes)
I sexually identify as a Big Blue Bus though. (10 upvotes)
Don't you just luv it when your roommate and you are sleeping and then your other roommate comes in and starts making noise. Then goes in and out in and out of the room like wtf. (7 upvotes)
I emotionally identify as a Big Blue Bus. (5 upvotes)
No, I'm not with this shit. I'm fucking tired of your shit and that of every single guy I've talked to over the last 6 months. (2 upvotes)
I love Taylor Swift music!  (2 upvotes)
Your one word messages aren't worthy of a response. (6 upvotes)
Okay if you are a guy and you like Star Wars and dicks up your ass then your gay  (7 upvotes)
@ the OP who was insulting moths: Do these moths look like they can't afford to print in colour??  (13 upvotes)
You know you go to UCLA when you go to UCLA. (51 upvotes)
 Friend: You good bro?   *casually sits and silently panics cause 1 week till finals*    Me: oh, yeah! I'm good dawg!  (8 upvotes)
Anyone else get fucked up by the sushi bowl last night? (-2 upvotes)
Anyone know someone who can sell me weed? (2 upvotes)
*suddenly realizes I still need to fill out the fafsa* (16 upvotes)
Oh I also realized my fuck up on the midterm yesterday in a dream today  (6 upvotes)
Wtf why is my roommate setting alarms on the weekend super early to not even wake up to them?????? IDGI stop waking me up! (8 upvotes)
I'm a Danny DeVito fan.  (4 upvotes)
Students at UCLA are complaining that their studies are getting in the way of their activism. In other news, drinking beer and playing frisbee count as activism. (26 upvotes)
NASA this week confirmed they had recieved a record-breakng number of astronaut applications, as many are willing to go to drastic lengths to avoid the possibilty of a Trump presidency. (65 upvotes)
What did the French copyright lawyer say to his wife?  Je.  (37 upvotes)
Shoutout to the elderly, they wouldn't be able to hear otherwise... (45 upvotes)
Moths are just butterflies that can't afford to print in color (25 upvotes)
How do you progress on squats? Been stuck at the same weight for like 2 weeks and even struggled pretty hard with it today. (3 upvotes)
I always get woken up by my roommate in mornings...how do I stop this (-4 upvotes)
Making a murderer.... Guilty or not guilty (1 upvotes)
When your roommate sets an alarm at 9 am on a Saturday morning that wakes you up, and he continues sleeping..... Smhhhhh (22 upvotes)
Two weeks ago my dog couldn't walk on her own because she had stroke-like symptoms but now she's walking and running on her own. I wish I could be home  (39 upvotes)
Is wearing different sport brands weird? For example wearing a Nike shirt, Adidas, and an underarmor  duffle bag  (-2 upvotes)
Had a dream I was friends with my crush and we bonded really well and I don't think I've ever come out from a dream this depressed  (18 upvotes)
I wish Mecha wasn't so into "Aztec Culture" for all you know your descendants could be from another tribe but there you are claiming you follow the gods.. lol (9 upvotes)
Some kid ate shit right in front of us and it was the most fucked up thing but that shit was FUCKING HILARIOUS #didItakebirthcontroltoday (3 upvotes)
what's all the hubbub in the court of sciences ?? (2 upvotes)
To the person that hung the sign over the De Neve computer lab: does it say "text me, blond- guy" or "text me, blond guy"??? (6 upvotes)
I think I'm hungover from too much orange juice and no sleep. #rage (12 upvotes)
I want the world to know that these creatures exist (1 upvotes)
When they stop replying after seeing your face pic  (7 upvotes)
I just had the best night of my life (1 upvotes)
Highkey wanna suck his dick already.  (6 upvotes)
PSA: There is a giant ass quidditch tournament on the IM Field today. UCLA plays at 10am and 12:20pm, come support your fellow Bruins!! (16 upvotes)
PSA: Pokemon Red, Blue and Yellow 20th anniversary edition released today  (3 upvotes)
I go to bed each night hoping to god Young Metro trusts me.  (1 upvotes)
Yes, I am bitter, and jaded, and depressed, but you'll never know, because I'm a lot better of a liar and actor than you'll ever understand (30 upvotes)
Do the dining halls have pancakes  (7 upvotes)
Why crush asked why I liked him? Does he not like me? (5 upvotes)
Anyone up for some shots right now? (2 upvotes)
{fabulous yak} (6 upvotes)
No I'm not bitter or jaded or depressed I promise.  (2 upvotes)
Chris the pledge from theta xi hit me up! I'm still waiting for you! Message me!  (0 upvotes)
What am I in the mood for?  (2 upvotes)
How am I just realizing how hot Justin Timberlake is? (5 upvotes)
What do I do if my roommates exiled me for the first time this quarter and now they are both asleep butt ass naked?  (2 upvotes)
(Thirsty yak) (7 upvotes)
I want a girl to hold me right now... (6 upvotes)
How did you meet your boyfriend or girlfriend? (8 upvotes)
Better to have loved and lost? Or never to have loved at all? (8 upvotes)
Drunk confession this guy and me are probably gonna drop the frat were in so we can finally start dating, we've been crushing on each other for almost a year and we hooked up for the first tonight  (71 upvotes)
Any cute girls still up?  (2 upvotes)
If we could all just be straight up with people about what we want or how we feel instead of playing games, that'd be great.  (18 upvotes)
What is something terrible you did when you were younger and really regret? (3 upvotes)
He's never said anything at all sexual or flirty to me, and I appreciate how proper he is. But he is cute, and I'm starting to worry that he doesn't find me attractive and/or he's a virgin.  (3 upvotes)
Any girls on the hill still up and want to hook up? (1 upvotes)
My fuck buddy of a year and a half told me tonight  he's going to start dating someone soon. I don't even know how to feel tbh (8 upvotes)
Any gay guy want head? (0 upvotes)
And then I found the man who made me realize that nothing was wrong with me all along; I just hadn't found the right person to appreciate me yet. Keep your heads up, everyone. (27 upvotes)
I wish I had friends here. Drinking alone isn't as fun as drinking with friends (3 upvotes)
Just stop being a douche and tell me that you don't like me rather than just not responding or ghosting me. At least then I'd have a sense of closure.  (14 upvotes)
What is too high of a "number" for a girl you would consider dating? By number I mean number of sexual partners of course  (-1 upvotes)
Siiiiiiiiigh (43 upvotes)
It's the work of the malevolent ghost of the guy who was lost and never found back from Dykstra  (3 upvotes)
I feel bad that I left the guy I was dancing with... He was so cute, and guys never think my hair looks nice. Hope his night went well :/ (8 upvotes)
Got nudes from a super hot chick off Tinder the first day of using it. Set my expectations way too high. (5 upvotes)
i have been cursed to never fully sleep through the night (9 upvotes)
Seriously? Dykstra was renovated completely in 2012. Before that it was known as "Dirty Dykstra". Boohoo broken elevator. You have no idea how bad it used to be. (0 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"University of Southern California"
Location(34.0205, -118.2856)
You know what's annoying? When people just blabber their fat mouths without knowing what their talking about. How about you read up on your facts  (0 upvotes)
When white girls are afraid to say "negro" in Spanish class next to a black person... Lol (0 upvotes)
When your hardcore gay porn goes off in    public when you open your computer (3 upvotes)
Does anybody take that lying, propaganda film "The Hunting Ground" seriously? Unfortunately, TOO many of you do. Even though numerous academics, and law schools disprove it, you still believe it. Sad. (1 upvotes)
I like messing with my girl by giving her that surprise Dutch oven mid cuddle session hahaha  (1 upvotes)
Waiting for someone to text you is so annoying (2 upvotes)
Can we stop pretending the friendzone is for guys only? As a guy, I friendzone girls all the time (6 upvotes)
Does your dad work for CR&R cause goddamn you are a piece of trash (1 upvotes)
Speed dating tonight in Mudd!! (3 upvotes)
Just want to snap with a sexy girl... (-1 upvotes)
ARE YOU READY FOR THIS? (2 upvotes)
My ability to detect an eyelash on my glasses lens is astounding (1 upvotes)
I WILL EAT YOUR BABIES BITCH (2 upvotes)
Why you always lyin' (-1 upvotes)
I'm a female and I can't stand feminists.  (-1 upvotes)
Need someone to drive me to the sex shop (3 upvotes)
It's kinda shitty that taking a girl out on a real date and not just hooking up is considered old fashion (15 upvotes)
If you you're not on the same level with someone because you have feelings for someone else, please specify that. Otherwise, they'll take it personally.  (0 upvotes)
12:13 PM & still haven't gotten out of bed #noshame  (6 upvotes)
Your life is a mistake (-1 upvotes)
Why aren't cat parks a thing? (3 upvotes)
Why aren't girls as horny as guys (-2 upvotes)
Don't you just love it when your poop scratches that itch inside your buthole (2 upvotes)
Misogynistic, patriarchal, anti-feminists on Yik Yak keep downvoting my posts and victim blaming me. This is why I need feminism. They shouldn't be able to do that  (3 upvotes)
omg the guy biking next to me at the gym is so cute what do I do (0 upvotes)
All I can say is that you're stupid.  (1 upvotes)
I Wanna work out in the morning before class... but I have 8 ams EVERY DAY how do I do it (1 upvotes)
When your girl always gets mad at you for comparing her and the relationship to other people, then she decides to cut out sex because other guys and relationships do fine without it so why can't I  (1 upvotes)
I should clean up my room  (2 upvotes)
I swear it's difficult being an ugly guy who likes hookups. The only girls that consider doing me are drunk ones and I don't mess with that  (8 upvotes)
Little did guys know that girls secretly had power over them... (6 upvotes)
"What do you look for in a girl?" "My dick." (9 upvotes)
Went out of my way to take this girl out on to a nice dinner and we had a great time and she told me she had a great time. And two weeks later when we try to go out again she doesn't answer... F her (6 upvotes)
Fuck Pi Phi. They are super hot but super fucking bitchy (3 upvotes)
Stop referring to me as African-American, I'm half Jamaican. Last time I checked I'm 0% African... (9 upvotes)
Where's the best place to buy a bagel  (4 upvotes)
Gotta feel at least a little happy when the girl begging for a hookup turns you down when you meet in person but then can't find anyone else the whole night. Bitch you had your chance  (-2 upvotes)
Savage  (1 upvotes)
Kinda new around here, anyone know where there are animal shelters? Looking to adopt a kitten. (0 upvotes)
I'm moving to this part of town. I guess couple miles is different herd. What's up? (0 upvotes)
Costume shops around here? (1 upvotes)
When your roommate and his fwb snore like its their day job... Literally sounds like two 12 year old Bulldogs trying to fight  (7 upvotes)
Fuck those drunk ass bitches falling into everybody at the DKA party  (10 upvotes)
Driving isn't cool when you live in LA. Always traffic. Public transportation is life.  (12 upvotes)
Love how my job gave me the entire weekend off and they called me in yesterday today and tomorrow -_- (2 upvotes)
Someday, I shall be president.  (1 upvotes)
I'm so tired I can't get myself to move towards the coffee (3 upvotes)
"What do you look for in a girl?" "I want a girl who's as excited to go to India or Bangladesh as she would be to New York or London"  (5 upvotes)
Is USC financial aid just based off of FAFSA?  (0 upvotes)
It's low key racist when white people say they were born in the wrong generation. What you wannna go back for huh lol??? (4 upvotes)
Does anyone know how to do the cal grant gpa thing?  (0 upvotes)
Can you pleaseeee give me some club recommendations? I really want to join something  (-2 upvotes)
every time I sleep in when I have to do stuff I'm like please kill me this is too much to handle so I'm actually done. several times a week (0 upvotes)
No one is gonna wanna be with me because of my emotional baggage  (8 upvotes)
I feel like my internal organs are bruised from how big his dick was (14 upvotes)
when he hasnt texted you back and you see him alone at the end of the night. fuck you  (10 upvotes)
Two types of people  (38 upvotes)
I feel sick to my stomach and can't tell if it's because I'm hungover or depressed (2 upvotes)
nothing worse than waking up to the smell of vomit and your roommate passed out on the ground  (1 upvotes)
I want to try lean (3 upvotes)
Cody Kessler ran a 4.95 and 4.90 second 40 yard dash at the combine. Explains a lot. (7 upvotes)
When you miss a moment in real life cause you are too focused on getting the perfect snapchat shot...  (16 upvotes)
On a regular day: yea I'm pretty cute, ain't ugly                                   When I have makeup: GODDAMN IM GORGEOUS  (6 upvotes)
Le sigh... (8 upvotes)
I love Barack "You can't fuck with me" Obama...seriously, what a champ!  (10 upvotes)
Saturdays are always lonely for me. (9 upvotes)
Being considered inadequate for whatever reason by someone you care for is the most degrading and depressing thing, especially when you usually could care less what people think  (20 upvotes)
Haven't had a girlfriend for more than 20 years. I think I must be sick. (19 upvotes)
By any chance, has anyone played Portal 2? (0 upvotes)
How was last night? (4 upvotes)
I need a girlfriend , any takers ? I'm ugly but I have my career set and I don't mind pampering , I do make good income and well I can play  guitar lol   (3 upvotes)
I want to go home  (5 upvotes)
So I went out last night and ended up dancing with this guy and at the end of the night he gave me his number. He told me afterwards that he's married to a woman and has 2 kids... I'm a guy too  (35 upvotes)
Anyone up ?  (2 upvotes)
#smokersunite (4 upvotes)
Too. Early. (10 upvotes)
going to the gym before 8am like a psychopath (82 upvotes)
When you're into someone but somehow end up making out with their friend instead...? Disappointed but it was fun I guess  (4 upvotes)
What if jizz tasted like syrup (0 upvotes)
Anyone want to smoke a blunt with me? Don't like smoking alone  (-1 upvotes)
All you need is that loud to bring everyone closer.  (-1 upvotes)
Anybody at the Milner Hotel? Me and my friend got a bottle and beers to let the party continue!  Just back from Tyga concert (-2 upvotes)
Just made out with a foreigner for the first time and damn....they're pushy.  (0 upvotes)
POLL: Tame Impala or Toro y Moi? (1 upvotes)
Do girls care if you're a virgin? (4 upvotes)
Any girls want to be eaten out (-1 upvotes)
Do guys care if you're a virgin?  (2 upvotes)
Do all guys just want a hookup or are there actually guys who want a relationship here... (12 upvotes)
Any girls trying to get fucked at annenberg? Just got ditched so im free  (2 upvotes)
You ever had that feeling when all the shitty things you've done flash before your eyes, and you have an existential crisis about how little the world actually cares about you? You know, that feeling? (36 upvotes)
I'm done with hook ups, shits depressing. (24 upvotes)
Honestly, I'm trying my hardest to not act how I feel. (16 upvotes)
Just had in incredible night with a dope girl and didn't do a fucking thing. Fuck me  (21 upvotes)
It takes a special kind of fucked up to agree to meet for a hookup then change your mind and ditch me when you see me in person (22 upvotes)
Doesn't want to text me back but still watches my snapchat stories. Wtf bro (5 upvotes)
I just need to fuck something  (0 upvotes)
Some one talk to me (4 upvotes)
Can't sleep & I keep smelling Campbell's chicken soup (6 upvotes)
Savage (10 upvotes)
Nervous to meet this guy in person for the first time. Any tips?  (2 upvotes)
It was never love I could tell now *travis scott voice* (1 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"University of Virginia"
Location(38.035, -78.505)
UNC can't even streak a UNESCO world heritage site (0 upvotes)
Shame that so many people will already be gone for senior day (0 upvotes)
Is Dickie v gonna be at the game? (0 upvotes)
Looking at the charges on out debit card to find out where you went last night.... (0 upvotes)
Spotted: Colliers truck parked in Barracks  (0 upvotes)
Are buses running today? (-1 upvotes)
UNC has lines around the states (0 upvotes)
UNC doesn't have Ms. Kathy (7 upvotes)
UNC's freshman can't even streak their campus (9 upvotes)
UNC is fiscally liberal and socially conservative  (8 upvotes)
This kid who made the half court shot... Too bad he's a fourth year, we could use him on the team (5 upvotes)
The cutest thing in the world is probably when young children say that they liked something "since they were little." (4 upvotes)
Are we allowed to bring posters to the game tonight? (1 upvotes)
Ur Not Cool UNC (1 upvotes)
PSA: Barracks is towing for the game today.  (6 upvotes)
SAE is a tobacco lobbying firm  (9 upvotes)
Serp is a penny stock (7 upvotes)
My thoughts are just me constantly thinking "You really should be doing work right now." Or "I would rather not be doing this work right now." It's a struggle and I hate college. (6 upvotes)
Theta recently acquired kappa in an epic LBO deal. Kappa valued at 6 pairs of leggings two barbours 1 Canada goose jacket, 3 handles of grey goose. We'll see if the ISC blocks deal due to monopoly  (18 upvotes)
Make UVA frat again (2 upvotes)
UNC likes unfrosted pop tarts (5 upvotes)
JUST GOT MY UNC TICKET GUYS DONT GIVE UP HOPE (18 upvotes)
How have we been so blind. (64 upvotes)
The moment when you turn off the engine because taco bell has you idling so much (5 upvotes)
A beautiful day to best UNC.  (3 upvotes)
"Carolina Blue is the past tense of Carolina Blows" -well done, whoever made that sign. Well done.  (57 upvotes)
About to relinquish my ticket (1 upvotes)
"I love the poorly educated! Thanks UNC for producing my voter base!" -Donald Trump (20 upvotes)
When you're so tired from Gameday that you're worried you won't wake up in time for the game  (26 upvotes)
If my neighbor could coordinate her bed banging the wall each thrust with my other neighbor's trumpet playing, it'd be pretty cool. Till then, dorm life ain't my favorite tune. (23 upvotes)
I'm a grad student and in my late 20's. Matching with high school teachers on tinder is when I finally realized I'm getting old.  (15 upvotes)
Would it be weird to go to a baseball game alone? Just wanna watch my favorite sport on a nice day without distractions. (9 upvotes)
Remember when someone yakked uniWORSEity of DONT CAREoLIAR and then yakked a semester later apologizing for it? That was me and I still feel bad after a year.  (32 upvotes)
Bank it of the backboard like I'm Board $$ (3 upvotes)
Make game day great again (3 upvotes)
UNC pays for a tidal account (9 upvotes)
When you think about it "have a drink have a drive go out and see what you can find" is pretty bad advice and also kinda sketchy (3 upvotes)
Damn Washington Post that's a little presumptive  (73 upvotes)
"Donald Trump has the makings of a great President, but I'm concerned about some of his ideas. He would make an outstanding Emperor though." (24 upvotes)
Heels belong on the bottom of our feet (4 upvotes)
Uva Students: Gods at half court shots (26 upvotes)
Or is it? (25 upvotes)
I feel bad for the poor guy who's gotta attempt the half court shot next year.  (88 upvotes)
Get the London look  (26 upvotes)
Andrew board can finally pay for his textbooks now (75 upvotes)
UNC reads Rolling Stone (66 upvotes)
UNC goes to Tech (37 upvotes)
is it ok to trade basketball tickets?  (1 upvotes)
Where are the food places in darden? (1 upvotes)
 (324 upvotes)
UNC is a never-nude (35 upvotes)
North Korea wouldn't even want a UNC Student  (259 upvotes)
*sends shitty snapchat* look don't even reply to that I'm clearly at the end of my creativity  (21 upvotes)
You can't spell adjuvants without UVA... (8 upvotes)
Had to have this talk today (115 upvotes)
Bronco said "Fuck the rules. Can't nobody tell Bronco no hashtags." #HoosRising (15 upvotes)
How did they make it in.  (285 upvotes)
I hate that my best body came from eating no more than 800 calories a day and doing two-a-day workouts. I will never look that good again no matter how hard I try and I'm still making peace with that. (45 upvotes)
I use State Farm and my car insurance is definitely going up if they find out I go to UVA  (45 upvotes)
When some guy at Starbucks sets his blunt on the arm of his chair before quickly putting it away. (16 upvotes)
Only one picture of a sign? I'm dissapointed yik yak (3 upvotes)
you can't spell  _ _ _ t  without UNC ;) (136 upvotes)
Ah, no better way to start your morning than running into a tour group while on your walk of shame (55 upvotes)
When you sleep through your Gameday alarm so you cry blood (82 upvotes)
DAMN UVA!!! Back at it again with the half court shots!  (470 upvotes)
Gameday is gonna stop coming back if we keep making the $18,000 shot (583 upvotes)
ANDREW BOARD FUCK ME DADDY (65 upvotes)
When you need to write a paper but Pokemon blue just got released on virtual console... (25 upvotes)
Andrew Board: the boy who could (213 upvotes)
HOOS DON'T LOSE #BoardForPresident (80 upvotes)
The guy who made that half court needs to be on the team  (211 upvotes)
UVA. FUCKING KINGS OF THE HALF COURT SHOT (506 upvotes)
Did he call bank though (98 upvotes)
HOLY SHIT TWO YEARS IN A ROW (397 upvotes)
Baristas are one of the few people that deal with you before you've had coffee. Respect them.  (63 upvotes)
"Tarheels" as a mascot is almost as bad as "Hokies" (67 upvotes)
Good luck today HOOS break a leg or better yet break some HEELS!!!  (66 upvotes)
The Oprah sign.  (11 upvotes)
Boston College just got shat on (29 upvotes)
One sentence written? Better take a 10 minute break.  (28 upvotes)
UNC goes to Tech (132 upvotes)
Go to hell Carolina, go to hell (8 upvotes)
Can we bring signs into the game if we didn't go to game day? Should we? (4 upvotes)
"How can we let somebody into our fraternity if they don't know who Jane Fonda is?" (3 upvotes)
The Travelocity gnome is visiting!  (100 upvotes)
"Evan Nolte's PPG is higher than my GPA" - College Gameday 2016 (147 upvotes)
Why Im Not Even Mad, Volume 6: Still Not Mad At All (5 upvotes)
Ted Cruz est le Zodiac Killer. (10 upvotes)
If you're reading this, UNC can't. - College Gameday 2016 (139 upvotes)
UNC thinks mayonnaise is an instrument   (97 upvotes)
sign of the day (671 upvotes)
To the guy who just slid into the live stream and dabbed on College Game day - You're a hero. (120 upvotes)
ESPN Gameday hosts ripping Grayson Allen a new one haha (156 upvotes)
"What do UNC and Grayson Allen have in common? They don't have class" - College Gameday 2016 (161 upvotes)
College Game Day has become a Grayson Allen hate-fest. Gotta love it. (114 upvotes)
Not a fan when the roommate brings out of town friends over and they are super loud (9 upvotes)
Some good signs from game day: "University of Nobody Cares" "UNC was my safety school" "What do UNC and Grayson Allen have in common? They don't have class" Comment other good ones you see! (87 upvotes)
Carolina blue my dick last night (8 upvotes)
I am the only person I know who has group 7 tickets for the game, is it worth it to go alone? (0 upvotes)
I actually really like Fuller House. Feels a lot like the original, which was also painfully cheesy. (9 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"Tufts University"
Location(42.4069, -71.1198)
Such a nice day out :) makes me happy!  (0 upvotes)
To any of you who feel like they aren't good enough, Or are too confused to be happy. I'll be thinking about you. We all get through it together (7 upvotes)
I know why we have so many science majors now- because Tufts is a breeding ground for disease. Perfect storm.  (3 upvotes)
Seeing the damage on your bank account after a good night. Ouch. (1 upvotes)
Too warm to have a blanket but too cold to have no blanket :( (6 upvotes)
This week has been a bad massage. I need a happy ending (6 upvotes)
Melissa Click was fired a few days ago (1 upvotes)
A student in bed will remain in bed unless acted upon by a large enough panic (41 upvotes)
Well, it was nice knowing you all. (56 upvotes)
Why don't we pronounce pronunciation the same way we pronunciate pronounce? (10 upvotes)
What is your longest streak of meals eaten alone at tufts? (4 upvotes)
Every university: "yes, our students are well-adjusted individuals who are happy, secure, and have low stress levels." Every student: if someone hit me with a bus, I'd probably thank them." (62 upvotes)
Action Bronson for spring fling (6 upvotes)
Healthy living at its finest  (22 upvotes)
Cuddling > (0 upvotes)
Why are people here so afraid of feeling emotions? (11 upvotes)
Just took my first shit in days and I want to thank the kitchen staff at Dewick for making this moment possible (15 upvotes)
I really don't want to walk in my own graduation. I have no friends and commencement isn't something I find necessary for me. I'm walking for my parents. I'm dreading graduation day. (0 upvotes)
I'm in the mood to be in hot summer weather and crack open a beer by the pool with my friends.  (21 upvotes)
Some days I just feel horrible for no reason  (8 upvotes)
my miracle hangover cure: eggs, corned beef hash, a six pack of beer, a large pot brownie (or copious bong usage), and a near-limitless supply of episodes of "The West Wing" on Netflix. In a dark room (8 upvotes)
all I want is a muscular athletic guy to pound me in the shower (I'm a guy lol) (13 upvotes)
Can someone at the CC tell me if the smoothie place is open? (0 upvotes)
Any suggestions for good barbers nearby?  (1 upvotes)
Fixing my drunk brain's mistakes (26 upvotes)
When the most exclusive party of the night is carm late night. Noguestswipesallowed (22 upvotes)
Today both me and my balls got a haircut :) (3 upvotes)
Yak poll: how long is your hard dick? (5 upvotes)
Reaching that point where I think every little stinking thing he does is cute. And his laugh is like music to my ears and even his freaking nose is adorable. God help me (17 upvotes)
To the tour guide in the gym who said the guys might want to use the regular gym rather than the one for athletic  teams because there might be prettier girls, way to represent tufts loser (43 upvotes)
Any girls like to get smoked up (0 upvotes)
So when tf do we get to know who's performing for spring fling? (1 upvotes)
I stay in the bathroom for a long time in the morning because I know that when I leave I'll have to get my life together.  (12 upvotes)
I always hear about girl scouts selling cookies on Harvard campus, but never see them. I need some fucking thin mints, where are they at? (4 upvotes)
Team Steve or Team Matt? (0 upvotes)
what are epdc hours on weekends? (2 upvotes)
I'm really nice, unless you get to know me (5 upvotes)
How was late night at Carm last night? (3 upvotes)
Depressing AF (7 upvotes)
Scoop and Scootery is NEVER worth it, high people (1 upvotes)
tfw your LDR sucks at communication (3 upvotes)
My anxiety is ruining my life (12 upvotes)
I had a sex dream about another guy.. do i tell my boyfriend?  (5 upvotes)
Who do we think is going to win SC today? (-2 upvotes)
Boyfriend knows I don't ever want sex without a condom on. Last night, Boyfriend wants to have sex. Me, twice: "Do you have a condom?" Him, twice: "Yes!" When he came I realized he never put it on. (8 upvotes)
Been talking to a girl on tinder who seems cool-we already have something in common. Unfortunately that thing is not being on tinder much so it's taken us 2 weeks to discuss what we did 2 Fridays ago  (28 upvotes)
How do I (nude) model for an art class/school?  (7 upvotes)
I hate when guys agree to hang out and then just suddenly don't text back ever again. Like u could've just told me ur not interested. How hard is that (29 upvotes)
The world is a dark, dark place (3 upvotes)
My brain is disintegrating.  (6 upvotes)
Do real people actually get "triggered" by things (14 upvotes)
Overheard in south: "imagine if you died when sucking your own dick, like if you just broke your neck while sucking it. (30 upvotes)
I'll pay someone to get the bitch outside my room to stop complaining (13 upvotes)
Tilton fifth floor our in the hallway having a conversation. Shut the fuck up, please. (1 upvotes)
There's no feeling like watching your best friend get a new best friend. (71 upvotes)
Got myself pregnant by looking at mirror every day  (19 upvotes)
Wondering if guys will ever stop treating me like garbage  (2 upvotes)
Can someone shed light on this recent sexual assault that went down?  I just want to know more about it after seeing some yaks  (1 upvotes)
That awkward moment when Tufts puts the trigger warning at the end of the sexual misconduct warning email. (83 upvotes)
"Do they have senses of humor at Harvard, or do they have to buy those too?" (13 upvotes)
People on the first floor of south watching a movie in the fucking hallway... Considering it's 1:30 am you should really take this into your rooms. So damn rude. (2 upvotes)
How do guys appreciate a woman's ASSets during sex?  (7 upvotes)
Im seriously considering leaving a goodbye note saying 'fuck it im out' and transfering to Arizona state (32 upvotes)
I really wanna have a threesome... (12 upvotes)
Anyone want their sick sucked near the Harvard quad? I'm serious (2 upvotes)
Wool only 629 episodes left (1 upvotes)
Was way too high for everything I went through tonight  (7 upvotes)
I want nothing more than to leave you behind and to go home (3 upvotes)
I honestly feel like I make better decisions when I'm buzzed... (6 upvotes)
I'm literally too bored and disappointed to even jack off (21 upvotes)
So anyone know the deal with getting carm and commons late night? (8 upvotes)
It is my civic duty to show up to carm late night and act respectfully sober so that it doesn't seem like we all suck (24 upvotes)
Finding a hair on you that isn't yours <<<< (11 upvotes)
"What's with the goofy grins, you didn't find my brownies did you"         This isn't the full house I remember...  (6 upvotes)
any frats (2 upvotes)
I think it would be hilarious if SW:E8 followed the extended universe and smoke was palpatine in a fucked up clone body (4 upvotes)
SOMEONE TELL ME HOW LATE NIGHT AT CARM IS!!!  (7 upvotes)
Holy shit I'm starting to like him. What do I do (3 upvotes)
Overheard in Carm: "Alright it's probably mostly half German people living in the German house if you're being real, you know what I mean?" #tru (6 upvotes)
My sis gave me an Xbox live card but I told her I don't use my Xbox often, and if she really wanted to get me something she could get me another card that would have more use. Ungrateful or honest? (-3 upvotes)
I just need a nice girl to talk to :( (4 upvotes)
Tfw you're discussing worm porn with your ex (3 upvotes)
I fucking hate online dating (12 upvotes)
I thought on my 21st birthday I'd be the one spilling the drinks, not having my waitress dump a whole tray of water on me. There's nothing like celebrating your birthday in wet clothing.  (20 upvotes)
*sits for 27 hour oil portrait* omg god no delete that I'm serious do not hang that in the great hall  (128 upvotes)
Free beer at the German house!!! (2 upvotes)
my room looks like my closet fucking vomited onto it.  cleaning tips??  i'm a lazy bitch and i literally hate cleaning more than anything in the universe (6 upvotes)
If life is like a box of chocolates, I must be a dog. (62 upvotes)
Carm or commons ln? (2 upvotes)
What kind of food is at carm? (2 upvotes)
German house is awesome! Come turn up (7 upvotes)
Had exams all week and was kind of looking forward to going out tonight. Am now four hours deep into an awful depressive episode and can't get out of bed. At least my liver is happy? (31 upvotes)
Carm late night stir fry is lit rn (7 upvotes)
Will there be a curve on comp sci hw (8 upvotes)
Met a cute girl today... I don't think she knows it but she took my breath away (31 upvotes)
Anything going on tonight? (3 upvotes)
dear sexual assault victim, I don't need to know you're identity but I'm sending you a hug. Can't imagine what you're dealing with right now. It is our job to believe you, we cannot fail.  (241 upvotes)
Any parties on tonight  (9 upvotes)
I'd rather be able to go to Carm before lunchtime tomorrow than tonight at 1am, js. (16 upvotes)
how do I know if he wants to hook up only or if he wants a relationship? am I allowed to ask? (1 upvotes)
I feel like people aren't taking the assault case seriously. And now I found out it happened in my dorm... Great so now I'm scared to keep the door to my room unlocked when I pee or shower  (18 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"Wake Forest University"
Location(36.135, -80.277)
If someone wants to post the BIO 114 study guide it would be greatly appreciated (0 upvotes)
Fuller house just made me cry  (0 upvotes)
Currently combining my two favorite activities, beer and Netflix. It's Netflix and beer.  (1 upvotes)
I hope Donald Trump makes a cameo appearance in house of cards  (1 upvotes)
If everybody poops does that mean everyone is a kappa? (2 upvotes)
It's a beautiful day to not remember! #dartytime (1 upvotes)
Ted Cruz looks like a melted candle.  (6 upvotes)
Shout out to the parking lady issuing tickets in kitchen hall, you made a lot money (5 upvotes)
Melissa Harris-Perry is on the Bing front page. She's cancelled her news program this weekend, b/c MSNBC has turned too conservative for her.  (4 upvotes)
I just wrote "major key" in my paper without even realizing it. Memes are ruining my life.  (12 upvotes)
Pick your poison: 2016 (4 upvotes)
Don't ever let a printer know you're in a hurry. Those motherfuckers smell fear. (28 upvotes)
Good at convincing the world to like me when I actually don't like myself  (6 upvotes)
damn sig chi,,that's messed up (19 upvotes)
wHy do I drink  (6 upvotes)
When your Touch ID won't work and you have to unlock your phone like a peasant  (36 upvotes)
I haven't started studying for bio 114 yet..... Am I the only one? (9 upvotes)
People in luter, learn how to use a damn microwave so the fire alarm doesn't go off (28 upvotes)
Really would be feeling a thunderstorm right now (33 upvotes)
Walking a shaky line between feeling overwhelming nsecurity and thinking I'm the shit (40 upvotes)
When you walk past a girl rubbing herself by a wall on campus drunk af (11 upvotes)
Why do girls play hard to get... Like get the hint (17 upvotes)
Omg my ass was just sucked so well (0 upvotes)
Looking for a girl to come over and order dominos with me  (14 upvotes)
How do I sleep when there's a million things on my mind and you're 999,999 of them (29 upvotes)
So me (93 upvotes)
Hi I go to Wake and i'm from Ny, Ct, or Nj (51 upvotes)
I often think about dying.... That fact doesn't scare me as much as it should.  (3 upvotes)
Just put four loads of laundry in... Reasons not to go out on Friday night (30 upvotes)
I ain't saying she's a gold digger but she did move to California in 1834 (72 upvotes)
How wake students flirt  (29 upvotes)
Buy me a John Deer so I know it's real... (14 upvotes)
Just found out that my old hook up has a new hook up... Just feeling kinda lonely and forgotten.  (21 upvotes)
Seniors living on campus: How easy is it to choose a random single room?  (19 upvotes)
Dads are like the secret moms. I miss my dad (20 upvotes)
Trying to analyze the tone of yaks and convince yourself you know who wrote it (13 upvotes)
I'm an animal in bed. Specifically a koala bear. I can sleep 20 sometimes 22 hours a day (72 upvotes)
Thought I'd more accurately label Wake's cups  (45 upvotes)
To the nice guy I really like spending time with, stop spending your Friday nights alone in your room where I can't accidentally run into you (35 upvotes)
Any girls want to come over and watch Netflix and split a box of wine  (21 upvotes)
why are people always trying to create beef between sororities like all my friends are in different ones it's so dumb lmao  (32 upvotes)
Porn gives me unrealistic expectations of my office hours  (62 upvotes)
Haha, date function I'm going to have the laundry room all to myself, suckers (57 upvotes)
Fire Alarm are BullShit (10 upvotes)
Chainsmokers sold out muwhahahaha (4 upvotes)
Are chainsmokers tickets sold out??!!!!????!!!???? (4 upvotes)
Omg ambulance already??!!! (15 upvotes)
Does anyone have an extra ticket to chainsmokers. Will pay cash (6 upvotes)
My mindset for this KD date function is "yeah I'd run a red light"  (56 upvotes)
Mad props to improv you guys were great (11 upvotes)
Remember guys, payback is a bitch and karma is her stripper name. Treat girls with respect  (34 upvotes)
Of course the rednecks in Oklahoma like Trump (5 upvotes)
I cannot believe Trump may actually be the nominee for president omg (40 upvotes)
High school: don't be in a clique!! That's bad!      Wake: Find which clique you fit into best as soon as possible. (74 upvotes)
The only thing keeping me from enjoying my Monday exam is having an exam on Monday (15 upvotes)
Give her the Deac  (13 upvotes)
Deac tonight?  (8 upvotes)
Some child just "Damn Danieled" me but I'm wearing white adidas (43 upvotes)
I hate being a geed (7 upvotes)
On a real note, shout out to the guys at wake. Some of you are really nice. I don't think they get enough credit sometimes.  (72 upvotes)
Damn girl, are you replicating? Cause I'd like to be your complementary strand  (31 upvotes)
When you see the people you hate and wonder what you can do to make them go away.... (16 upvotes)
People are beautiful  (18 upvotes)
Miss the trees already :/ (99 upvotes)
Gotta love Friday afternoon classes. Longest two hours of my life. (30 upvotes)
Can I submit a bias report against the sociology department? (12 upvotes)
Always the side hoe, never the girlfriend  (24 upvotes)
Can you imagine how old we'll all sound when we tell our grandchildren we were born in the 1900s? (84 upvotes)
Shameless plug, here, but everyone like DoRAK on Facebook and follow @wfu_dorak on Instagram and Twitter! We want to make you guys smile more than just every once in a while!  (22 upvotes)
Not the least bit surprised (98 upvotes)
Lol  (4 upvotes)
When you feel fucked over by someone, or you fuck someone over, remember that karma can be your best friend and it's the biggest bitch there is  (13 upvotes)
I'm only 18 and I feel like my world is just crumbling i'm so unhappy, I feel like this is not how it should be  (12 upvotes)
Faculty Fellows are giving away 5 dozen Bagel Station bagels to the Luter Hall residents in about 15 minutes!!  (9 upvotes)
When someone sitting next to you makes a comment in the groupme and you feel obligated to like it (26 upvotes)
Don't sit in the stall next to me when there's more open. I don't know you like that (32 upvotes)
Hatch the type person to take your unassigned seat halfway through the semester... (63 upvotes)
Soon we're gonna be called Wake University if they keep cutting all these trees (207 upvotes)
Hatch super likes on tinder (30 upvotes)
Shout out to the beautiful tall women of Wake, you aren't appreciated often enough (30 upvotes)
whats up @thekid who's chilling in the boat in Q parking lot (12 upvotes)
Hawaii bound  (4 upvotes)
Its sucks feeling like you have no friends here. Like it's Friday and then you just have no friends to do anything with :/ (29 upvotes)
Call me the lazy janitor cause I drop buckets  (16 upvotes)
I am Queens Boulevard.  (18 upvotes)
I'd be willing to pay double the price for a single room, tired of living with an annoying ass roommate  (28 upvotes)
"our basketball team has had a shitty season and I need to send an email to keep up team spirit cause I fucked it all up this year" - Manning (33 upvotes)
"Shut the fuck up," I whisper into my roommate's ear as she snores. (70 upvotes)
I can't believe people are willing to sleep with me despite my abrasive personality  (28 upvotes)
When you like someone & it totally seems like they like you back so all you wanna do is profess your love but just end up playing hard to get and make them think you actually hate them. Ya makes sense (42 upvotes)
Anyone want to come fuck me til I beg for mercy then pretend we met at last resort last night? (16 upvotes)
How do I cite "straight out of my ass" in MLA format? (206 upvotes)
What if Kanye was president? (16 upvotes)
Natty O the type of guy to eat French fries one at a time with a fork  (48 upvotes)
I still use the same TI-84 I got in 2007. It's smart. It's loyal. (162 upvotes)
All I need is 5 more corgis to become the queen of England  (62 upvotes)
Want a nice hookup buddy (16 upvotes)
Depressed my crush doesn't have a family crest (12 upvotes)
There's nothing like being part of a "Highly Academically Gifted" program in grade school to show how much of a mediocre disappointment I've become today. (118 upvotes)
That awkward moment you get an email from a recruiter saying "sorry we only visit the Duke campus in North Carolina" (26 upvotes)
When do I submit my application to the patriarchy to get my guaranteed job, higher pay, and patriarchy club keychain?  (13 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"University of MichiganAnn Arbor"
Location(42.2828, -83.7347)
Some dorm rooms will be entered during break. Make sure to throw out all your liquor bottles/illegal stuff or hide it well. :) (1 upvotes)
Still on campus :/ (0 upvotes)
While proudly wearing my UM hoodie, I stared down a man proudly(?) wearing his Ohio State jacket. He looked away first  (3 upvotes)
Funny how badly we all needed this break but now we can't think of fun things to do with all this free time (3 upvotes)
Hm hm hm what (6 upvotes)
everyone with a class crush, the guy that likes me actually took a chance and talked to me. you should too! (3 upvotes)
guys THE GIRL I LIKE LIKES ME BACK ITS A MIRACLE (7 upvotes)
Girls, finger on/around butthole when hitting it doggystyle, yay or nay? (0 upvotes)
"Vacations over Versace." Never forget.  (9 upvotes)
Engr 101 gsi's: your exams will be put in tomorrow. *tomorrow* sorry your exams will be out in tomorrow *another day passes* sorry give it one more day *another day passes (1 upvotes)
I'm two years into my ME degree am I too far in to switch my major to computer science? (0 upvotes)
Anyone else feel super comfortable and warm taking showers? Like that is one of the best parts of my day  (3 upvotes)
It's a nice day to lay in bed and Grindr all day  (3 upvotes)
Confession: I hope no one ever throws me a surprise party because I'm lame and I not only worry that 5 people will show up but those 5 people will never see me the same again (1 upvotes)
Visiting a friend at another school for break and realizing that their normal yak is more dead that UMich's break yak...  (7 upvotes)
As an incoming freshman I thought I would use Wolverine Access much more than I do (31 upvotes)
Unpopular fact: the Obama presidency has been a stunning success and our country is doing much better than when Bush left (17 upvotes)
Anyone else who didn't leave for break sitting around trying to remember what things you enjoy doing now that you have time to do them? (9 upvotes)
My dad called me and woke me up today, and I answered the phone with my retainers in. He asked why I sounded like I had a cock in my mouth. (20 upvotes)
Best part of spring break: reuniting with my dog.  (31 upvotes)
Any other South Asian people who feel like everything tastes bland? :( (18 upvotes)
Back at home I work at a fast food restaurant to make some extra money, and customers treat me like shit. But little do they know that I actually go to the best goddamn university in the world. (26 upvotes)
Fun fact: Kevin, one of the characters in American Pie, goes to U of M in the movie (17 upvotes)
Part 1 of my spring cleaning will be to delete the numbers of people I'm not friends with anymore. Gotta start getting rid of the junk (5 upvotes)
Been home for 10 hours and already hate it so much.  (8 upvotes)
Initials of crush here! This time get creative and describe with the initials. I'll go first... (2 upvotes)
Who are the many children in squad dining right now? O.o (1 upvotes)
When ur chip breaks in the salsa and you gotta send in the recon chip  (14 upvotes)
When you're bored all spring break because all your friends from back home have a different spring break and are still in school (6 upvotes)
Update. Airline bought us Pizza because of delay (9 upvotes)
Feelin like the only one going home without a DTW Snapchat filter. (5 upvotes)
Golfers are notoriously mortal (1 upvotes)
when a stranger from your hometown yells go blue at you > (19 upvotes)
Love pup (1 upvotes)
Is anyone doing free privilege checks on campus during break?  I might be triggering someone and need to have mine looked at.  (9 upvotes)
Sometimes when I see someone walk through a door and I only see their foot, I wonder if that's my future wife like in HIMYM (14 upvotes)
I'm staying here over spring break...do you think bars will be worth even trying to go to or they forsure gonna be dead? There's gotta be at least some people staying here too right? (8 upvotes)
Welcome home (20 upvotes)
Break means waffles  (17 upvotes)
Anybody else get INTENSE sugar cravings after workouts? (8 upvotes)
Dad? (4 upvotes)
You know it's break when the hot yaks stay up for 11 hours (20 upvotes)
Does anyone else find that they have trouble restricting themselves when it comes to eating at home??? (27 upvotes)
"How's your day going?" "I'm eating hospital sushi. How do you think?" (11 upvotes)
Break aka brunch week  (32 upvotes)
I need to stop watching Chopped and do something with my life  (22 upvotes)
Ahhh no posts for 22 minutes???? What's happening?!?!  (25 upvotes)
Yik yak is dead and so am I  (23 upvotes)
Last semester: gets 3.7 GPA. This semester: below average on every exam so far. Fuck  (60 upvotes)
Luck would have it that I wake up with a sinus headache the day I leave for vacation  (11 upvotes)
The Detroit airport yak is all Umich posts (47 upvotes)
Only three hours of work stand between me and spring break  (2 upvotes)
India killed Pakistan in T20 today!!! (-1 upvotes)
Adulthood: going to a Disney frozen sing-a-long showing alone and having the time of your fucking life (63 upvotes)
He is a virgin and has never even kissed anyone but I would gladly kiss him until the sun went down if he liked me. (50 upvotes)
I slept for 14 hours last night. Thank you break  (26 upvotes)
Sitting in the airport waiting for spring break while eating chick-fil-a and listening to a self-playing piano play Billie Jean. 'Tis the life. (56 upvotes)
Did I just take 10 little containers of French vanilla and hazelnut to put in my hot chocolate later? Yes, yes I did. Do I care? No, no I do not. (39 upvotes)
When you can't have the person you want so you fill your life with people who aren't even half as good. But you still feel empty. (21 upvotes)
Why does asthma exist? Why? (11 upvotes)
Back home, I can hear my 16 year old brother and some girl are having sex in his bedroom. (1) since when did he become a stud. (2) I don't know if I am more proud or more jealous rn.  (83 upvotes)
My rsum is nowhere near as impressive (42 upvotes)
When you realize,as you have time to think during break, that you and a good friend would really be great together. Hmmmm (16 upvotes)
Fuller House  (16 upvotes)
Republican race has legit turned into who can out-bully and out-insult the other candidates while Hilary and Sanders debate actual policies that effect every day people. (17 upvotes)
We get it Buzzfeed ....you support homosexuality....we get it...for the love of... (11 upvotes)
Did anyone else binge watch all of Fuller House last night? What did you think? I thought is was great, obviously overly cheesy, but funny and I hope they do more seasons. (11 upvotes)
How do you go from loving someone for so long to not having any feelings for them? I'm trying so hard but I can't help but feel down all the time  (18 upvotes)
I think I might be getting over my long time crush! (15 upvotes)
Spring Break in NYC. Enjoy your spring break wolverines.  (26 upvotes)
When your high school friends have break at completely different times so you're bored back home (153 upvotes)
To everyone who's going to see me today: sorry I know you don't believe me but I'm normally attractive  (39 upvotes)
Fuller house giving me allllllll the feels (5 upvotes)
Anyone else staying in AA for break??? (24 upvotes)
I didn't even drink but I'm hung over rn. I'm hungover from school (68 upvotes)
I cannot believe how great Jodie Sweetin looks on Fuller House. Just shows that you can overcome addiction and turn your life around!  (33 upvotes)
The phrase "kissless virgin" makes me cringe.  (90 upvotes)
Just saw a dead crow on the sidewalk. Hopefully this isn't the start of a disaster movie  (21 upvotes)
Happy Spring Break my UM brothers and sisters!  (21 upvotes)
Magic Conch, will they ever put in our 101 exam scores? (35 upvotes)
Going to friends house today and the only thing I am worried bout is eating another mother's home cooked meal. I feel like I'm going to be betraying my mom, haha. (13 upvotes)
I wonder who else is turnt for their flight  (11 upvotes)
This liberal fad on campus is a bit ridiculous. Being conservative does not mean i am against gays, believe in god, or like guns. Idgaf what people do privately, but i do respect sound fiscal policy   (12 upvotes)
RIP Umich yak feed for the next week (76 upvotes)
so...what's the best country to move to if Trump wins?  (23 upvotes)
About to live at the gym all of break yay  (12 upvotes)
Who else isn't going anywhere for break (35 upvotes)
On this long voyage, all I can see is your soul blossoming beautifully over the rainbow  (3 upvotes)
Trying to finish all the food that will expire over break in the next 4 hours. Wish me luck.  (101 upvotes)
Hi. My name is Joe. I've got a wife and 3 kids and I work in a button factory. (116 upvotes)
Well waking up from a sex dream in your parents' house is awkward and uncomfortable  (20 upvotes)
Anyone want to go for brunch? I'm alone over break  (2 upvotes)
I'm doing life wrong  (8 upvotes)
If you text a guy what are you doing tonight and he says I have a lot of hw but we should plan on hanging after break, what does that mean/do you think he will follow up? (7 upvotes)
You can tell a lot about a person's character if they like their own Instagrams  (22 upvotes)
Good Morning Umich! It's spring break! Hope you're spending time with friends or family. Today is starting at 25 but up to 42 degrees later. Mostly sunny skies and some wind all day. Go Blue! (398 upvotes)
Housemate has her own bathroom but makes her boyfriend use mine. He doesn't wash his hands. Wtf (73 upvotes)
I think I need to start taking my sleeping pills again. I've been too afraid to for the past 8 months.   (7 upvotes)
Top yaks at DTW right now. We're everywhere (273 upvotes)
Hi my name is dog (10 upvotes)
Real happy hours  (36 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"Boston College"
Location(42.3351, -71.1704)
Best part about the weekend: No emails (0 upvotes)
Does Rocket Power ever explain why Raymundo was a single parent? (1 upvotes)
What if Soy milk is just Spanish milk introducing itself ? (3 upvotes)
It's weird how quick my phones battery dies when I'm studying  (1 upvotes)
Saw my ex doing cardio at the plex and asked "what's the point? She has no heart." (8 upvotes)
Nothing better than seeing passive aggressive yaks and knowing they're directed at you (2 upvotes)
When you admit that you like Trump  (11 upvotes)
Where are all these political parties everyone keeps talking about, and are they all open bar? (-2 upvotes)
How hard is it  for a freshman guy to get w a senior girl  (2 upvotes)
My new theory is that skinny people over estimate how much they eat. I lost a lot of weight and I fill up a lot quicker now. (2 upvotes)
You know you're doing well when you see people you went to high school posting fb statuses bragging about winning a $20 gift card to the grocery store (7 upvotes)
I'm starting to dabble in stocks. I have no idea what I'm doing. Wish me luck  (0 upvotes)
She called me a fuckboy. That's obviously ridiculous. I'm a senior, I'm a fuckman!! (16 upvotes)
Trying to find a hookup on here is like trying to piss against the wind, it's just gonna backfire.  (4 upvotes)
What's going on at BC today? So many cops/traffic (1 upvotes)
How do I branch out and make new friends as a second semester junior? (2 upvotes)
The reason I'm quiet around you isn't because I don't like you; it's because I like you so much and don't want to fuck things up.  (19 upvotes)
Kanye 2016 (3 upvotes)
Went on a date last night and the god damn bar played turn blue by the black keys in its entirety ... thanks for playing the anthem to my last relationship  (2 upvotes)
Michigan sucks Chodes  (1 upvotes)
I used to be good at that: a memoir  (6 upvotes)
mood: Damien getting hit by a shoe while singing Beautiful by Christina Aguilera (11 upvotes)
I'm a girl and I wanna have a threesome with two guys. I like it really rough and I wanna try dp  (3 upvotes)
sometimes I think the dinosaurs are never coming back  (15 upvotes)
My ex girlfriend turned me into a savage. I have that I don't give a fuck attitude now. (4 upvotes)
Boston college (0 upvotes)
When the cringe too strong (13 upvotes)
My momma don't like you, but then again she don't like me either so (28 upvotes)
How can the search for Adderall be so hard yet the course load so heavy....someone save me (-1 upvotes)
Looking for no strings attached bicurious experience tonight hmuu (2 upvotes)
Visiting this weekend and i gotta say you guys get pretty lit props (2 upvotes)
I'm the cousin that stole Kanye's laptop (9 upvotes)
Anybody find a wallet on the Newton bus? (3 upvotes)
Does a sophomore girl ever go for a freshman guy? (1 upvotes)
Gorson has huge legs (0 upvotes)
When the bus driver looks you in the eye but refuses to stop for you  (61 upvotes)
Kasich 2016 (18 upvotes)
Shout out to the 80-90 yr old man running laps at the plex...he's Awesome (32 upvotes)
Gorson shit his pants last night  (0 upvotes)
Why do they have a graduated cylinder in their mod? Oh wait that's a bong #merkertproblems (72 upvotes)
Is it likely my friends and I (all rising juniors) will get a 6 man in stayer? (2 upvotes)
To whoever has my package from VS on Newton, please return it! (8 upvotes)
Sad how the majority of hookup culture here only exists when people are drunk. And when I message a girl to join me for dinner, she doesn't respond. Like okay, keep letting these fuckboys mess around (24 upvotes)
I'm starting to reach my limit with every fucking person here. Certain people on my floor can fuck themselves. My roommate? He can fuck himself. Just waiting on the new semester (11 upvotes)
Sex happening now, all are welcome (6 upvotes)
Crushing on a guy that is in a relationship is probably the worst  (19 upvotes)
Kik dick pics to paintbrush12 (-3 upvotes)
I'm not drunk, I'm inebriated (13 upvotes)
To say that we're in love is dangerous, but girl I'm so glad we're acquainted (10 upvotes)
I'm latching onto you (2 upvotes)
Damn ambulance, back at it again on upper campus (80 upvotes)
Sext and chill?  (0 upvotes)
When you're drunk enough to be stupid but not to fall asleep  (6 upvotes)
How do you say "thought of you today" to a hetro-male friend without sounding gay? (3 upvotes)
Boston is fun and cool...but to live here? I'm sorry, it just isn't for me. (1 upvotes)
I'm fucked up homie you fucked up but if God got us then we gon' be alright (8 upvotes)
You're not the contents of your wallet. You're not your fucking khakis.  (13 upvotes)
If I had a tumor I'd name it Marla  (5 upvotes)
Save dat money (7 upvotes)
I get the impression that guys want to hook up with girls and girls want to hook up with guys(although other combinations are fine too).  If both want the same thing, then why is this so complicated? (14 upvotes)
She's twirling her hair across from me but I can't seem to say I like her (8 upvotes)
Some car slammed another car's door a d window off at lower   (2 upvotes)
I should've kissed him (51 upvotes)
I'm just 1/1000 dudes who are thirsty  (1 upvotes)
I just wanna eat a girl out and suck on her nipples (10 upvotes)
After years of telling people "I don't really have a favorite musician" I finally have an answer: Jethro Tull (4 upvotes)
500$ to the first girl that is willing to get wedgied  (5 upvotes)
def main():     print("Hello World!") (6 upvotes)
I should've kissed her (38 upvotes)
I tend to fall asleep around 7/8ish for an hour and then I go to bed at like 1/2am... this is a vicious cycle. (13 upvotes)
I didn't know there was a Future show tonight. Dammm it. (8 upvotes)
Just want a boyfriend for once  (8 upvotes)
HOW DO YOU SHAME SOMEONE FOR SUCKING DICK AND THEN SHAME THEM FOR NOT SUCKING DICK? bye ugly (14 upvotes)
Nothing sadder than guys desperately trying to pick up girls on yak on a Friday night instead of hitting up bars and parties and actually talking to girls. (17 upvotes)
genuinely do not know how to make new friends second semester (27 upvotes)
I hate using community bathrooms  (4 upvotes)
I wish I had someone to give neck and forehead kisses to. (36 upvotes)
17 minutes into Fuller House and I'm already like so cheesy  (21 upvotes)
Hate that I'm attracted to any guy who is remotely good looking. I have a mild crush in every class.  (14 upvotes)
How hard is it for an attractive girl to get into the mods?  (0 upvotes)
If trump wins, I'm leaving the Republican Party  (11 upvotes)
Do girls lust? (5 upvotes)
The snapchat face swap has me traumatized for life (7 upvotes)
Everything seems to be going wrong lately I'm worn out  (17 upvotes)
If I wanted to hear an organ I would go to church. Quit the shit, I'm trying to watch the hockey game.  (29 upvotes)
Just the fact I dont go out on friday nights makes me feel dumb/inferior (27 upvotes)
Rubio 2016 (13 upvotes)
I'm only 19, but already so salty (55 upvotes)
Learning to be okay with the fact that I don't like going out. Just wish I could find some other people like me to hangout with (51 upvotes)
I feel like I'm the only one at this school who has no friends (23 upvotes)
What conservatives want to band together to try and help jumpstart kasich's campaign? He's the only candidate that could win the presidential election against hillary  (5 upvotes)
Few things annoy me more than articles that make you read them as a slideshow (106 upvotes)
Upon second viewing, An Extremely Goofy Movie is actually An Extremely Emotional Movie  (48 upvotes)
When you're broke af but still tryna hit those wings (129 upvotes)
Professor: The grades were much better than I expected on the exam!  Me: FUCK (116 upvotes)
Just now realizing that my friends are completely different than me and we are living together next year... Idk what I'm supposed to do  (13 upvotes)
I wish I had rich parents because my parents deserve to be rich. (92 upvotes)
Come to Conte to support the Hockey Team! It's the last regular season game! (9 upvotes)
Is it possible to be on the bus after 7 on a Friday without hearing the word "pregame"? (26 upvotes)
Kinda want to drink. Kinda just want to stare at the cute cashier at the liquor store all night.  (13 upvotes)
This Snapchat face-swapping thing is just creepy (41 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"University of North CarolinaChapel Hill"
Location(35.9083, -79.05)
Poll: what do you call a carbonated fizzy drink you get at a fast food restaurant? (0 upvotes)
When your yak has four down votes so you put yourself out of your own misery (-2 upvotes)
UGH UNC DRYERS why are my clothes still wet after two full-powered cycles?!?! I can't afford this shit fam (1 upvotes)
Dook is Slytherin (0 upvotes)
I found the secret to losing 100 lbs in no time at all. Catch her in bed with your best friend (1 upvotes)
Why is slut shaming a thing? We should be slut faming! Fuck the haters, literally. #slutever   (1 upvotes)
The most egregious fallacy of modern times is the idea that quoting a historical figure out of context in such a way that supports your argument proves you right. (2 upvotes)
Walking through the caution tape around the quad like the badass I am... (0 upvotes)
"Sweetie can you put some salt on the floor? To keep the demons out" my grandma. This bitch crazy lmao (2 upvotes)
I shitpost so hard I'm not sure where the line between devils advocate and my real beliefs are  (1 upvotes)
Current level of grind in Davis: bloons tower defense 5 (6 upvotes)
I hate fucking microwaves that don't fucking just get the time set by pressing in the numbers. Like how do you screw that up?? (1 upvotes)
Idk why so many guys at this school have such an issue with female empowerment  (9 upvotes)
When you wake up at 3 and feel guilty about it for the rest of the day til you do it again tomorrow and the next day (7 upvotes)
"I need to find to the power but I need that new Ferrari man" Everybody listen to Vince Staples. He's a really good rapper and offers a great perspective on the issues facing minority communities. (0 upvotes)
Food trucks by Memorial Hall  (4 upvotes)
I try to tell myself that looks isn't everything, but I'm pretty ugly...can't change what I was born with, but I just don't feel confident. (3 upvotes)
You know you go to UNC when you get excited about prime seating and/or your favorite spot in Davis  (6 upvotes)
What are some good take out services besides takeout central? (0 upvotes)
Just by saying I'm conservative there are tons of people on this campus who hate me and refuse to talk to me yet they don't even begin to know anything about me... (5 upvotes)
Eminem offended a lot of people when he said he supported abortion in one of his songs in the 90s but in todays soicety he wouldbe praised by liberals. Now its like being pro life is offensive (-4 upvotes)
Lowkey scared af that Austell was monitoring and watching his students study in the library to gauge study habits (3 upvotes)
Me rn (11 upvotes)
I think I've unlocked the secret to time travel because my washer has been on 3 minutes for the past 30 minutes (18 upvotes)
Anyone on here watch rwby? (3 upvotes)
Happy Pokemon day!!  (5 upvotes)
My diet is best described as "unchaperoned child at birthday party." (90 upvotes)
Has anyone used EnvoyNow for delivery? (0 upvotes)
uh what's going on in the quad?? why is it taped off? (0 upvotes)
I asked a girl out to a popular restaurant around here. Should I make a reservation or will I look like a tryhard? (0 upvotes)
All you need to know about Trump is that the KKK endorses him (58 upvotes)
I'm so confused, MIT & Harvard are different schools or not? I'm not American so don't roast me (1 upvotes)
Poll: who do you want to win the election? Please don't downvote anyone's candidate; I'd really like to see what the breakdown is. (4 upvotes)
It's been more than 6 months since I've seen Inside Out and I still cry when I think of Bing Bong. (18 upvotes)
I just gave some tourists directions to the Old Well and got a geography degree from ECU (33 upvotes)
Seeing little kids wearing Duke sweatshirts on campus and having to resist the urge to ask them what the fuck they're doing #justUNCthings (35 upvotes)
The worst!! (18 upvotes)
My heart says brunch but my bank account says keurig and thin mints (30 upvotes)
I've seen many a yik yak debate where liberal viewpoints are grossly misrepresented by the dumbfucks. Liberals aren't idiots, I swear. (8 upvotes)
Anyone else worried af about the algorithms test on tuesday (1 upvotes)
This Ted talk has me in my feels. Be brave everyone  (3 upvotes)
I just woke up and I didn't even go out last night lol (3 upvotes)
Any girls interested in playing intramural street hockey? No experience required (3 upvotes)
How the hell am I supposed to pretend to be excited for my partner who's studying abroad when it means we'll almost never even get to speak for months?!?! (4 upvotes)
Great!having my first date with an awesome guy with my fractured arm in a sling & bringing a crutch with me in case I need it because he wouldn't let me stay home & feel sorry for myself  (6 upvotes)
I can't wait for Super Tuesday. (2 upvotes)
I love it when someone says something rude as fuck and then gets all offended when they're challenged on it, like "it was just a joke." (11 upvotes)
I interviewed for a MS degree at ECU (1 upvotes)
What's up with all this YOLO stuff? It's your own fault if you don't make any horcruxes. (69 upvotes)
For people driving home for the break using Zimride can help pay for gas. (-2 upvotes)
Dear roommate, if you are going to wake up early on a Saturday cool just don't turn your boombox on and scream on the phone (20 upvotes)
I hate having saggy balls because I am in constant fear of sitting on them  (10 upvotes)
Anyone know if Suttons does takeout? (3 upvotes)
Is it feasible to replace the rock beds around the UL with some nice flowers or greenery?  (10 upvotes)
Who's wants to hit today  (3 upvotes)
Cannot focus on studying at all  (4 upvotes)
Duke is puke, Wake is fake, the team I hate is UNC-R (29 upvotes)
Me today (9 upvotes)
The Chapel Carolina University North of the Hill  (47 upvotes)
I'm starting a movement, #bringback90shiphop (9 upvotes)
Has anyone felt uncomfortable after eating at Rams Head this morning? (9 upvotes)
What did the French copyright lawyer say to his wife?  Je (44 upvotes)
Fuck ice gained 15 pounds in the last 2 months wtf happened to my youthful metabolism? (6 upvotes)
Biology classes really know how to ruin a weekend, fuck you 205 (7 upvotes)
Is this marijuana gluten free? (29 upvotes)
Lost 13 lbs since the semester started  (36 upvotes)
some toddlers next to me at a restaurant are screaming "fuck fuck fuck fuck" and the look on their mother's face is priceless and i'm like, "same." (62 upvotes)
Best brunch in town? Need alcohol too  (-2 upvotes)
Do people seriously still think trickle down economics works? (3 upvotes)
Just saw my ex doing cardio at the gym I mean what's the point? It's not like he has a heart. (143 upvotes)
I think Grayson Allen is stuck in middle school when everyone thought it was funny to stick your leg out and try to trip people as they walked by (79 upvotes)
Best food on Franklin? (0 upvotes)
Give me good ideas for truth or dare questions/dares (1 upvotes)
Happy Pokemon Day everybody! (22 upvotes)
Is the vegetarian burger at al's good? (1 upvotes)
Why do guys as so different when you see them at a party than when you hang out with them in groups or like during the day time? They get so douchey at night lol (3 upvotes)
will suck a dick for swipes  (1 upvotes)
Today is a big day boys.... LET US DESTROY THE CAVALIERS AND CLAIM VICTORY  (49 upvotes)
This generation of liberals has the idea that republicans are just plain wrong. Can we actually believe that? Successful republican policies exist and are more successful than failed liberal ones. (-1 upvotes)
I don't trust anyone who buys a sports car in automatic.  (2 upvotes)
We meet again, arch nemesis (beer shits) (18 upvotes)
There's absolutely NO reason why your alarm should be going off REPEATEDLY on a Saturday. Turn the damn thing off  (12 upvotes)
Hey guys, the last 30 years have been... interesting... but can I have my Republican Party back now?          -a moderate of old money northeastern descent who doesn't want to have to vote for Hillary (27 upvotes)
I don't get Bernie supporters who say that if Hillary wins the nomination they won't vote or they'd rather vote for trump than Hillary. Can someone explain this phenomenon? (8 upvotes)
What's the cheapest place to get a haircut around here that I can walk to? (1 upvotes)
Someone take one for the team and be my best friend pls (9 upvotes)
someone please swipe us in pleazs (0 upvotes)
What is a good organization to join to make close friends (1 upvotes)
Anyone here play tennis and wanna hit later today (2 upvotes)
Is there any food on Franklin st or nearby that's as orgasmic as a burger from Al's? (0 upvotes)
You owe me 3 dollars  (3 upvotes)
Why do guys stare at you and then you confront them about it and they say they're not interested? (5 upvotes)
Woah the Decemberists playing in Rams. I never thought I'd see the day (5 upvotes)
Yooooo who's hype for pokemon s&m? (10 upvotes)
Batman v Superman will be a two hour tracking shot of every DC character crying in the rain (12 upvotes)
Puff the magic dragon is such a good song (5 upvotes)
Would you advise against taking two different languages at the same time? (0 upvotes)
Honestly screw everyone selling basketball tickets. (3 upvotes)
Pokemon_irl (14 upvotes)
The fruit salad of Grayson Allen's life contains nothing but cantaloupes (111 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"New York University"
Location(40.73, -73.995)
"New York University" sucks
"University of Rochester"
Location(43.1283, -77.6283)
I didn't realize we were having a drought  (0 upvotes)
I'm in that "watching Mister Rogers while crying" mood (1 upvotes)
This may or may not be my favorite thing ever (6 upvotes)
I'm visiting and have a very important question... Where can I go to get breakfast for dinner around here? (0 upvotes)
Damn, I miss sex  (4 upvotes)
Has anyone gone to the black deaf events? Can someone tell me about them (0 upvotes)
When your friends practically ignore you when they're around certain people  (3 upvotes)
I'm back at it again with the work cloths (0 upvotes)
I'm gonna do it yak...I'm gonna hook up w/ someone this weekend despite only pulling it off one time last semester...believe in me y'all  (6 upvotes)
Need some opinions on online dating...  (2 upvotes)
How is "The Mane Attraction" at the U of R? I can't find any reviews online (3 upvotes)
Haley (0 upvotes)
Life of Pablo = Dank (6 upvotes)
I wanna smoke (0 upvotes)
When you realized the money is not going into your account until money, cuz banks are closed on weekends  (-1 upvotes)
I didn't get any for 3 months and now I've hooked up with 3 girls this week. Not sure if statistical anomaly or increase in market value  (13 upvotes)
I love it when my TA sends me an email to my email address that has my name in it, and still spells my name wrong. Broski it's not that hard to spell. Get with it. (6 upvotes)
All of these depressed, sad, lonely people... how can we make this a better place for you? (8 upvotes)
That moment when you're playing a game and the AI decides to cheat  (6 upvotes)
I kinda wanna start learning programming but I don't know where to start. Should I learn Java first and then learn Javascript since scripting is more complicated? (3 upvotes)
Getting real tired of listening to other people's music  (-2 upvotes)
Fuck dke. You guys aren't bros you're assholes. Kids at other schools who get way more girls than you are also way more chill. You're aggressive for no reason and you make everyones time here worse.  (30 upvotes)
I need opinions from girls on a subject  (0 upvotes)
How to I tell my partner I want to try pet play. I'd love to wear a collar act like a little kitten  (2 upvotes)
Nights with my boyfriend are the best  (5 upvotes)
Word of the day: hobgoblin  (4 upvotes)
Senpai hasn't noticed me  (5 upvotes)
6am. Finally going to bed after completing 2 webworks in a row. Another personal record beaten. (9 upvotes)
That moment when you wake up and everyone's talking about love and their right hand (6 upvotes)
Depression + social anxiety is the worst combo. Nice people want to support me struggling with depression but then I gotta deal with the social anxiety (23 upvotes)
Jesus being sick sucks. Literally wake up every hour to the sweats  (9 upvotes)
Being in love is the scariest yet most amazing feeling in he world.  As a currently inebriated human I can say this indubitably (26 upvotes)
Tfw it's almost 4 AM and you're thirsty af and girls don't use yik yak (-2 upvotes)
What's going on in front of canal? (1 upvotes)
Just got done working the pole!  (4 upvotes)
Jill always pleases me. She gets me. it's like she's a part of me.oh she's my right hand. (4 upvotes)
I think my little hates me :( (13 upvotes)
I'm in love with my best friend but she's out of my league and I'd never date her because I wouldn't want to risk our friendship. It's funny these things happen. (4 upvotes)
So wait. Let me get this straight. You can't take my organs from my dead body without my permission, but you can tell me whether or not I can abort a child? Someone logic this out for me.. (17 upvotes)
I literally can't have roommates I don't fuck with any of these people  (4 upvotes)
I'm the third wheel to three couples. Wonderful (28 upvotes)
When you find out the person you've been crushing on has a gf  (39 upvotes)
When you hate someone so much that you wanna fuck the shit out of them. (16 upvotes)
I now realize staying up late was a mistake seeing that I have to be at work tomorrow at 5:45am (2 upvotes)
Honestly, my bed is better than parties (53 upvotes)
Can't be the only one at the dorms who needs sex  (1 upvotes)
People who lack confidence see it as villainy in the hands of others. (1 upvotes)
Whose in the Dorms? #Mcc (1 upvotes)
I just feel so empty and drained. (13 upvotes)
These nuts (0 upvotes)
Things are incredibly strange between my best friend and I... And I don't know what to do  (7 upvotes)
For a second I forgot how amazing I am. Then I took a step back and realized I can fix my flaws with effort. (3 upvotes)
Holiday Inn dp? (-1 upvotes)
Anyone at lux? (-2 upvotes)
I feel stupid and unable to compete with my peers here, but at the same time I'm super shocked/proud that I've been able to overcome so much to get here.  (33 upvotes)
I didn't do that well on my first exam of the semester. *sigh* anyone wanna be my study buddy?  (18 upvotes)
I've been single and just doin me and I love it but damn, really starting to miss relationships. (5 upvotes)
I don't even know....How do I? When do I? Should I even?  (0 upvotes)
Chi Phi has coat hangers now, god bless (23 upvotes)
Anyone took megabus before to nyc? How's it?  (0 upvotes)
Go to college they said. There's a bunch of confused boys wanting to experiment they said.  (23 upvotes)
My roommates friend is straight up passed out on our bathroom floor.... (8 upvotes)
Wait come back, I liked you. And I wanted to suck your dick.  (6 upvotes)
When you discover that lemon juice makes vodka sodas tolerable  (2 upvotes)
New hobby: eating (7 upvotes)
That stupid fucking dog in RV is back. If it keeps barking I am seriously going to have the RA find it. (6 upvotes)
If you share NowThis posts, we can't be friends. (2 upvotes)
General question: what do you think about Rey in star wars episode 7 ? (0 upvotes)
Is Saferide Home free? (8 upvotes)
Fuck FALSA and the federal government (4 upvotes)
Yo KD stop with the  noise (23 upvotes)
Trump supporters let's meet up this weekend for a rally (2 upvotes)
So glad the Vagina Monologues did a thing about transwomen  (23 upvotes)
Till now I've always got by on my own, I never really cared until I met you  (5 upvotes)
Fuck the people that leave their clothes in the dryer/washer for an eternity (28 upvotes)
UR MENS HOCKEY WON 10-6! They play in the championship game tomorrow at 4, come out and show your support!!! (30 upvotes)
Turnip tonight gonna be lit (1 upvotes)
Can a course overlap between your cluster and major  (0 upvotes)
Be very careful when you go out tonight...some bastard last night pulled out a pair of scissors on me, and luckily I pulled out a rock. If I had pulled out a paper, he would've won. (95 upvotes)
What's happening in wilder 6 (6 upvotes)
I'm all shaved and lotioned up, now I just need someone to fuck (9 upvotes)
Another Friday night spent friendless, dateless and alone. Isn't college great ? (26 upvotes)
Question: Why do people punch the handicap button like they have something to prove? (22 upvotes)
Somebody punch this drunk bitch @ bill grays in the face pls (7 upvotes)
Very bored at work. No customers. Everything's cleaned up. No more work to do. 3 more hours to go. Entertain me? (1 upvotes)
How do you check if your refund is in yet? I got the email but I'm lost lol (0 upvotes)
I have seen how so many people have deluded views on political standpoints so I now am going to educate you people with fact checked statements for once. (3 upvotes)
Vaginas. (67 upvotes)
Does everyone at this school have some sort of anxiety prob? (49 upvotes)
Funny roommate stories? (5 upvotes)
Whoever wrote "Kylo Ren is a punk bitch" on that one poster, please come forth so I can marry you (48 upvotes)
Orgy? (4 upvotes)
I do it for the yakarma (6 upvotes)
I want a girl with a nice ass (0 upvotes)
I fuck with in my room by yellow claw big time (-2 upvotes)
There's two types of people in this world. People who wear underwear underneath their long Johns and people who go commando under their long johns. (13 upvotes)
My phone just corrected "Church" to "Chipotle".  I can live with this. (108 upvotes)
Fuck you grey boot. (1 upvotes)
My best friend and I are having our weekly dinner date but since we're both indecisive as fuck and want to eat everything, does anyone have any suggestions!  (4 upvotes)
LoveJoy time your fucking laundry. There's only a few machines for a whole building to use. Do your shit and then get out  (10 upvotes)
What's the big deal with I transfer and not graduate with my associates  (1 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"Brandeis University"
Location(42.3657, -71.2597)
Tfw your life has a fiscal cliff (7 upvotes)
Small college....where a group of friends with shit on each other and then party together later  (0 upvotes)
Cheers to all the people who made it to a toilet last night instead of throwing up on my rug. (7 upvotes)
The problem with attractive people at Brandeis is that y'all know you're like 3% of the populous so you can be conceited without consequences  (17 upvotes)
When you get a snapchat but don't open it immediately, tryna play it cool (13 upvotes)
Seriously whats with the ass eating thing with this generation? Why would you put your mouth, the hole you eat with on the hole someone shits from..... Gross.    (7 upvotes)
I like my girls like I like my composers: sad and Slavic.  (14 upvotes)
My girlfriend is like the square root of -100. She's a perfect ten. But she's also imaginary.  (18 upvotes)
So what happened in ziv 129 last night? (2 upvotes)
Winnie the Pooh feels like Bern. (6 upvotes)
S/O to whoever threw up all over bathroom door in Woodland Floor 2 guys bathroom  (0 upvotes)
When you realize what cake means in "cake by the ocean."  (3 upvotes)
When you're afraid of befriending someone because you fear that it'll turn sexual.. (15 upvotes)
If you think sex is only about shoving a dick in a hole you're doing sex wrong (38 upvotes)
I try to be a good person, I swear I do. Shit just gets so hard sometimes. Life isn't easy. (9 upvotes)
Need to clear my mind. Any suggestions? (1 upvotes)
That moment when you're making out but your jam comes on and you really just want to dance but there's a tongue down your throat so you just sort of awkwardly bounce (29 upvotes)
I always forget that I hate the feeling of being drunk until I'm drunk... (19 upvotes)
Bryan is nice (1 upvotes)
When someone your interested in asks your best friend out on a date  (39 upvotes)
Why are the people on the baseball team literal human garbage?  (25 upvotes)
Is the kings and queens ball dance lit ? (4 upvotes)
Rediscovered my love for cuddling today (46 upvotes)
Dear Shapiro Stoners. Plastic bags are good for 2 things. Groceries and covering your fire alarm. I suggest that latter. Love, literally everyone.  (35 upvotes)
Was a party in Ziv 129 just shut down by the police? (7 upvotes)
I'm just so disillusioned by everyone I've met here. I'd leave if I didn't want my degree, or transfer if all the credits at this school weren't fcking useless to other uni's. (7 upvotes)
You know you're on JSwipe when dating profiles resemble LinkedIn.  (19 upvotes)
You can't help but think about how shriveled the south street flasher's dick must be with how cold it is outside  (29 upvotes)
Lts got me fucked up (4 upvotes)
When you have to schedule time to cry from stress into your day (29 upvotes)
You ever look at people who you used to be close with and get a sinking feeling in your heart? (40 upvotes)
Where's adphi? (0 upvotes)
Where my jews at  (9 upvotes)
It drives me absolutely nuts when people are so fucking loud outside of the village/ziv every night until like 2 am. Anyone else? (6 upvotes)
Upperclassmen, can y'all rank the best housing for sophomores? -Sincerely someone who has no idea (10 upvotes)
Tha depression hitting hard.  (21 upvotes)
Why do asians wear masks all the time?  (5 upvotes)
The most action I get in the club is when the bouncer pats me down (46 upvotes)
How can we get tickets to hear the talk with Anita Hill and Kerry Washington????  (6 upvotes)
We should look at the fruit salad of people's lives  (11 upvotes)
BRANDEIS WHAT'S HAPPENIN TONIGHT (3 upvotes)
That awkward moment when your girlfriend dresses up more for class than a date... (14 upvotes)
I've had too many bad experiences wth guys that neglected me and treated me poorly. Now I'm seeing a nice guy and keep getting insecure that he'll turn neglectful, too. Help? (10 upvotes)
Does Adphi start at 9 or 10? (-1 upvotes)
Is there anything at all happening tonight? (0 upvotes)
Free blue moon at jocos (7 upvotes)
Dear straight boys, I can suck your dick way better than your girlfriend can.  (0 upvotes)
Feeling so lazy but I want to party (4 upvotes)
That moment when you have too much food in the dorm that you don't wanna see go to waste so you eat three packets of oatmeal for dinner  (15 upvotes)
Mad Max: Fury Road>>>> (13 upvotes)
Trump for Orange Supremacy (6 upvotes)
Tfw you are in a uber with the driver alone, and you really needed to fart  and your ride is not close to over yet  (4 upvotes)
How is every male on this campus 3 ft tall? (-1 upvotes)
I want to study abroad, but my mother told me that's a terrible thing to call a woman. (36 upvotes)
Anyone else having eduroam connection issues or am I the only one? (5 upvotes)
Watching Fuller House aka reliving my childhood (10 upvotes)
Girl Scouts. SCC.  (5 upvotes)
parties tonight? (0 upvotes)
What classes have really low exam averages? Like 30-40% (0 upvotes)
I spend a embarrassingly large amount of my free time dancing around my house and twerking/whining in front of mirrors.  (19 upvotes)
Brandeis girl with glasses singing while walking down the hill, you are wonderful and gorgeous and thank you for existing (30 upvotes)
I will now roll to determine your chances of getting a ride. *pause* I will be there in 5 turns (11 upvotes)
I've forgotten to take my birth control since Tuesday and I just woke up bleeding.... fucking fantastic (31 upvotes)
I want to become a neckbeard who wears a Fedora and tips it to females around campus saying "m'lady" (18 upvotes)
Totally blew that biological bases test (9 upvotes)
You don't need to go far to study abroad: SDT parties are only a few blocks away. (6 upvotes)
Tripped cause I was too busy staring at dogs... Wouldn't change a thing  (61 upvotes)
Is there anything going on this weekend @Brandeis, party wise? (3 upvotes)
When you click "price:low to high" and the low is still too high (140 upvotes)
The sun burns my eyes.  (11 upvotes)
The ultimate 'text me back' day (10 upvotes)
Tip: Never just reach to your night stand & grab the nearest tube to use as lube. Accidentally picked up IcyHot cream. It felt great for 30 minutes...then burned like hell for 3 hours.  (8 upvotes)
GET UP! Time waits for no one  (10 upvotes)
Do you ever feel that you joined the wrong frat/sorority? Or wish that you never joined one in the first place? (13 upvotes)
What does it mean when someone says you're the good kind of asshole? Don't say an actual asshole  (6 upvotes)
The hash-slinging...the crash-flinging...the South Street Flasher!!! (37 upvotes)
I'd really appreciate if the people singing loudly and badly in the cable lounge would leave but I don't wanna be that kid to kick them out ugh (3 upvotes)
My GPA is so low it's got boots with the fur (141 upvotes)
I don't hate my roommate, I just hate living with people, especially my roommate. (50 upvotes)
GAHH WHO ELSE DABS  (5 upvotes)
Russian men are so fine (1 upvotes)
Is summer internship experience super important if I decided to go to grad school right after college? Ps: I'm a junior who's feeling like a loser that all your friends are busy with interns  (9 upvotes)
Fucking girl scout cookies man.. Makes me feel bad about myself (3 upvotes)
Me on tinder: Ew Ew Ew Ew Ew Not ew Hey  Ew (47 upvotes)
does anyone else feel like the water in Waltham is horrible for washing hair?? my hair always feels so sticky in the shower & when I go home & wash it over break suddenly it looks 100% better (18 upvotes)
partyy in foreat 309 (2 upvotes)
Does anyone else have ocd that affects their relationships? (12 upvotes)
Why did I watch the GOP Debate? None of them are going to write this damned operations midterm. (28 upvotes)
Honestly the Study Abroad office at Brandeis is incredibly deceptive- do your own research before you dedicate yourself to a program please! (16 upvotes)
Brandeis. I get that everyone smokes but for real where's the nudes  (8 upvotes)
There's a special place in hell for people that come to the "quiet sections" of the library to socialize.  (119 upvotes)
Does anyone else get scared of weirdos breaking into their home while they're falling asleep (26 upvotes)
Impacts of over 10,000 Newtons are great for your pores  (11 upvotes)
WHO ORDERED THE MASSEUSE IN THE VILLAGE (36 upvotes)
To the cute boy in the village gym who ran like 8 miles: you looked super hot and I wish I got your number  (12 upvotes)
Wish I loved working out as much as I love alcohol  (67 upvotes)
Cute boy at village gym  (10 upvotes)
When ya yik yak game strong, ya life strong. (2 upvotes)
I feel like I'm gonna be single forever because no one really cares about me that much to start something meaningful....... (11 upvotes)
Wazzzzzzzz guuuuuuud? (3 upvotes)
Why do all the wrong people profess their love for me?? (26 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"College of William and Mary"
Location(37.2711, -76.7075)
"Sex positivity" *downvotes all yaks and replies pertaining to porn* (1 upvotes)
Just lost the game (2 upvotes)
If Trump hates immigrants why is he married to one? (11 upvotes)
Nothing like midterms to get you to have a crisis about the path you've taken for the past 2 years  (11 upvotes)
Is there a trick to swiping into piano rooms in Jamestown? I've gotten in without a problem before but I haven't been able to get in the past few days  (6 upvotes)
People in Ludwell please kindly take your finished laundry out of the washers and dryers. You're being rude. (5 upvotes)
Can students park at Ludwell without W&M parking pass?   (2 upvotes)
Does anyone here actually LIKE Sodexo?  (5 upvotes)
*Tour group comes through campus. Frat Guy: "Who do you know here?" (16 upvotes)
Today's productivity includes catching up on HTGAWM and watching Fuller House  (7 upvotes)
Anyone live in DuPont and have measuring cups and spoons they would be willing to lend. I promise to wash and return them.  (5 upvotes)
Nothing like studying the entire day on a Saturday (11 upvotes)
"Pickup artists" and "garbage men" should swap titles (6 upvotes)
My bf is a real great guy but I'm getting annoyed with how flakey he is. It's starting to feel like my time and our time together isn't respected but I don't know how to handle it.  (8 upvotes)
I really need to have sex omfg (5 upvotes)
When your curiosity fucks shit up  (11 upvotes)
Good luck W&M bball v JMU!  (8 upvotes)
I live vicariously through cool people's snap stories  (21 upvotes)
Good job mooyah  (40 upvotes)
Just sitting and minding my own business when my body has a panic attack  (6 upvotes)
I think I hate my friends (10 upvotes)
Bloomberg for president 2k16 (1 upvotes)
Yik yak is broken (4 upvotes)
When you're sick Netflix and Chill becomes Netflix be be ill  (10 upvotes)
What's at caf now? (2 upvotes)
Does anyone know when next semester's course catalog will be posted? (12 upvotes)
Me as a Girl Scout: *knocks on door* "would you like to buy Girl Scout cookies? Me now: *knocks on door* "would you like to sell me Girl Scout cookies?" (31 upvotes)
SPRING BREAK IS 6 DAYS AWAY CHAMPS, we can do this!!!!!! (31 upvotes)
If you need motivation, just remember that Blow Out is only 62 days away (28 upvotes)
I'll be honest I really ,truly believe that America , even with all its faults and problems, is without a dour the most culturally diverse country in the world and the best country in the world .  (2 upvotes)
Red bull is made in Switzerland . Let that sink in for a second  (-4 upvotes)
Sadler music is way too hype for this hangover  (5 upvotes)
Ted Cruz is the zodiac killer #teachthecomtroversy (23 upvotes)
If I'm understanding very introductory IR correctly, the United States and the United Nations should swap names (31 upvotes)
Professor be like "close your eyes and take a deep breath if you're struggling on exam"  (31 upvotes)
Has anyone seen girl scouts on campus or by food lion or anything? (6 upvotes)
Besides pizza, what places deliver to campus  (3 upvotes)
I wanna create a device that lets women pee standing up and sell them in those Tylenol dispensers that you see at the mall but in really dirty bathrooms instead (9 upvotes)
Was looking for creepy places on campus but ended up finding something interesting.. (22 upvotes)
Just found out a sausage biscuit I paid for at Barnes and noble is expired . I already ate three bites, will I get food poisoning?  (4 upvotes)
Anyone want to play some soccer? (2 upvotes)
Dre from omelet station please marry me  (20 upvotes)
After six months of experimentation, my trick coins finally work! No more paying for laundry! (11 upvotes)
Oishii knows what's up  (25 upvotes)
Anyone here for the erg sprints? (6 upvotes)
So, the stuff in the harbor, right? (15 upvotes)
Some guys are horrendous kissers. It's not that hard just try to refrain from continuously shoving your tongue down my throat. (23 upvotes)
Yay it's the weekend (4 upvotes)
Why was college deli so busy last night? (2 upvotes)
How late is acceptable to let your roommate sleep before you start doing stuff? I need to turn on the lights and do work but don't want to be rude... (11 upvotes)
CLETE RIGHT !!!! (5 upvotes)
When you can't be yourself around your pledge class  (7 upvotes)
KATYPERRY IS JONBENET RAMSEY- WAKE UP AMERICA!!!!!! (3 upvotes)
when you order breakfast at sadler (46 upvotes)
Trump as a Pokemon  (67 upvotes)
Nothing annoys Nova people more than calling them "southerners" (52 upvotes)
Do you have to speak Greek in the Greek houses (46 upvotes)
There's a drunk dinosaur in the caf... Must be campus golf (43 upvotes)
Hey does anyone know where you can get skim milk at the caf and if its good (i.e. not rotten)? (7 upvotes)
When you find out that there's one more midterm than you thought you'd have. <<<<<<<<<< (13 upvotes)
Still in denial about Gravity Falls being over (5 upvotes)
One more week and we are out  lets do this (23 upvotes)
Black boot will make America great again (17 upvotes)
Damn, Australia can cram harder than me. (62 upvotes)
When Lana Del Rey gets to you  (65 upvotes)
Okay rly how long until being dumped isn't the only thing I can ever think about  (7 upvotes)
I forgot how good breakfast at the caf is.  (12 upvotes)
Campus golf!!!  (35 upvotes)
everyone I've met here is so perfect, it's really inspiring, but at the same time it makes me feel bad about myself (13 upvotes)
I'm an animal in bed. More specifically, a koala bear. I can sleep 20 sometimes even 22 hours a day! (110 upvotes)
What do you do when you experience the sudden bursts of loneliness when you are alone? (16 upvotes)
Stop calling us a student body. We refuse to be objectified in this way! (24 upvotes)
I'm so bored with my life here because I don't know anyone who parties. Should I go Greek? (9 upvotes)
I really wish the gym opened earlier than 10am. (27 upvotes)
HOUSE OF CARDS ON FRIDAY AAHAAHHH (15 upvotes)
Happy Campus Golf 2016!!! Feel free to bring coffee or food or a special treat to your caddy.  (39 upvotes)
Not much of a poetry person, but this one spoke to me  (79 upvotes)
I can always tell it's Saturday by the way I'm awake when my alarm doesn't go off.  (42 upvotes)
Good morning, fellow TWAMPs! It's a beautiful day (21 upvotes)
Aaaaand I'm awake. Happens when you go to sleep at 10:30 on a Friday night. (44 upvotes)
In terms of politics, it seems like everything is quickly getting much worse everywhere in the world except Canada. (16 upvotes)
UGHHH I can't sleep  (6 upvotes)
Is tom schalk living in Williamsburg or are we lucky enough to see his beauty only when he visits  (18 upvotes)
Bless KD for giving us a reasonable tee time and not scheduling us at the crack of fucking dawn  (92 upvotes)
Sometimes I wish I could just leave in the middle of the night and start over somewhere no one knows me (29 upvotes)
Damn Daniel got a lifetime supply of van shoes and I can't even get a text back (38 upvotes)
Every university: "yes, our students are well-adjusted individuals who are happy, secure, and have low stress levels." Every student: if someone hit me with a bus, I'd probably thank them." (239 upvotes)
The hardest part about being a vegan is waking up at 5 am every day to milk the almonds. (156 upvotes)
this can't be physically possible  (114 upvotes)
yo males who I don't know who put their hands around my waist when trying to get around me- "excuse me" works better and doesn't startle me/make me hate you for touching me  (132 upvotes)
If you had asked me two years ago I never would have guessed that today I would be in a place in life where I'm just grateful that I don't want to die rn  (83 upvotes)
In the aeroplane over the sea (8 upvotes)
Graceful way to split with roommate/tell them you don't want to room together next year? (15 upvotes)
I somehow feel as though I've commited a sin siding 18% with ol' Donald (39 upvotes)
Girls are the most people qualified to clean up after a murder. We learn how to get blood out of pretty much anything since the age of ten, pretty hardcore  (142 upvotes)
Tonight was... Something. (18 upvotes)
24 hour wawa? Why not infinite wawa? We have the technology  (66 upvotes)
Closing out of all of the computer tabs after a test/paper will forever bring the greatest feeling of relief. (312 upvotes)
I'm voting for white girl & black guy (20 upvotes)
Wildcard! (38 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"Georgia Institute of Technology"
Location(33.7758, -84.3947)
"Georgia Institute of Technology" sucks
"Case Western Reserve University"
Location(41.5042, -81.6084)
What a beautiful day. Get outside!  (0 upvotes)
Everyone bashes Trump on Facebook. Meanwhile everyone is voting for him (4 upvotes)
90% of any social interaction for me is repeating "don't say any awkward shit" over in my head.  (4 upvotes)
Is there anywhere on campus I could go to use wood stain or gloss? (1 upvotes)
It's easy to call Trump supporters ignorant idiots, but try to remember that most of them are working class individuals who didn't have the privilege of a good education like we did. (5 upvotes)
Instead of requesting work off on the days/times when he has class, my co-worker constantly asks people to cover for him. It is so annoying. (6 upvotes)
There's a girl in my class that I want to talk to, but I have literally no good excuse to strike up a conversation. I'm pretty sure she doesn't know I exist. How do I approach this? (7 upvotes)
Any fellow Amish on this campus? (0 upvotes)
Hey guys, I'm not straight but I certainly not gay  (1 upvotes)
All the guys on the football field can get it (4 upvotes)
How do I tell a guy that I like him? I don't want to date him tho  (5 upvotes)
Just bought a set of metal chopsticks so I can feel sophisticated whilst eating my ramen. (18 upvotes)
PSA: the 3rd floor stacks in KSL aren't a place for you to take phone calls or munch loudly on rice crackers. Please shut the hell up or go downstairs  (25 upvotes)
People, get your damn laundry out of the machines when it's done (12 upvotes)
Paper is due at 8pm, which means I have four hours less than expected to write it. Time for the shitfest to begin. (13 upvotes)
Why vote for Bernie when you have Babs? Does Bernie have a weather machine? I don't think so. (17 upvotes)
I'm in pursuit of a spiritual experience (7 upvotes)
When people ask about my position on illegal immigration, I have two words for them: attack dogs. No walls, no guards, just dogs. Attack dogs. ... Welcome to my party. Vote for me if you want to live. (3 upvotes)
Damn DG picked a perfect day for formal (20 upvotes)
Why isn't it socially acceptable to be drunk before noon? Why does it matter what time I started?  (10 upvotes)
Everyone come out to Carlton Commons tonight at 7! There will be middle eastern food and belly dancers #itsgonnabelit (7 upvotes)
John Stamos looks exactly the same in Fuller House as he did in Full House. He'll be hot forever. (22 upvotes)
What do I put if I don't care if I live in gender inclusive housing or not (5 upvotes)
Come to TSNL tonight at 7 in the Thwing Ballroom! You can win prizes and get extra credit in Chem 106 for going - Drew Meyer is judging! (7 upvotes)
Is it abnormal to have left wing views on everything but immigration? (1 upvotes)
You depend on our protection, yet you feed us lies from the tablecloth! (2 upvotes)
Where the bad bitches at (-2 upvotes)
does anyone know where you go to win the room selection first pick??? (0 upvotes)
I respect people who share very personal stories about their struggles publicly, but when you're posting sob stories on Facebook every other day, you're probably being an attention-seeker. (25 upvotes)
Do you have a crush on someone that's already taken? (11 upvotes)
I think one of the great things about this country is the built in mind set not to trust the central government. This is almost a de facto checks and balances mechanism. Its seen in apple legal battle (6 upvotes)
Soccer boys = great workout inspiration  (24 upvotes)
Anyone else here not want kids? (14 upvotes)
"Do not stand at my grave and weep. / I am not there, I do not sleep. / I am a thousand winds that blow. / I am the softly falling snow." Rest in peace. (17 upvotes)
The first piss after a night of drinking (39 upvotes)
I get such bad fomo on weekends, like please include me before I die (11 upvotes)
Yak's so dead (6 upvotes)
I don't miss us being together, I just miss the sex (17 upvotes)
I hate the thought of getting old and settling down. Maybe I just haven't met the right person. But at the same time I want a family. (15 upvotes)
The human animal (57 upvotes)
IT'S MY FUCKIN BIRTHDAY (32 upvotes)
If there's a deadline coming up and I already sent a reminder to someone writing me a recommendation letter would it be rude to send them another one a couple days before? (7 upvotes)
IM UGLY AND IM PROUD! (32 upvotes)
I am a straight male and not a fan of hookup culture. I don't look down on others who do it but it's not me.  (14 upvotes)
Aaaaaand it's 4 AM again. Whoops (26 upvotes)
You're really nice and all; I just don't have anything to give you right now. Someone else took it all. (17 upvotes)
Taking off my bra while drunk is difficult. I wish I had a nice girl to help me. Like not even sex just a nice girl to be there for me (25 upvotes)
You guys are crazy if you think this country can run without undocumented  immigrants. (13 upvotes)
I feel desperate from time to time, but I wouldn't see myself any better elsewhere (10 upvotes)
Drink a glass of water, then go to sleep. Nothing good happens after 2am. (78 upvotes)
Why are the rooms so motherfucking hot (27 upvotes)
If you feel bad about yourself, just know that this kid from my high school thinks all sperm are genetically identical  (22 upvotes)
"Yes I'm fine" I say to my friends, having recently relapsed self-harming and having really bad depression days. Everything is super a-ok (15 upvotes)
All I think about anymore is hooking up with you again  (9 upvotes)
Why was I born ugly? (14 upvotes)
My suitemate is having sex and my next door neighbor is having sex. I feel like a piece of bread sandwiched between salamis (52 upvotes)
I'm currently watching a Korean guy live-stream himself eating a shit ton of food.. what.. what's wrong with me? (11 upvotes)
When what you say makes sense to you and no one else.  #chariesheen (3 upvotes)
Donald Trump: attracting the racist, misogynists since 2015. (38 upvotes)
Republicans are red Democrats are blue Neither one of them Gives a shit about you. (41 upvotes)
AM, I doubt you'll see this because I don't think you use yik yak, but I like you. A lot. I don't want to ruin our friendship though, so sadly, I will probably never say this to your face (5 upvotes)
Nothing like good beer after hard working day! (8 upvotes)
Stop trying to be politically informed and start living so freely that government doesn't matter (6 upvotes)
I wanted to take you home but i guess that would not be the best idea (3 upvotes)
It's pure instince  (-1 upvotes)
Will suck dick for dank memes (7 upvotes)
PARTY NEW RES HALL 540  (3 upvotes)
Who's trying to fuck (-1 upvotes)
Why is Michelson 6 so damn obnoxious all the time.. If anyone needs somewhere to go they're so loud I think that's enough of an invitation (5 upvotes)
Idk how much more disappointment I can take. I just keep getting let down. No wonder people become distant and cynical  (13 upvotes)
inb4 salty/ edgy kids get "disenfranchised" after HRC wins the primary (7 upvotes)
I can't tell what's worse: the fact that I was drunk on a Wednesday or sober on a Friday night (39 upvotes)
For the unaware: you don't have to vote for only either a Democrat or Republican. Stop wasting your time. (-1 upvotes)
I thought saw a bunch of case kids trying to whip.. Turns out they were just practicing the right hand rule  (141 upvotes)
You know its lit when there is a mosh pit at Jollys! (14 upvotes)
So. Was walking, phone was dead. Walk past leutner and see crush out of the corner of my eye eating dinner w a couple of friends. I stop, turn around and realize a group of kids just saw me randomly (0 upvotes)
What's there to do in Cleveland on a Friday night? 21 m from TN bored in a hotel  (3 upvotes)
When men have sex with lots of women they're "players" but when I do it I'm a "lesbian". double standard much? (57 upvotes)
"Trolling" is not an excuse to be a dick (15 upvotes)
Everyone look up Rocco Botte (-2 upvotes)
I have no idea how to study for an exam with Saab.  (4 upvotes)
How many people apply for housing alone? (3 upvotes)
Seeking conversation with a fellow human. (1 upvotes)
I think I'm constipated guess I'll have chipotle tomorrow (26 upvotes)
If you told me that a month from now I would know your name, you would be insane. (4 upvotes)
Whose moms are those in the front row?? #battleofthebands (2 upvotes)
Come dance! Four DJs $5 after 10. 18+ (2 upvotes)
Currently in a relationship with Toaster strudels  (42 upvotes)
Euclid tavern/happy dog soooo quiet now (6 upvotes)
To the guy who said I had a nice voice in tink today, I appreciate you. (17 upvotes)
People still using the "it was an experiment" excuse to be an asshole? (1 upvotes)
I support my friend through thick and thin while our other friends don't, yet she always finds ways to defend them. She deserves better than that from them. (19 upvotes)
Dear jolly, stop feeding the sound guy alcohol, he's fucking up everyone's sound. (60 upvotes)
To Musicians: is it normal to require >20 hours of practice on half a page of sheet music and still be unable to play along with youtube at 0.5 speed? Sincerely: Engineer who is a violinist for fun (19 upvotes)
Why have crushes when you can sit in the dark and watch Rick and Morty for five hours straight.  (80 upvotes)
Sometimes I wonder what drew meyer would look like if he shaved his beard  (36 upvotes)
I thought I had friends here. But now I just feel abandoned by them all. I hate this feeling.  (18 upvotes)
Watching cheaters on YouTube.  (3 upvotes)
A fence separated the Case Institute of Technology and Western Reserve University campuses until 1948.  (68 upvotes)
I don't like writing papers (13 upvotes)
Babs > Trump (86 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"UC Santa Barbara"
Location(34.4125, -119.8481)
Waking up drunk sucks  (0 upvotes)
When you thought it was some douchey boys playing music but it was actually just some douchey girls  (0 upvotes)
Let me stick my morning wood in you...#romantic (0 upvotes)
how did people do on the guo 6a midterm? (0 upvotes)
How long do you think you could go bring a completely morally upstanding person?  (0 upvotes)
Is one allowed to drink in the library? (1 upvotes)
Need a relationship with substance and not just sexual attraction, feels like I'm gonna be alone forever (1 upvotes)
Thoughts on anal sex?  (1 upvotes)
This town needs a batman (5 upvotes)
Is my hand going to permanently smell like salt lime and tequila... (2 upvotes)
When guys walk you home after sex > thanks  (4 upvotes)
How does a backwards poet write his poems? Inverse!  #JokeADay (6 upvotes)
Fuck. Everything. (0 upvotes)
ay mami ven conmigo (0 upvotes)
If I could have you back again I'd think about it once or twice, I guess. If I could have you back I'd reconsider, maybe I'd say yes. On the other hand it would be Better to have a life. (2 upvotes)
We young, it's our time  (0 upvotes)
Did anyone in IV find my keys? Navy Blue lanyard that says University of California in gold then Santa Barbara in white, three keys on it, a dorm key a bike key and a po box key with a whale keychain (2 upvotes)
If it wasn't for dickheads like you, there wouldn't be any thievery in this world, would there? (1 upvotes)
I'm tired of these mothafuckin' burglaries, in this mothafuckin' town! (8 upvotes)
Gauchos, WHAT CAN WE DO TO STOP CRIME IN OUR TOWN (8 upvotes)
Guy I'm hooking up with always initiates conversation but is never the one to say hey lets hang out...can't tell if he's still interested cuz he's still texting me but never invites me over anymore  (1 upvotes)
Daredevil season 2 is coming out right at the end of finals week  (3 upvotes)
Is anything happening toduay (-1 upvotes)
Parks review is tomorrow right? Last time it was on a Saturday (1 upvotes)
Whoever's playing Grimes I can hear it from FT (1 upvotes)
S/o to all the people at the gym who aren't as strong as they want to be yet but are working so hard on it  y'all deserve so much love and respect (11 upvotes)
Chyeah used to squat like four plates in high school, but that was like in high school I'm over lifting now so I can't do it anymore.  Sure bro sure  (3 upvotes)
 it's clit  (1 upvotes)
I shattered a hell of a dry spell with a Swedish girl last night and goddammit, if she is at all a reflection of the rest of the Swedish population, those people are wonderful love makers.  (7 upvotes)
This girl next to me at the library is chewing her gum like a cow and is typing on her keyboard so freaking loud. Holy fuck, can you be any more annoying? (14 upvotes)
I don't know how to go about asking a guy if he wants to come over to just hang and cuddle  (3 upvotes)
Changing out of pajamas just so roommates stop judging me.  (4 upvotes)
How the hell did Asher Roth wake up at 10 the night after passing out at 3. I be waking up at 12 every weekend even when I'm not drunk  (13 upvotes)
Is there any place to get free plan b?  (0 upvotes)
I killed last nights dance competition with the dance from "Thriller" -master tortoise (12 upvotes)
Wtf was that fire alarm that just kept going off last night (2 upvotes)
When someone's a dick to you in a dream and you can't help be mad at them in real life.  (13 upvotes)
If this is your dog, she's on Fortuna!!  (29 upvotes)
I have this fantasy where I'm changing in the locker room and another guy changing too checks me out and then we hook up in the shower. Sounds so hot to me (4 upvotes)
tinder-based drinking game: take a drink anytime someone says they like to hike.  (13 upvotes)
When girls always end up with douches and I'm standing here opening the door for both of you, BC he's too busy flirting to her friend to be a gentleman (-2 upvotes)
Currently shitting out all of last nights mistakes #DADS (2 upvotes)
Every fucking weekend, I wake up to the fucking idiots nextdoor blasting their retarded music full bass full volume at exactly 10 every single morning (17 upvotes)
Damn I'm so fucking ugly. Why God you fuckin jerk  (5 upvotes)
Red head working at Portola is cute  (0 upvotes)
Fuck hangovers  how do I make myself feel better? (2 upvotes)
Just found a hole in the front of my sleeping shorts. Should I throw it away... (-2 upvotes)
I find it kind of ridiculous that we need to take a year of chemistry just to take one bio class (3 upvotes)
Waking up with bae next to you and he's still asleep so you get to semi creepily stare at his most worry free and serene face. Kill me now so I can die in absolute bliss (26 upvotes)
Love is not black and white. It goes from madly, somewhat, to "what are you doing get out of my room it's 3AM" (8 upvotes)
Cute couple in arbor: girl blows dandelion puff ball seeds into the wind, seeds fly away from the grass, boyfriend jumps up to fan the seeds over to the grass where they can sprout. (14 upvotes)
Why are bitches yelling on 66 Picasso  (2 upvotes)
Last night getting turnt with the Squad.. -master tortoise (0 upvotes)
When you only have fun drinking when you get super fucked up but you always end up too drunk and make a total ass of yourself  (10 upvotes)
Bench Press or Dips and why (-1 upvotes)
does anyone know how to fix a cracked iphone screen? (0 upvotes)
Geeetech 3D printer for sale $280 (1 upvotes)
What pays better? SBmenus delivery or driving for uber?  (0 upvotes)
I don't know about you guys but I love when Storke serenades me in the mornings (14 upvotes)
Woke up this morning and my parents were cooking food together and made us all a nice breakfast. I miss Saturday mornings back home.  (26 upvotes)
Gauchos do it better (5 upvotes)
Does something ever happen that bothers you and then you can't fucking drop it or focus on anything else beside the fact that you're bothered/why (8 upvotes)
This morning I am reminded of why I don't drink much anymore  (17 upvotes)
Being a single, average looking guy at the party is so demoralizing. I get so tired of having to do all the work of talking to people.  it would be nice to get some attention for once :( (25 upvotes)
I just want some pancakes right now  (9 upvotes)
My dad started posting pics of his food on fb. Pls stahp. (19 upvotes)
Fuller House, thoughts? (-1 upvotes)
I appreciate that storke tower plays the Phantom of the opera (38 upvotes)
Had fun last night but still had to play mom in the end and get throw up on my hands and clothes #momlyfe (18 upvotes)
S/o to the people who work at bagel cafe. This place is always packed that seems so stressful (28 upvotes)
Had anal last night. Have to SIT in class all day. Not winning.  (16 upvotes)
My only squabble with long-distance relationships is that when I look sexy and go out, he's not around to keep old creepy men from hitting on me (6 upvotes)
When guys get mad when you say you have a boyfriend like damn I just want guy friends and want to make it clear I'm not tryna fuck  (87 upvotes)
I've never woken up early enough to see people to the walk of shame (8 upvotes)
If Trump gets elected our only hope is if another country invades us and takes over. (14 upvotes)
I guess girls don't want to be made love too or whatever.  They just wanna get fucked, hard.  (4 upvotes)
I just got turned down for a job that I applied to an hour ago  (98 upvotes)
I miss cuddling with a cute girl. Just having warm physical contact and feeling the pressure of holding her close and petting her head. I guess this pillow will have to do. (58 upvotes)
are eggs cheaper at the coop or iv market? (2 upvotes)
Waterboarding in Guantanamo Bay sounds pretty rad if you don't know what either of those things are. (60 upvotes)
Are there any Jeff Bernat or Mark Redito fans out there ?  (1 upvotes)
Any other girls get hot flashes before their period?  (6 upvotes)
Well I was piss drunk last night. Literally. I peed in my bed  (12 upvotes)
Why does dlg have to open so late :c (5 upvotes)
Wtf is going on at the end of Camino pescadero? (0 upvotes)
When u gotta do the walk of shame but it's not the walk of shame u jut passed out at a friends house  (62 upvotes)
I can guarantee that any girl who identifies as a "gypsy" or a "gypsy soul" has never had to deal with actual gypsies before.  (47 upvotes)
I'm not good at being alone  (0 upvotes)
Is the arbor open rn? (1 upvotes)
Fuller House is so sexualized compared to Full House. Do you think that says something about our generation and society in general? Btw, homegirl that plays DJ is an atrocious actress. (6 upvotes)
When you have to do this in the morning because your blinds aren't shit (102 upvotes)
How do you get puke and the smell out of carpet? Some guy puked in my dorm room last night and dipped before he had to clean it up  (3 upvotes)
There are two ducks in the swimming poolWhat can I do?  (2 upvotes)
That dry-eyed feeling when you've just gone thru some emotional shit and you know as soon as you try to talk to someone you'll start crying  (80 upvotes)
What time does the Re cen open ?  (2 upvotes)
Greetings fellow yakkers! Looking for a good local place to buy nice thank you cards (packs). Any advice? :)  (0 upvotes)
5 more hours to Silva Bisping!!!! (-1 upvotes)
Did anyone else hear someone get hit by a car like five to ten minutes ago??? Near camino pescadero?  (3 upvotes)
so uh in other news I pissed the bed (72 upvotes)
When she says don't stop but you (176 upvotes)
To all my night owls (221 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"UC Irvine"
Location(33.6454, -117.8426)
I'm practicing (0 upvotes)
Deez days I been thinking about Deez nuts  (0 upvotes)
I'm really good at judging people.  (0 upvotes)
Where are some fun places to hike around campus?  (0 upvotes)
I think society should normalize boobs (0 upvotes)
I want to play basketball but I'm too lazy to walk to the ARC (0 upvotes)
A lot of ugly people just don't want to admit that they don't want to date other ugly people (4 upvotes)
Does graduating from a UC give you a slight advantage over a CSU with the same gpa when applying to post grad education? (0 upvotes)
I honestly don't understand what's going on in the ics46 programs.. My partner is carrying me so hard...  (0 upvotes)
I used to think I would never meet up with someone from online cuz that's too dangerous, but I'm so desperate I got a tinder lol (0 upvotes)
My first relationship ended and i feel like it was the best ill ever have but i lost it all  (0 upvotes)
Girls: Teach me how to speak to your kind  (1 upvotes)
Guys: what would you think if a girl double texted you? (-1 upvotes)
Doing my premed requirements at UCI vs community college? (2 upvotes)
not sure if friends are all still asleep or having fun without me (1 upvotes)
Lol (9 upvotes)
Basically sums it up (32 upvotes)
Why is finding Republicans so hard at UCI? I'm doing a survey and I'm fucked if I can't find like at least 15 more  (3 upvotes)
Love the spongebob nemes (2 upvotes)
Walking into the grocery story like (6 upvotes)
Walking into class after an all nighter (25 upvotes)
So hard accepting you're ugly  (17 upvotes)
Donald Trump is the result of America selling its soul for the promise of economic prosperity. (3 upvotes)
I'm visiting for the week and only 20, where are the best places to party or just drink?  (-2 upvotes)
I feel so bad for my parents. Theyre paying so much just for me to fail my classes. I'm such a terrible daughter, i feel so bad... I wish i was smart enough (17 upvotes)
What's going on around pslh rn? (2 upvotes)
When your Touch ID won't recognize your fingerprint so you have to unlock your phone like a muggle.  (35 upvotes)
College is like looking both ways before you cross the street and then getting hit by an airplane  (37 upvotes)
All my friends are in a relationship and I'm just here being a 5th wheel smh:/ (8 upvotes)
I have a love/hate relationship with morning wood (-1 upvotes)
Dan bilzerian is my idol (3 upvotes)
I tell myself "no more girls" but then I meet a girl with a pretty face and nice personality and I'm back at it again with the "I want to kiss you" feeling (11 upvotes)
Sex in the morning with my gf is still half asleep is the best. The way she moans when I suck on her titties while thrusting my D inside her.  (-2 upvotes)
Hangover poops < (2 upvotes)
Why do guys and girls want to sleep around with a lot of people? No judgement, genuinely curious  (6 upvotes)
That moment when you realize the reason the person from the lab stockroom comes into your lab all the time is because she has a crush on the TA.  (12 upvotes)
Tfw you see all your friends snapchats from last night...tfti  (17 upvotes)
What if you find the women of your dreams but then her name is the same as your ex. Would you still date her?  (0 upvotes)
I just took a shower and I had to poop right after :( (14 upvotes)
Waking up with wet panties  stupid sexual dreams  (1 upvotes)
Damn boy u must be my GPA because I know I could do better I'm just too lazy to try  (28 upvotes)
I just had the best dream ever that I was in a pirate gang and we had a disagreement in the gang and everyone used the disagreement to settle personal disputes and it was an epic wooden cart race (7 upvotes)
What's your experience with forgiving someone that cheated on you? (2 upvotes)
Morning wood game is strong (10 upvotes)
If i went to school not in my hometown, i would so make a tinder. (6 upvotes)
anyone up to make out? (0 upvotes)
Life: "You didn't do your taxes, you can go to jail ya know?" Me: "Mitochondria is the powerhouse of the cell" Life: "Bitch do you even know what taxes are?" Me:"SOHCAHTOA AND PYTH. THEOREM" *drools*  (33 upvotes)
I want to cry (3 upvotes)
I can hear the ducks outside my window almost every day at night  (duck emoji) (6 upvotes)
I should leave you  (4 upvotes)
I wonder if RA's ever party drink in their room (6 upvotes)
WOOOO (3 upvotes)
If you were in front of me at McDonalds on Alton Pwky at 2am, let's be friends  (8 upvotes)
What are we? (7 upvotes)
When you get the closure you desperately needed.  (12 upvotes)
Some fucking douche bag removed his condom during sex and exploded inside me (3 upvotes)
If you're still up at this time. Let's play 21 questions  (1 upvotes)
My bf is absolutely amazing, but sometimes I feel like I didn't get to finish my hoe phase :/ But I wouldn't break up over it (16 upvotes)
Sex probably isn't that great  like ever heard of sleep? (12 upvotes)
Hi (1 upvotes)
Who wants to have hallcest in valimar? (5 upvotes)
What's a good place to take a girl out to? All I can think of right now is bowling.  (4 upvotes)
How to get a fwb? (6 upvotes)
Having sex with a girl in my hall and now I don't know what to do if I bring another girl home . Advice? (8 upvotes)
I just want love. (14 upvotes)
Is UTC 72 hour parking usually full?  (3 upvotes)
Not sure if he's interested or just wants to fool around :/ (9 upvotes)
How long does it take to get del sushi? (5 upvotes)
You can always retake a class...but you can never relive a party (0 upvotes)
I really have to stop comparing myself to other ppl  (30 upvotes)
When your trying to get with a chick and you find out she has a boy friend lol (5 upvotes)
Hey I'm a bio major thinking of switching into business admin or Econ....will I be able to handle those majors cause I'm barely getting by as a bio major in regards to grades???!!! (2 upvotes)
I need to get laid..its been 2 weeks... (-1 upvotes)
Is Langston open right now? I want to study. Where can I go? (3 upvotes)
My friends and I started watching Fuller House. Kinda nostalgic, kinda funny, kinda cringy. Good shit (22 upvotes)
Holy fuck kings ochem midterm average tho (3 upvotes)
Ideal man or woman in one word? (1 upvotes)
Went from talking to this girl every day or so and hanging out to just going on dates, but never texting and her being hard to talk to when we're not together. So confused  (13 upvotes)
I don't wanna brag.. But I'll be the best you've ever had. (8 upvotes)
20% of people under the age of 30 are married  (8 upvotes)
Is a low carb diet good for weight loss? (3 upvotes)
Any girls interested in fwb?(: (-3 upvotes)
Why are these Greek fraternities making their pledges run? *cough phi psi (5 upvotes)
Lying down staring at my phone instead of taking my clothes out of laundry. Not that you care. K bye (3 upvotes)
So how do you file a noise complaint in VDCN (2 upvotes)
Hate it when tinder first loads and you can't like yourself (6 upvotes)
  (3 upvotes)
One of the guys that works at subway is hella hot (5 upvotes)
I would be a slut if I were hot (17 upvotes)
Hopefully I wake up early to catch the sunrise @the beach with a nice cup of  (5 upvotes)
To everybody stressing about not having enough units or maybe considering getting ahead: test out of as many classes as you can. Self-study, learn the material, and you'll be golden. You can do it. (12 upvotes)
Are 16 units a lot?  (3 upvotes)
Wish I had the courage to go up to guys & tell them they're cute... (21 upvotes)
My hairs smells like apples  (5 upvotes)
When u pee and it drips down the balls (6 upvotes)
I miss someone running their fingers through my hair as I fall asleep (21 upvotes)
Weiner weiner bo beener  (5 upvotes)
I miss my nonexistent bf so much (33 upvotes)
 Hate it so much when you match with someone on tinder and they either don't respond to your message or they give you half assed responses and don't try to expand the convo (13 upvotes)
I just trynna fuck  (1 upvotes)
If I could and needed to wrap up salsa in the cotton, our goose would sleep in my stomach and cry, am I right? (4 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"UC San Diego"
Location(32.881, -117.238)
Hopefully my A for effort averages out my F on my test for a grand total of C-  #pleasehelp (1 upvotes)
Stop eating oil fish (0 upvotes)
Seeing the differences between full and fuller house makes me disappointed in kids today and what we've become. I need to get off my phone now.  (1 upvotes)
Any profitable stock, forex, futures, options traders out there? (0 upvotes)
Friendly reminder to check your mailbox, because you could be like me and have jury duty  (0 upvotes)
Immaaa soo Chinneese and I neva let people out of elevator before I go in and create a China clustafuck (2 upvotes)
My boyfriend is not physically attractive and I'm at least cute. My family dislikes him just bc of that. It's not his fault. He has beautiful soul & heart. Life's so unfair to unattractive people  (7 upvotes)
so tinder profiles with no bio and 3-4 pictures are all fake, right? (-1 upvotes)
Don't eat oil fish!!! Please. I'm suffering a lot right now (-1 upvotes)
I'm getting a G on my Chem midterm  (9 upvotes)
International students: why do people from Hong Kong not like people from mainland china? (11 upvotes)
I'm a pant size 3 or 4 but when I see myself I feel fat and my tummy flab looks and feels disgusting. Am I struggling with body image issues or should I take this as motivation to lose more weight? (2 upvotes)
If your boyfriend's friend tells you "you deserve better", does that mean your bf is likely cheating or the friend is just looking to get some? (8 upvotes)
Turned in that 6bh midterm early because if you don't know anything you can only bs so much  (7 upvotes)
Turned in that 6bh midterm early because you can only check answers if you actually know what you're doing  (12 upvotes)
"I haven't played soccer since I was 5 because I have other things going on" says a 7 year old lol (10 upvotes)
My brain wants to cry  (5 upvotes)
Omg! Free food!! Center Hall 109!! Be an extra!!! (7 upvotes)
FREE FOOD!!!!! Come over to Muir Field today at 2 to watch UCSD Men's Lacrosse beat the shit out of CSU Long Beach!!! (15 upvotes)
We really need extras for a student film rn. Free pizza and Krispy Kreme outside of center hall for everyone who shows up.  (6 upvotes)
Just saw my ex doing cardio at the gym, I mean what's the point? Not like she has a heart (19 upvotes)
Why are people so fake... (3 upvotes)
So what does it mean when on my fb I have a recommended friend that I share 0 mutual friends with? (4 upvotes)
Keep it on the DN (-2 upvotes)
Why the fuck is there no dennys on campus. Or Ihop. Or any 24 hour diner. (26 upvotes)
Is the sixth apartments wifi down for everybody? Or just me (0 upvotes)
*wakes up drunk* (14 upvotes)
Vegister to Rote (9 upvotes)
When your yaking nearby instead in your herd and don't notice  (5 upvotes)
Best place for a burger and a beer around here? (0 upvotes)
Woke up this morning feeling like p diddy (3 upvotes)
I have to take a shit but having hemorrhoids takes the pleasure out of it and I dread dropping the kids off at the pool  (8 upvotes)
It's so fucking nice out this morning  (12 upvotes)
When he calls you fam so you know you're in the brozone  (11 upvotes)
Saturday morning after a week of nonstop midterms means in going to smoke the fattest blunt and lay out on the beach  peace out world (0 upvotes)
Another gorgeous weekend I get to spend studying  (17 upvotes)
I woke up with morning wood... Im a chick  (7 upvotes)
So what do people wear to concerts? (5 upvotes)
When you're too poor to buy a song so you keep replaying the itunes preview of it (25 upvotes)
Yep (7 upvotes)
Just a guy falling hard for a guy (-1 upvotes)
When will CSE 11 open, it's already past second pass   (1 upvotes)
To the girls with small boobs and/or flat butts, you all are beautiful and sexy too. Don't let anyone tell you otherwise. (9 upvotes)
I'm dating this guy but I just had a stress dream that he slept with my roommate and lately my dreams have been coming true...  (9 upvotes)
I really hate it when someone leads you on but then starts ignoring you. Wtf dude?  (11 upvotes)
Hi morning grouch :) yeah I'm talking about you going around down voting whatever you can get your hands on! I really hope your Saturday turns out okay.  (27 upvotes)
Fuck yikyaks image processing bullshit (6 upvotes)
Time to fail Chem!  (11 upvotes)
Wanted to sleep in but woke up earlier than did the whole week  (15 upvotes)
6BH midterm.. so scared AHH (7 upvotes)
Is Baresse terrible? Will I survive 20E with him!?  (1 upvotes)
Not ready for that Albizati midterm at all... (2 upvotes)
Still awake, I kind of regret it (4 upvotes)
.... when your body is so used to waking up at 6:30 five days a week that on the ONE DAY that you can sleep in, it chooses to do that again and you don't even need an alarm. Why.  (25 upvotes)
What time does cafe v open this morning? (1 upvotes)
Please watch over your friends  (39 upvotes)
Please wear condoms (56 upvotes)
Please report sexual harassment  (56 upvotes)
I used to be stressed cause I wanted to ask this girl out... Now I'm even more stressed cause we're together and I have no idea what I'm doing (21 upvotes)
This girl claims to love me but spends all her time with other guys.  And she lies about it. Shit hurts (3 upvotes)
Super drunk and just chilling alone in my room rn. What's everyone up to (-1 upvotes)
Fuller house (2 upvotes)
My boyfriend is sleeping like a little baby with his arms wrapped all around me. I always wonder how I got so lucky  (52 upvotes)
My roommate fucking smells. I cant even breathe in my room.  (7 upvotes)
Kik me @linesonly for a good time (0 upvotes)
Can't wait until ochem is over  (23 upvotes)
Don't eat escolar, they are actually oil fish which gives you food poisoning!   (0 upvotes)
Being told that the cute guy has on a crush on me over everyone else made my night  (40 upvotes)
I have a zit inside my nose.... How does that even happen?!? (11 upvotes)
I'm drunk AMA (0 upvotes)
*air horn sound*    *second air horn sound*     Me: "This isn't deodorant." (48 upvotes)
I remember a time when I was just happy, then I realized it isn't normal to be as sad as I am all the time...then again I was never normal (5 upvotes)
Now at least I know I'm alone, instead of feeling alone with people around  (0 upvotes)
Should have gone back to my room when I had the chance, now the night is ruined...great (6 upvotes)
My bf is super dumb why am I with him.  (12 upvotes)
Anybody wanna chill  (1 upvotes)
That awkward moment you start and finish a whole series in one night.  (27 upvotes)
Anyone selling the happy cookies? (0 upvotes)
Oh hi Mark (14 upvotes)
UCSD actually stands for UC Smells Dank af right now like what's that about? (1 upvotes)
Wtf! a shitty ass motel will have better internet than resnet.  (8 upvotes)
Why are people actually supporting Trump??? (6 upvotes)
I just want a cute girl to cuddle with me and watch Waynes world. (2 upvotes)
I have a feeling the guy I like thinks I like someone else, but it's not true man. I like you. Like a lot.  (22 upvotes)
Could anyone explain what semi-formal means? (1 upvotes)
Any hot grills around campus? Trying to cook burgers tonight. (26 upvotes)
Register to vote (53 upvotes)
What is your opinion on men who play lacrosse? (0 upvotes)
My fart stunk so bad my cat literally took off running from the bed  (9 upvotes)
What does pussy tastes like, I'm serious btw (1 upvotes)
When u ate so much hot cheetos that when u wipe, u dunno if ur asshole is bleeding or it's the red coloring. (60 upvotes)
I masturbated way too much in the last couple of days (33 upvotes)
Ufff (0 upvotes)
Had to drop the kids off at the pool, didn't realize I had so many (-2 upvotes)
Man I realllllyyyy fucked up bad (3 upvotes)
Everyone is high! I want to get high too! (3 upvotes)
Am I the crazy one for getting mad when my roommate puts her cell on speaker phone and shouts at her mom at midnight??  (14 upvotes)
When someone says I'm cute, I find it impossible to believe. I don't see how someone can see me as cute. It just sounds like obligatory or exaggerated compliments.. or they want something #innerdoubts (87 upvotes)
Bad cold got me two days sober... (0 upvotes)
"I'll just watch the first episode of fuller house." -11 episodes later-  "Jk. I meant the whole season." (35 upvotes)
Anyone know how to register a 3ds on the wifi here? (-1 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"Boston University"
Location(42.3496, -71.0997)
remember eating dinner at your friends' houses? (0 upvotes)
That moment when you take off your bra and let the girls loose  (0 upvotes)
curious guys? I have the room to myself for a while  (0 upvotes)
Don't be with people that treat you like Kanye treats the cousin that stole his laptop  (2 upvotes)
I've accepted the fact that Ima do shitty on this quiz FML  (2 upvotes)
When a cute boy makes eye contact with you and you stare at him ferociously to assert your dominance and later question why you're single. I'm so bad at flirting.  (6 upvotes)
im broke but I have a car what can I do for fun (0 upvotes)
They love each other  (8 upvotes)
I really fucking don't want to live with my roommate again, and I don't know who else to ask. Wtf do I do lol (5 upvotes)
I have two midterms on Monday and I haven't had a chance to study because I've been out all day for a school extracurricular activity but all I wanna do is sleep. Like I desperately need sleep (3 upvotes)
I'm singing irony by the wonder girls and annoying the crap out of my roommate  (-1 upvotes)
Who needs weed? (0 upvotes)
when your makeup on point but then something happens and you cry and ruin all ur work  (2 upvotes)
Me:" hey what do you think is the longest way to kill a person?" Roommate:" You wait" (10 upvotes)
Sour diesel, blue dream, white widow, and hindu kush in my stash. Prohibition is working out great! (2 upvotes)
What should I do tonight?  (0 upvotes)
It's 2016, the remix to ignition is no longer hot and fresh out the kitchen (1 upvotes)
Reuse coconut water bottles thank me later (1 upvotes)
I don't mean, to seem like I care about material things, like a social status. (5 upvotes)
I could be in Maine by the time the green line gets here (7 upvotes)
Bitches crazy  (5 upvotes)
Whenever I go out there's a 1000% chance im ending my night at Beantown tacqueria  (6 upvotes)
Any anti-anxiety prefs besides weed? Was thinking a nootropic or some script (1 upvotes)
I just took a poop so big that it tired me out  (5 upvotes)
My uber driver is using a Morgan Freeman setting on his gps. What a time to be alive. (39 upvotes)
Trying to poop with a tampon in  (3 upvotes)
So emotional that I'm crying for Freddie Mercury's death  (-2 upvotes)
What are the best PCs under $500? And why? My mac crashed and I need a new computer asap (2 upvotes)
Getting deep (38 upvotes)
It feels so weird to use a stall that someone just walked out of because their bare ass was touching the seat less than a 30 seconds ago. Like that seat hasn't had any cool-down time.  (12 upvotes)
#marcomentum is real  (1 upvotes)
Anybody listened to the slowed down version of the weeknd? (-1 upvotes)
Should I add and message a girl I have a crush on on Facebook if I don't know when I'll see her again? (6 upvotes)
About to buy Pokemon Red after watching full house all morning. Am I in 1996 or 2016? #qtc (7 upvotes)
PSA there is a club penguin app. And it is a game changer.  (10 upvotes)
I'm still in bed lol (3 upvotes)
Anyone else have neighbors who practice instruments for hours and hours? I just want to chill and have a quiet afternoon  (2 upvotes)
Last night I was walking home and a guy pulled out a knife to rob me. During the exchange my sleeves rolled up to show my scars from cutting. He dropped the knife, hugged me, and left.  I'm so numb rn (-1 upvotes)
help can someone please tell me where to buy a 3DS charger around here (-1 upvotes)
When you break up with your boyfriend and you realize you lost all your friends  (9 upvotes)
Sexual tension is rough. She's so hot... And so my type.. But I'm with someone. I'm a dick right?  (3 upvotes)
Stop wearing Canada Goose (6 upvotes)
Cheeto fingers turn to dorito fingers. (4 upvotes)
When watching crimes shows I sometimes think about what a terrible witness I would be. Like I don't think I could describe my own mother to a sketch artist   (5 upvotes)
getting an IUD and am supposed to get it while I'm on my period but I got my period 2 weeks early so now I don't know if I get it now or wait till I was supposed to get my period. Men have it so easy. (2 upvotes)
Shotgunning 3 beers before going out last night was a great idea... (2 upvotes)
Fuck you sinus drainage (2 upvotes)
La Vie Boheme (5 upvotes)
There's a girl at the movies who's really cute and alone. We keep making eye contact. Should I go up to her? (12 upvotes)
tenni slap (1 upvotes)
In female shopping stores they should have like a super smash bros corner or just a gaming area for guys. #thinkingselfishly  (14 upvotes)
Lost my virginity in a whopping 30 seconds last night!  (7 upvotes)
The em dash is the greatest typographic mark of all time (2 upvotes)
The wheels on the T go *unintelligible screeching* (141 upvotes)
Pro tip: have a page requirement for that essay? Struggling to write quality material? Highlight all text, right click > font > advanced tab > spacing: Expanded by: 0.2 pt > press OK. You're welcome (2 upvotes)
I hate shared bathrooms so much on weekends...its like the toilets turn into Jackson Pollock paintings  (10 upvotes)
Put contacts in after eyeliner. On the first try. No smudging. Feel like a super hero. (6 upvotes)
"How do I find out if a girl is interested? Great question. I usually just assume they're not" (18 upvotes)
Bong Hits 4 Jesus (22 upvotes)
Nationalism lead to both world wars (3 upvotes)
Anyone have lots of "school friends" but no "weekend friends" (30 upvotes)
I genuinely tear up whenever I see the scene in Rugrats in Paris where Chuckie doesn't have a mom to dance with (17 upvotes)
When you realize that your roommate is a complete piece of shit (4 upvotes)
You know it's real when he's not grossed out when you throw up from food poisoning and he just wants to take care of you  (10 upvotes)
Think I like girls too.. (18 upvotes)
Number one reason I can't get out of bed in the morning: I'm too comfortable. Number one reason I can't fall asleep: not comfortable enough to. Hmmmmm (13 upvotes)
Would a girl purposefully make something up to make her bf/ex jealous?  (1 upvotes)
They feel when you pull into a parking space and notice there is a sign in front of it saying "Reserved for JOHN CENA" and next thing you know you're getting rekt (5 upvotes)
So broke that I can only buy toilet paper and also use it as napkins/paper towel  (1 upvotes)
Are guys attracted to girls with small boobs? I've been an A cup my whole life  (-2 upvotes)
The fact that the guy sitting across from me at the BPL and I keep making eyes at each other is making studying very difficult this afternoon but I also don't want to move.  (6 upvotes)
Feel like someone threw a brick at my face and hit me straight on. It's gonna be a good day. (9 upvotes)
When ladies squat  (7 upvotes)
Deleted tinder last week for many reasons but now I just want to get it back. Someone talk me off the ledge (-4 upvotes)
Smoking up a girl who has never smoked before yields adorable results (16 upvotes)
I wonder if, in the history of the universe, a political Facebook argument has ever actually changed someone's opinion. I swear people just argue craving the attention of those who think like them (14 upvotes)
Not hungover thankfully but definitely too exhausted from last night to do anything productive (9 upvotes)
I wish i became hungover instead of insatiabley horny (-4 upvotes)
If you could be told right now who your future spouse will be, would you want to? (4 upvotes)
Daddy 2016 (4 upvotes)
I really want a girlfriend, but I really need a casual fuck buddy until I can get a girlfriend (11 upvotes)
I miss the way we'd chill on the hillside  (2 upvotes)
Where is the Bernie Sanders rally today? (1 upvotes)
My internal monologue.  (61 upvotes)
When you don't want to study so badly that you resort to reading your Venmo feed.  (15 upvotes)
I want cheese  (8 upvotes)
Quick way to lose 10 pounds?  (7 upvotes)
Any meal plans or restaurants that do meal plans for weight loss? And weight loss ideas for food?  (2 upvotes)
Healthy, casual places to eat?  Preferably where they have nutrition info available  (4 upvotes)
Best places to eat alone and work on laptop? Other than panera, pavement, Starbucks....  (7 upvotes)
Dear Yak, I hope your day makes you as happy as this Corgi  (37 upvotes)
If I get married, I'm just giving my mother and mother in law a firm wedding budget and letting them plan it. Less stressful than trying to do it myself and please everyone.  (7 upvotes)
Japan has lost 1 million people since its last census 5 years ago. Where could they have gone, whale hunting? (-2 upvotes)
Junior year has me thinking every girl I get involved with has a small probability of being my wife  (34 upvotes)
Booty had me like  (64 upvotes)
sometimes I feel like my guy friends are flirting with me but then they'll mention girls they're trying to hook up with & im just left confused (48 upvotes)
Thinking about just doing random housing next year in the off chance I get accidentally adopted by a good group of people  (68 upvotes)
Tfw you want to make out with significant other in the morning but you both got garbage breath.  (26 upvotes)
Him: "I'm really kinky" Me: most average lay of my life (21 upvotes)
"Happy 20th Birthday Pokemon!" From a boy who wants to quit college and become pokemon master because midterm. (58 upvotes)
Hangover shits are the worst kind of shits (20 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"Rensselaer Polytechnic Institute"
Location(42.73, -73.6775)
Women tied 1-1 against Qpac!  End of 2nd! (2 upvotes)
This whole mueller center thing is probably giving Dvorak really good yakarma  (16 upvotes)
When rpi.stories doesn't even open your snap and it was a good one<<< (4 upvotes)
PSA:  Men's hockey will be home next week.  Come out and support them in their playoff run. (7 upvotes)
Better than U! (4 upvotes)
RMA Pops Concert tonight at 6PM in EMPAC.  Free!  Theme: Broadway!  Symphonic Band, Percussion Ensemble, 8th Street Swing, and two Jazz @ Rensselaer groups. (6 upvotes)
O-O-O-O'Reilly... Auto Parts. (6 upvotes)
Did anyone see Shirley's office in Troy? It's a god damn throne (5 upvotes)
As much as I want to play union in the playoffs next week, that would mean playing Qpac the following week. (5 upvotes)
Are the courts open at Ecav now?  (2 upvotes)
When he tells you he just wants to be friends (15 upvotes)
I want to cuddle every Eeveelution at once (3 upvotes)
Is anyone else having major problems with the wifi (2 upvotes)
It annoys me that everytime I open yikyak it goes to the hot page (43 upvotes)
So I woke up to pizza in the urinal today (8 upvotes)
What's the easiest way to sort scrap metal? I have a bunch of mixed metal pieces in my garage that I want to cut up and recycle (2 upvotes)
When is the first day that upperclassmen have for the lottery? (0 upvotes)
Napping the day away (8 upvotes)
In the 1800s when scientists disagreed with each other, they would electrify animals and build super weapons to prove a point. Now they make political tweets with snappy hashtags.  (9 upvotes)
Is the mailroom closed today (-1 upvotes)
Razzies are today. Predictions? For me, Worst Picture: 50 Shades; Worst Director: Sam Taylor-Johnson (50 Shades); Worst Actor: Kevin James (Paul Blart 2); Worst Actress: J-Lo (Boy next door) (1 upvotes)
RPI makes me feel like an unintelligent pile of garbage.  (29 upvotes)
I always thought I had a great life until I realized I barely have any memories of anything that great (14 upvotes)
Woke up to snapchats of a dick with the caption "you made me cum everywhere." Wtf did I send him?  (-1 upvotes)
wheres a good day trip to go on today? I'm sick of troy   want to drive out somewhere and do something. preferably dog friendly so I can bring my pup (4 upvotes)
I just tried to ride my bike down the stairs. I regret that decision so much. (15 upvotes)
I feel like some people need to learn how to do this more often (10 upvotes)
Just saw 15 cars blow through a red light on 15th and sage. Thanks $hirley. (5 upvotes)
All these yaks about needing someone to cuddle and not getting laid, I'm just sitting here playing video games  (9 upvotes)
Lol at all the people that fell down the stars at pilam last night  (22 upvotes)
If a TA gives you a 69 on a test you should have failed does that mean she's into you right? (18 upvotes)
Sleeping in after exam week is the best feeling ever. (22 upvotes)
Mixed signals  (8 upvotes)
Happy 20th Anniversary of Pokmon to all you trainers! (44 upvotes)
tfw someone offers to buy you food but you gotta decline because you aren't a heathen. (1 upvotes)
Sleep is for those who don't have Netflix  (27 upvotes)
Where are all the other night owls? (5 upvotes)
When you help a brother get a number  (1 upvotes)
Just want someone to cuddle with  (4 upvotes)
Phi MuD was fantastic tonight. 11/10! (2 upvotes)
Thanks pi lam, should have stayed in (18 upvotes)
All of my friends currently getting laid and here i am sitting around with a thumb up my ass (25 upvotes)
I stole someones High sierra backpack from pi lam behind the dj booth im sorry i thought it was mu friends comment one this plz (7 upvotes)
The only thing crazier than seeing people you went to high school with pregnant/with kids, is seeing people you went to high school with pregnant/with kids on purpose!  (50 upvotes)
Pi Lam is easily the best 2nd tier house (5 upvotes)
Some advice: if you keep trying to ask a person you like to do one on one things with you, and they keep turning it into group outings or they always have plans... they're probably NOT into you. (52 upvotes)
Those lonely Friday feels. (3 upvotes)
Dear Crockett hall, should we just leave the pub safe cars outside your hall forever?  (24 upvotes)
When you get too lit at 11 40 on a Friday... (25 upvotes)
Harry potter drinking games (6 upvotes)
Why is there an ambulance at rhaps B? (10 upvotes)
Shaved my legs for nothing (37 upvotes)
EOP was amazing, great job to all the performers and crew! (16 upvotes)
When your boyfriend consistently cancels your plans together to go drink with his friends  (24 upvotes)
Can you register for housing with a hold on your account? (2 upvotes)
Tfw you want to ask out that special girl in your major, but you don't want to fuck up your friendship and project groups... (9 upvotes)
I'm pleasantly surprised by the lack of "the wind blew me harder than my nonexistent gf" yaks this year. (71 upvotes)
When you mess up dont worry about it. Life is meaningless anyways regardless!  (11 upvotes)
Father's takes flex right? (0 upvotes)
And with the loss tonight with SLU's win RPI will not get a bye in the ECAC tourney. If they win tomorrow they will get a 5 or 6 seed. If they lose they'll get a 7 or 8 seed. If they tie they're a 6. (5 upvotes)
Anyway I can get my mail on the weekends from the mailroom? (0 upvotes)
Apparently there's 2 male pornstars at acacia wtf (4 upvotes)
The little know 11th commandment thou shalt grind babies (14 upvotes)
When you feel judged by both sides of the Veritas debate for not going. (4 upvotes)
S/O to Bram for putting himself on the spot, glad we could hear your thoughts tonight  (36 upvotes)
Congrats to The Veritas Forum for putting on such an awesome event.I'd consider myself an atheist, but this was a thoughtful conversation between the two sides.Thank you for your respect of all views. (24 upvotes)
Does any one else receive TAP financial aid from NYS? Is it showing up on your financial aid for this semester yet? Just got a bursar hold and noticed my TAP doesn't show up.  (5 upvotes)
Are there any apps for meeting people near by for just strictly friends?  A lot of my friends have graduated and moved out of the area. I dont have a lot of people to go out drinking with or stuff. (5 upvotes)
Welcome to Troy: first in friendship, fourth in obesity. (18 upvotes)
She showed me her Pokmon team. I guess you could say things are getting pretty serious. (72 upvotes)
When you get your first F of the semester (128 upvotes)
Hope my brother's girlfriend didn't hear me yell "ATTACK" to my dog when I heard her get here.  (28 upvotes)
Anyone on TWC dropping connection? (1 upvotes)
I can do a great Bruno Mars impression. Don't believe me? Just watch. (98 upvotes)
You're in college, it shouldn't be hard to remember to flush (113 upvotes)
I want to go to a frat party at least once before I graduate. However my friends are all extremely anti-greek life and would never go with me (11 upvotes)
Girl on the bike you are beautiful (11 upvotes)
I want margaritas  (1 upvotes)
If you're reading this it's too late. (20 upvotes)
When are the open skate hours this weekend at the field house? (4 upvotes)
Probably should have just given up weightlifting for lent at this rate  (30 upvotes)
You're allowed to make jokes about whatever you want. That is your right. And other people are allowed to find it funny or not. That is their right. How is that controversial? (35 upvotes)
Great job women taking it into OT with Qpac!  Get'em tomorrow! (13 upvotes)
There - location; Their - possessive; They're - They are contraction. This may be the hardest lesson any RPI student will see (46 upvotes)
Unfortunately the progress pic for today is too big for yak to handle so check out overheard at RPI! The floor is almost done and the staff moved and cleaned most of the racks today. - Dvorak  (52 upvotes)
I wanna get to know this person a bit more outside of class. What should I say? (5 upvotes)
Can professors not keeps us late...we  have other classes, often across campus. (66 upvotes)
10 class days until spring break. Almost there.  (61 upvotes)
I can't be the only person here who has never been invited to a party    (13 upvotes)
Does anyone know what the door price is for the jazz fest. at the music hall tonight? It's during Troy Night Out but the passes online costs $60. (2 upvotes)
"It's like super caffeine, if you need to stay awake and stuff just snort some cocaine... Please don't snort cocaine for your midterm" - Malatzita (45 upvotes)
You know the professors bad when reading the textbook is more exciting than listening in lecture (24 upvotes)
so Malazita is going over how to smoke crack (28 upvotes)
Malazita is teaching us how to smoke crack in IT and Society (23 upvotes)
You can tell a lot about a person by the number of shortcuts and folders they keep on their desktop. (33 upvotes)
Anyone want to put a bullet in there head in EEE right now (7 upvotes)
Social psych moved from west hall to 308 fuck yesss (13 upvotes)
One of those dumb online INTP personality quizes just tore apart my entire sense of self wtf am I doing with my life (15 upvotes)
Do you have to have roommates added in your group before you can apply for housing? (4 upvotes)
Full house didn't have a single good joke during its entire run. I don't know why Netflix though it would be a good idea to produce a sequel series. (6 upvotes)
How did you guys do on lvov's diff eq test (2 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"Tulane University"
Location(29.9353, -90.1227)
When the lights shut off  and it's my turn to settle down,  my main concern: Promise that you will clear my history Promise that you will clear my history  (0 upvotes)
So how early is too early to order a pizza? (2 upvotes)
I cut myself and I drank to cope with it and my friends knew about it but just didn't care enough to deal with me anymore. Great love feeling worthless.  (-2 upvotes)
What's a good mcat score on the new one (0 upvotes)
Actually how selective is the RA interview process?  (-4 upvotes)
I'm too nervous to experiment  (6 upvotes)
Four girls in a row walking in the middle of the street,  yelling asshole at the car who tried to get them to move to the sidewalk so it could pass. Oh Tulane... (19 upvotes)
I never understood why people murder people, then I did a group project on my own.  While I will never murder anyone, I sure do understand it now. (15 upvotes)
So many salty rejects. This is what happens when you give participation trophies to everyone as a child.  (25 upvotes)
Nothing turns me on more than a crowd loudly booing Trump (1 upvotes)
When u work ur ass off here and still can't get good grades :-) (5 upvotes)
When your extremely hung over looking at snaps from tulane friends with all that alcohol is the worst  (-1 upvotes)
So how many people do you think actually use yik yak? My estimate is 1000 Tulane kids and 500 Loyola/Xavier kids. (1 upvotes)
100s of people apply to TEMS, maybe they cut you because you didn't interview well... Ever thought of that? (4 upvotes)
Laughing my ass off at all of the whiny crybabies bitching on yik yak over not being picked for TEMS. (3 upvotes)
I just cried for the first time in years at the ending of Argo even though I've seen it before (0 upvotes)
To everyone who got hurt by the TEMS selection, I am sorry but unfortunately that is how most of Tulane's selective organizations work, as we will see in a week or so when HRL posts their RA decisions (12 upvotes)
Is there a way here to actually approach a girl and ask for a date or am I better off just using past methods of hooking up first with her elsewhere and then date ?  (3 upvotes)
TEMS, I don't hate you cuz you're fat. You're fat cuz I hate you (1 upvotes)
Question for girls. What are some fashion DONTS that guys should be aware of?  (5 upvotes)
Question for girls. What are some things a guy shouldn't wear if he wants to look good? My fashion needs some work. (-3 upvotes)
I've watched vines longer than this guy lasted in bed  (16 upvotes)
The new crosswalk signs are pissing me the fuck off (11 upvotes)
If you're done with someone/don't want to talk to them, please just tell them, being ignored hurts more  (10 upvotes)
Anyone know how many people TEMS actually accepts? It seems like it must be tiny considering how many people are complaining (-1 upvotes)
I'm just waiting until someone on the selection panel gets moral remorse, exposes them for the prejudiced assholes they are, and they get suspended again (-2 upvotes)
Well at least the freshman class learned why nobody respects TEMs so at least theres that (-4 upvotes)
I say all the non-Greeks start a Delta Tau Chi chapter (the frat in Animal House) and wage war against the asshole frats (3 upvotes)
Trynna get pot out of my system. Who has some cool methods! (-1 upvotes)
So in other news I was an EMT last summer, literally saved someone's life, responded to multiple major accidents, and apparently I'm not qualified for TEMS  (14 upvotes)
Streetcar goes all the way downtown currently, correct? (5 upvotes)
they should do an epic rap battles of history between kanye and trump (3 upvotes)
S/o to the frat kid who tried to fight my friend for no reason and said "my brothers and I will kick both your asses" when I tried to stop it. Your mentality is why there's war you fucking asshole. (19 upvotes)
Describe the last time you had sex with a song title. (3 upvotes)
He is so cute and i think he likes me but I cannot get him to talk to me! (-1 upvotes)
Fucccckkkk...stigmata AGAIN? (-3 upvotes)
I spotted an alien last night.  (12 upvotes)
Real talk to everyone who didn't get in to TEMS: don't feel down, it's most likely not your fault. They've always been a petty and cliquey group, I'm sorry you learned the hard way. TEMS ain't shit. (6 upvotes)
The following takes place between 11:03 A.M. and 11:04 A.M. (-1 upvotes)
Sooooo what is TEMs? I don't usually yak in this part of town.  (-1 upvotes)
Where's the best roast beef poboy around?? (1 upvotes)
I swear my school email gets more spam messages than my other two accounts combined (12 upvotes)
Tl;dr TEMS hasn't changed and a bunch of people were naive for applying and thinking they'd be different (6 upvotes)
Fuck the beeping at willow and mcalister  (24 upvotes)
My ex boyfriend tried to convince me to do anal because it will make pooping effortless.  (13 upvotes)
The Boot bouncers can be very unnecessarily rude. They don't need to be dicks to the people who are respecting their authority. (22 upvotes)
Yik yak was so annoying last night with all the excessive TEMs posts. New topic: what is everyone's favorite breed of dog? (11 upvotes)
Whoever was blasting music in or around Monroe earlier JUDGEMENT DAY IS COMING FOR YOU (7 upvotes)
When you're trying to get it in before your period comes and he's sort of oblivious...  (16 upvotes)
Frat hazing is disgusting  (9 upvotes)
Why do you block guys on grindr? (1 upvotes)
He doesn't understand he is the only guy I want to be with... (16 upvotes)
Five minutes into Great Gatsby and chill and she gives you the green light (254 upvotes)
why doesn't Krispy Kreme deliver yet?  (17 upvotes)
When u got a midterm tomorrow morning and your belligerent roommate decides to make as much loud noise as possible  (11 upvotes)
Man I thought when I came down to new orleans that I would have met lil wayne and he would have told me real gs move in silence like lasagna at least three times by now (14 upvotes)
Why am I so awkward around this babe I like. Like dammit I ruined it tonight (9 upvotes)
What is the best band of all time and why is it Lynyrd Skynyrd (4 upvotes)
I got no love for tems but I got to hand it off to the all star defense they have patrolling yak tonight (4 upvotes)
Lol imagine if girls were like this on yik yak after being cut from sororities (18 upvotes)
Lil sumpin ipa is delicious (1 upvotes)
What the fuck did you people expect? There were hundreds of applicants.  (22 upvotes)
There is no better feeling in this world than getting out of the shower, climbing into a bed with freshly washed sheets, and masturbating. (17 upvotes)
Sooo... Did you really think TEMS was going to take all of you?  (34 upvotes)
glad that people feel strongly about not being able to be an EMT at TU . Possibly means that they are upset about not being able to do something they truly want to. have EMT cert?  volunteer for VIGOR (19 upvotes)
Im happy I stayed up this late TEMS gettin straight up roasted  (2 upvotes)
If y'all have this many concerns, why not complain to TEMS instead of bitching on yikyak?  (10 upvotes)
people on TEMS give up hundreds of hours to take calls deal with your drunk asses and a handful of people are denouncing the organization because they didn't get in? very mature, so tulane (6 upvotes)
You didn't get into TEMS because they didn't like you enough. You crying on yik yak just confirms their suspicion of you ya whiners (-3 upvotes)
Did you guys think TEMS was taking every applicant? And yeah I'm sure they appreciate that you supported them when they were in trouble. Does that mean you should just get in? (9 upvotes)
To the girl that just stepped in outside boot pizza and saved me from getting beat up by an asshole: You're amazing. Thanks for the pizza. (65 upvotes)
to the people bitching at TEMS for not letting you in- clearly they chose the right people to reject as I really don't want somebody who can't handle that rejection to be in charge of saving my life (36 upvotes)
Loling so hard about all the butthurt TEMS rejects on here looks like they cut all the whiny bitches up front (24 upvotes)
Rejection is a normal part of life. Take it as an opportunity to learn and improve.  (43 upvotes)
@ people so upset about being cut from TEMS that you're being petty, cruel, and vile: clearly if you can't regulate your emotions about rejection then how can you do it in a life/death situation? (24 upvotes)
I'd really like to have a text convo longer than 5 messages  (12 upvotes)
I just want a guy to wrap his arms around me, kiss my neck, and make me feel amazing.  (31 upvotes)
To the boot bouncers: I know you're trying your best and I appreciate it, but not every ID is fake.  (89 upvotes)
When you're hanging with your friends and everyone's talking at once and you can't get a word in edgewise is it even worth talking (11 upvotes)
If the temperature goes from 40 to 20, is it twice as cold or half as cold? (20 upvotes)
If it's not in your horoscope is it even gonna happen  (11 upvotes)
Every time I open up to you, you don't respond or disappear... Doing wonders for my trust issues.  (7 upvotes)
This tinder boy who said he didn't want anything serious is now gonna fly out to Nola and spend a week with me. Wtf does this mean?? Flying out is a little more than casual.  (14 upvotes)
Happily staying in to binge watch fuller house (15 upvotes)
It's almost amazing when really drunk people can act perfectly sober when talking to their RA (39 upvotes)
I miss having friends who respect me. I don't believe you can really care about someone if you don't try to care about or understand the littlest things that make them happy.  (13 upvotes)
You think you're better than me cause you're in a frat? While I make use of my days you can drink yours way (19 upvotes)
Winter is trumping (2 upvotes)
Three Flights Down - Yellowcard. If you need a good cry tonight, that song will do it  (3 upvotes)
You don't realize you're ugly until you go through over a week on tinder without one single God damn match  (8 upvotes)
When boot bouncers who are younger than you reject your real 21 yr old ID  (177 upvotes)
This fuller house stuff is cool but where is the new Gilmore girls startup  (40 upvotes)
sure hope the PETA reps stick around for crawfest (27 upvotes)
If I hear trump say "we're going to" one more time I'm going to hire a helicopter, rappel in front of him, tear his wig off, and punch that tomato  (44 upvotes)
Ahh the weekend my least favorite time of the week at Tulane... (10 upvotes)
Trying to drown out my sadness with The Beatles...and then Yesterday comes on. (13 upvotes)
Holy fuck it's been six years since 24 ended what the fuck (14 upvotes)
Nights like these remind me why I want to transfer  (6 upvotes)
Got to stay high all the time to get you off my mind  (14 upvotes)
The following takes place between 8:42 P.M. and 8:43 P.M. (7 upvotes)
We have achieved Idiocracy. Congrats, America. (8 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"UC Davis"
Location(38.3402, -121.5312)
Is Elk Grove a nice place to live?! (0 upvotes)
Any tips on giving good head? (-1 upvotes)
Im hella bitter when its valentines day but i try not to be so annoyed cause i know if i end up dating someone on valentines day ill most likely do every cliche thing possible (4 upvotes)
Wondering why there was so much depressing stuff on yik-yak and realized it's because I'm back home from college (-3 upvotes)
1st yak  (0 upvotes)
Wish I could find a nice girl. Been single for 3 years now  (2 upvotes)
Wtf are these terrible jokes (0 upvotes)
Damnnn last night was like turnt af  (0 upvotes)
picking my butt + chill (2 upvotes)
When you take a really good shit and say with pride: "good job, butt" (1 upvotes)
Really want to get drunk about now  (0 upvotes)
420: Exclusive Cookie Fam on deck... (-2 upvotes)
Who needs the dick (0 upvotes)
I'm the yak attack (1 upvotes)
Wowww 7 weeks ago since a yak (3 upvotes)
I really need my dick sucked  (1 upvotes)
Seriously Sac State needs to get their shit together because I'm over here paying $6,000+ every year to stress about not being able to get the classes I need.  (11 upvotes)
I want to go on a blind date (0 upvotes)
Cuddling with men tonight  (0 upvotes)
Really need to have sex soon like I can't take this anymore Ahha  (0 upvotes)
Elk Grove is so dead  (8 upvotes)
Lol every time I know I'm about to be stressing I just feel the pimples arising from my face  (13 upvotes)
I've been so horny lately  someone help me lol (3 upvotes)
I can't tell if it's actually cold outside or if I have just become a spoiled little bitch when it comes to weather. (9 upvotes)
why the yak so dry lately  (1 upvotes)
Want a last minute slutty costume? Dress up as any of my professors, they barely cover anything important. (7 upvotes)
Any Halloween parties this weekend? (0 upvotes)
Anyone look for  (1 upvotes)
Traveling is so stressful omfg (0 upvotes)
It's my 21st bday  (3 upvotes)
where do all of the attractive girls hang out in Elk Grove? (0 upvotes)
"What day is it today?" "It's October 3rd" no bitch it's SATURDAY! (1 upvotes)
It's only 2147 curfew isn't till 2200 why is that airman getting in trouble rn? In 35  (0 upvotes)
Lol when someone tries to act dumb and not know what's going on, but in reality they're making themselves look even more stupid because you already know what they're trying to do. (6 upvotes)
Anyone got dro for sale rn? (-2 upvotes)
When you have so many tears that it can help with the California drought. Get me a bucket and I got your back California.  (9 upvotes)
Who else is sitting on i5 in this traffic.  (2 upvotes)
Currently checking on "My Herd" from Mississippi, damn Elk Grove yak has died  (1 upvotes)
just moved to Elk Grove. what's the best place to go out and kiss girls? (0 upvotes)
When you come home from college and yak is dead af (2 upvotes)
Just came to check on my herd. What happened to EG yik yak? Ya'll are inactive now, I can see posts from weeks ago... (4 upvotes)
This Yak has less hits than sac city (0 upvotes)
#pizzafactory (0 upvotes)
Sup (0 upvotes)
I love you  (5 upvotes)
Damn who is the cutie with glasses on the boat? (0 upvotes)
Let's hang out? (4 upvotes)
Being home from college reminds me how dead this Yak is  (0 upvotes)
Pretty much  (2 upvotes)
I'm sorry that at the time I was so foolish, I wish that I could of had the honor to taken you to our Senior Ball.  (5 upvotes)
What's up Elk Grove? Currently yakking from LA. (-1 upvotes)
I'm so bored  (-1 upvotes)
So I just saved $196 by renting one book but I still paid $100 to rent that shit (-1 upvotes)
Any girls down to kick it? Hike? Movie? (-1 upvotes)
Boredddddd (0 upvotes)
Ugh fuck me. This week about to be shit (0 upvotes)
Being deployed in 2 weeks... Hoping I can stay with my girlfriend.... (2 upvotes)
When some people call it Walnut Grove, I get confused. 'Walent Gro' is how I grew up saying it.  (2 upvotes)
Let's hit the gym  (3 upvotes)
Who wants to hang out? (1 upvotes)
Someone hang out with me (2 upvotes)
S/O to my first job @ Old Navy. Without u I wouldn't be so efficient at folding clothes lol (9 upvotes)
Anyone wanna chat? Feeling lonely. (0 upvotes)
Currently doing kegal exercises  (1 upvotes)
And girls that wanna hook up with a strong guy with a sixpack, comment below. (0 upvotes)
Can someone talk to me  (4 upvotes)
Where the single girls at? (-1 upvotes)
Someone go to the gym with me (0 upvotes)
To be honest, I miss the University of Arizona campus. (3 upvotes)
Food  (0 upvotes)
Hi  (-1 upvotes)
Had unprotected sex during confirmed ovulation. Feel like I'm playing a two week long game of Russian roulette. (3 upvotes)
Who has tree for sale? (1 upvotes)
She loving the crew! (1 upvotes)
I'm bored (1 upvotes)
...at least life wants to fuck me (15 upvotes)
cheating and side hoe culture isnt cute or funny its gross and misogynistic so bye if you are an enabler to any of that shit (14 upvotes)
Passing by from LA to Sacramento... Horny af though :/ (0 upvotes)
That moment where you're like 'I need an adult I can't do this' and you realize you are the adult. (12 upvotes)
I feel like this heat intensifies every emotion I am experiencing (3 upvotes)
When you have to go from "Oh that's my best friend" to "I used to know her" is one of the hardest things (10 upvotes)
Watching the Big Lebowski for the first time.amazing amazing and amazing  (1 upvotes)
I want some more friends well more new friends  (2 upvotes)
Who else has fomos (fears of missing out)about they're friends  (2 upvotes)
I hooked up with a guy from here  (0 upvotes)
People are....... Interesting haha  (1 upvotes)
I want some head from a girl (-1 upvotes)
It's crazy to think that " I have to shit" moment can strike at any time  (4 upvotes)
If we're being honest, I never really gave much of a damn about you. (2 upvotes)
I got a c- in history but hey at least I past!  (0 upvotes)
The feelings are so real that it hurts to pretend it never happened.  (3 upvotes)
You never really understand how much someone means to you until they're gone (1 upvotes)
Only 18 and already got old man knees (5 upvotes)
Yikyak is like fishing... (-2 upvotes)
Who on here goes to college out of state?! (0 upvotes)
I love being told all my flaws over the phone by a drunk 50 yr old.  (0 upvotes)
Acorn (0 upvotes)
Green Canoe (0 upvotes)
Horny. Again :( (3 upvotes)
Does anyone know how to get into porn? Just asking for a friend (1 upvotes)
I've never had sex under the covers or with the lights off  (3 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"University of IllinoisUrbana-Champaign"
Location(40.0618, -88.1343)
"University of IllinoisUrbana-Champaign" sucks
"University of WisconsinMadison"
Location(43.0667, -89.4)
About ready to punch the high schoolers shouting "MOOYAH" outside of the restaurant. Go home  (3 upvotes)
The sexiest goddamn thing is the little shimmy girls do when they are pulling their leggings up a little in public.  (4 upvotes)
Good news. I pet a dog today (1 upvotes)
Would any badger like to come slacklining with me? (1 upvotes)
I think I'm done grieving. Hello world. :D (1 upvotes)
Anyone else not get the appeal of the wrestling? Like if I wanted to watch a bunch of dudes dry humping each other, I would've joined a fraternity  (8 upvotes)
The tall Brillion manager at the Hyatt is fine af (-3 upvotes)
Do black people use Sun screen? (2 upvotes)
RIP to that girl's phone on the Wisconsin story (1 upvotes)
Everyone get outside. Now. It's snowing soon so you better enjoy this while it lasts (-1 upvotes)
People ripping stave a new one for being invited to the combine. Give the guy a break.  (4 upvotes)
Offered my Facebook name or phone number to a good looking guy last night. He said phone number would be nice, & then told me he had a girlfriend, but he would still like my number. Mad respect. (-3 upvotes)
At least kites are only $10 (9 upvotes)
What's the sundress appeal? I never knew they were such an obsession.  (5 upvotes)
I feel a lot like regret this morning (0 upvotes)
You haven't really tried to fix your car until you have kicked the bumper as hard as you can  (4 upvotes)
Maybe some may not think so, but sometimes I feel like walking into a hotel when walking into Dejope. Reminded that I'm pretty thankful for being in UWMadison. (4 upvotes)
If I ever lose my wiscard and someone finds it I really hope they just message me instead of posting it with my god awful picture... (25 upvotes)
Will never understand people who just whine and mope around feeling sorry for themselves all day and then complain about their life. Get your negative ass self outta here (4 upvotes)
Sudden surge of Hawaiian shirts and salmon shorts near Langdon area.  (24 upvotes)
Joel Stave showing up at the combine  (7 upvotes)
Cheapest liquor store within a 10 minute drive? (0 upvotes)
College court is back open for business tonight (5 upvotes)
I wrote swag on my light switch, so every time I walk in my room, I turn my swag on. (6 upvotes)
An eternal question: if you eat your first meal of the day at 12:30 is it breakfast or lunch? (2 upvotes)
Ladies, where can I buy inexpensive and cute sundresses? (2 upvotes)
So much alcohol so little time  (1 upvotes)
#NeverTrump (13 upvotes)
The parents are in... Bring on the tension (5 upvotes)
I just saw 6 dogs within 10 feet of each other and I don't think I've ever been happier. (19 upvotes)
College basketball and chill? (8 upvotes)
You're welcome.  (23 upvotes)
What are some good things to do outside today since it's so nice?  (2 upvotes)
I feel like something is wrong with me. I have to constantly being doing something or I'm bored and in a bad mood. But I don't have enough friends to constantly be doing something  (2 upvotes)
Can the sundresses come back now please (18 upvotes)
Beautiful day outside and I'm inside taking a 4 hour practice MCAT test...... (12 upvotes)
Welcome back overcompensating train operator (15 upvotes)
My roommate just yelled at me for waking him up. Bitch, you are not ruining this beautiful day  (17 upvotes)
That feeling when you take a dump right after you smoke a jay. (9 upvotes)
It's too nice outside for me to justify laying in bed all day... (11 upvotes)
My parents are visiting me today. So I spent my whole morning cleaning so I look more like a responsible adult (10 upvotes)
Be a hero. #FreeNireaux (5 upvotes)
Got a text from an old ex, with whom I haven't spoken with in years. I kindly responded with "tits or gtfo" (40 upvotes)
Everyone out in the sun today like  (100 upvotes)
It's 56 degrees and it's Saturday. I guess I should move the TV outside. #smashfest (53 upvotes)
Such a nice day and I've got to study astronomy.  (11 upvotes)
Why does it seem like most girls would rather get hook ups to having a relationship  (2 upvotes)
Is it weird that I just want to eat a girl out?? Like she doesn't even have to reciprocate anything, I've just been wanting to lately (9 upvotes)
Need some of these right now (22 upvotes)
Fraternity: a herd of douches (58 upvotes)
Who's got a frisbee that wants to get out and go to bascom? (3 upvotes)
Just got a package of candy from my church back home... Don't know if I should be thankful, or worried they know where I live now (27 upvotes)
Let the campus wide day drinking commence (9 upvotes)
If I hear "WELCOME TO THE KOHL CENTER" echo through my bedroom one more time... (40 upvotes)
I love how the weather boosts everyone's attitude.  (24 upvotes)
Gotta love beautiful weekends in Madison (34 upvotes)
Haven't self harmed in 3 days, haven't though about suicide for a week, been sober for a month. Things are looking up  (146 upvotes)
I wanna go outside but idk what to do.  (14 upvotes)
I'll never understand what part of "silent section" PEOPLE DO NOT FUCKING GET (12 upvotes)
Waking up to a cracked phone screen<<<<< (5 upvotes)
It sucks when your friends get in a relationship and then forget about you (11 upvotes)
Really need some friends...I'm shy and bad at meeting people so it's hard. (34 upvotes)
I love when my roommate goes home (28 upvotes)
WARNING THERE IS SNOW IN THE FORECAST ON TUESDAY. DON'T PUT AWAY YOUR COATS YET (19 upvotes)
Where should i study today? College lib or union south? Purple canoe decides. (2 upvotes)
Do frat bros think they are cool when they play music so loud the whole block can hear it? (7 upvotes)
I think I'm gonna head to the terrace to study. Oh wait.... (53 upvotes)
Girls who think guys don't notice them, that's not true. Even if you're no super model, I promise there are less attractive people than you. Everyone has their match, it'll come eventually (7 upvotes)
Still have almost 40 packets of hot chocolate i need to drink before it gets warm (47 upvotes)
Guy at dejope: "dude I had the best apple juice ever last night" that didn't go where I was expecting it to (57 upvotes)
Someone needs to take the mic away from the guy at the kohl center.  (8 upvotes)
Get your hungover ass outside  (23 upvotes)
Anyone know a good place on campus for shoes? (I'm a guy) (0 upvotes)
Being on the rowing team is like being vegan. Nobody cares, but you still want everybody to know anyway (81 upvotes)
Really wish I could spend this beautiful day with this dude. Miss him  (22 upvotes)
Honey you must be new age music, because I love listening to you for about two seconds and then wish you'd just shut up and leave me alone. (15 upvotes)
So as a prospective grad student visiting Madison, is there anything I should know about the school? (6 upvotes)
Again, there are two types of people  (151 upvotes)
I'll take "Burning Bridges With One Of The Few People You Care About" for $100, Alex (17 upvotes)
I cannot stand my roommate. You are the epitome of a shitty person. That is all. Glad I got that off my chest (2 upvotes)
Is there any place to do homework outside today? (8 upvotes)
I have a question for any females. Do you ever get a weird shaking/pulsating twitch in your legs when a guy is going down on you? It's uncomfortable and I usually have to tell them to stop  (0 upvotes)
I really like my gf, but the fact she does drugs bothers me (5 upvotes)
Spending the day playing Original Pokemon RBY and reliving my childhood.  (16 upvotes)
My Annual Advice for the high schoolers visiting campus: If you have some time to kill and want to work out, head to the Red Gym. It has world class staff and equipment!  (167 upvotes)
Good morning! look at my cat  (112 upvotes)
I asked uhs to see a therapist over a month ago. I still cant see one for two weeks and ive started cutting myself. Fuck uhs theyre failing students everywhere. (5 upvotes)
Anyone have any foolproof hangover cures? (3 upvotes)
Fuck you knee, I just want to go outside and do shit and you're just like lol nope I'm going to keep hurting (8 upvotes)
I literally peed in my bed last night I was so drunk (8 upvotes)
When it hits 50 degrees in Wisconsin  (264 upvotes)
Last night I told my boyfriend that I was depressed and all he said was sorry and left to get wasted with his friends.  (29 upvotes)
why are all the marching band girls beautiful  (11 upvotes)
My ass is finally starting to look lifted!!  (7 upvotes)
Is it lame I do 80s step aerobics to get in shape?  (38 upvotes)
No. More. Drunk. Tinder. I don't know what to do with all of the thirsty boys who just messaged me... (29 upvotes)
I need a full body massage. Everything is so sorr (6 upvotes)
The zombies are in Janesville.  (0 upvotes)
The two types of people (341 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"Lehigh University"
Location(40.6072, -75.379)
I missed rush but I wear crocs, a fedora, cargo shorts, and ride around on my razor scooter. Can I still get a bid? (0 upvotes)
Is lambda still nationally recognized? (0 upvotes)
You know your tag game strong when your signature hit is squidward dabbing (1 upvotes)
I hate how I go from thinking I look super fit and good one day, to feeling so fat and gross the next.  (8 upvotes)
So many people look better from behind, probably including myself. (1 upvotes)
Why the f isn't Lucy's open on Saturdays  (1 upvotes)
Chi psi registered on the hill 10 pm (4 upvotes)
When you too scared to poop because yo asshole is chapped from the rapidly changing weather and not enough heat  (5 upvotes)
If I managed my bank account like I manage my phone battery, I'd be rich. (7 upvotes)
Bold strategy Cotton, let's see if it pays off for em (9 upvotes)
Being love sick makes everything 100 times harder.. (2 upvotes)
If u don't air drum listening to "In The Air Tonight by Phil Collins you aren't American  (4 upvotes)
Why have their not been many parties this semester  (5 upvotes)
My man! (14 upvotes)
I'm always watching you (5 upvotes)
How do I jerk off without touching my penis? (2 upvotes)
Best sophomore dorm? (3 upvotes)
What the fuck is squidward doing on a rock? (6 upvotes)
When you tryna study but ur tired so you pop an addy but it turns out to be a bar  (5 upvotes)
I get irrationally angry when someone comes into the library and starts talking loudly. Like do you have no self awareness or are you just an asshole (12 upvotes)
Reinstated fraternities don't get cool for at least 10 years (9 upvotes)
WEST BROM 2 - CRYSTAL PALACE 0  (0 upvotes)
Do people in Taylor interact with eachother? Like are they social? (2 upvotes)
heads up: the Girl Scouts that set up shop in Rathbone are fucking vultures. Do not be fooled.  (24 upvotes)
I got DPed last night. Fuck. (8 upvotes)
are the 2 person studio apartments in sayre any good? (2 upvotes)
Ate Chipotle last night. No symptoms of disease. It's only been a day.  (12 upvotes)
With the advent of self-driving cars, I want to see Nascar reinvent itself into a robot death race. People only car about crashes anyway. (19 upvotes)
the fact that me not being in Greek life means basically no partying, I wish I chose to go to BC instead (1 upvotes)
I hate when my dick touches the water...  (3 upvotes)
How is everyone studying for Eco29 with irina (4 upvotes)
I feel like frats are filled with tons of lax bros and rich hockey kids from Connecticut/NY (18 upvotes)
You don't realize how ugly you are until you put your face on someone else's head (35 upvotes)
Good morning and happy Saturday. Smile and take a walk outside and don't do any work today. It's gonna be a great  (17 upvotes)
My asshole is burning (10 upvotes)
K Sig is pussy  (28 upvotes)
Ksig is hot shit til they get confronted  (18 upvotes)
7-2 ksig can't take shit  (4 upvotes)
Ksig can't fight  (14 upvotes)
I think I am in love with my best friend. (7 upvotes)
Where is everyone? Seems as though nobody really went out tonight. Hawksnest is empty (2 upvotes)
Still up watching fuller house. 10 out of 10 recommend. Only thing I don't like is the laugh track, but serious, watch this shit.  (8 upvotes)
Me hoy noy me noy (13 upvotes)
Only exercise I've done this year is running out of money  (57 upvotes)
Need new people to talk to (14 upvotes)
I just wanna know that I'll fall in love with someone who loves me back someday  (52 upvotes)
Ted Cruz is The Zodiac Killer (30 upvotes)
Savage af (22 upvotes)
Wanting to go out tonight as my second time this semester, but I don't know where and with who  (9 upvotes)
Spent every night with this guy not necessarily having sex sometimes just cuddling and talking just to find out he has a girlfriend back at home. Then guys wonder why. (36 upvotes)
I can't be the only one who is over the it's lit snaps on lehigh.snaps. Very original.. (14 upvotes)
Who wants to go out and have a bunch of drinks with me? (22 upvotes)
Anyone else already halfway through Fuller House? (7 upvotes)
Revolutionary idea: Sanders/Kasich ticket (12 upvotes)
I feel like my penis has gotten bigger in the past year but I don't have a ruler (10 upvotes)
Lol at the stairs from Drown to Lindy -- just long enough you have to take two steps on each step. Until you reach that one awkward stair where you switch feet.  (98 upvotes)
Wish I could find a girl down for a fwb (8 upvotes)
About to be single for the rest of my life fuck it (55 upvotes)
Chris Christie for Secretary of Transportation? (38 upvotes)
What's the move tonight boys? (2 upvotes)
How difficult is the Eco 45 midterm? (6 upvotes)
S/O to the kid who pissed on the coals in the sauna at Taylor Gym, I hope you choke and die on some AIDS needles it smells awful (45 upvotes)
Pro tip: a sports bra can double as crotchless panties (24 upvotes)
Dicks are so weird  (39 upvotes)
Chi Psi registered party on the hill Saturday night!! Open party  (28 upvotes)
KD takes theme parties way too seriously  (30 upvotes)
If you had to choose between sex and pizza, what toppings would you get? (20 upvotes)
Any battletech players here? (2 upvotes)
**rathbone's windows (126 upvotes)
Will Christie really be Trump's running mate? (7 upvotes)
Growing up is realizing the bottom bunk is probably more convenient. (189 upvotes)
Why don't all exercise machines allow the user produce electicity? (25 upvotes)
Some people want to watch the world burn (13 upvotes)
Does the health center give out ice packs to use? (4 upvotes)
My weekend is going to suck all of my teachers somehow have a test on Monday they must all talk to each other and plan these things #hatemylife (9 upvotes)
It says it on yik yak, it must be true  (42 upvotes)
Being a pet rock must suck. You never die, so you wind up watching the people who take care of you die instead. (91 upvotes)
MCCOY!!!!! (22 upvotes)
I hate people but it's okay bc people hate me too  (9 upvotes)
People in Dodson's 205: He is now taking attendance in class (22 upvotes)
Too depressed to move from bed today. (11 upvotes)
College used to be a place for the free discussion of ideas. Don't let the regressive left crybullies win and turn it into a "safe space" for their misguided feelings.  (39 upvotes)
Starting to hate everything. Is this adulthood? (19 upvotes)
Your worst enemies used to be your friends. (10 upvotes)
Always masturbate before interviews.  (60 upvotes)
Some of the people here are whiter than albino polar bears drinking milk, in a snowstorm while watching Frozen (22 upvotes)
Cut . It . Out. (52 upvotes)
Truer words have never been spoken. It was like a move that would have saved anyone's ass from being fired in The Apprentice Boardroom (21 upvotes)
Kissing is like a blowjob for your mouth. (16 upvotes)
Fuck Chem (26 upvotes)
Dance with me darling; we haven't danced, since I don't know when. Do you remember that song Meredith? Dance will me darling. Kiss me; embrace me. Kiss me; in case we don't meet again! (0 upvotes)
AEPi needs to chill with the yaks today (25 upvotes)
Chris Christie is so embarrassing.  (5 upvotes)
Residential service must have went to Lafayette. First fire inspactions and now fire inspecitons. (47 upvotes)
Pike are all a bunch of fucking nerds (1 upvotes)
Donald Trump running mate: Chris Christie (44 upvotes)
Christie endorses Trump!! (5 upvotes)
Christmas Saucon killing it with the two ply TP (38 upvotes)
Go suck an anal-bead  (8 upvotes)
It's too late in the semester to be stealing unassigned seats (204 upvotes)
Is tinder the most popular dating app around here or is there something else people use? (7 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"Northeastern University"
Location(42.3389, -71.0903)
remember eating dinner at your friends' houses? (0 upvotes)
That moment when you take off your bra and let the girls loose  (0 upvotes)
curious guys? I have the room to myself for a while  (0 upvotes)
Don't be with people that treat you like Kanye treats the cousin that stole his laptop  (2 upvotes)
I've accepted the fact that Ima do shitty on this quiz FML  (2 upvotes)
When a cute boy makes eye contact with you and you stare at him ferociously to assert your dominance and later question why you're single. I'm so bad at flirting.  (6 upvotes)
They love each other  (8 upvotes)
I really fucking don't want to live with my roommate again, and I don't know who else to ask. Wtf do I do lol (5 upvotes)
I'm singing irony by the wonder girls and annoying the crap out of my roommate  (-1 upvotes)
Who needs weed? (0 upvotes)
Me:" hey what do you think is the longest way to kill a person?" Roommate:" You wait" (10 upvotes)
Sour diesel, blue dream, white widow, and hindu kush in my stash. Prohibition is working out great! (2 upvotes)
What should I do tonight?  (0 upvotes)
It's 2016, the remix to ignition is no longer hot and fresh out the kitchen (1 upvotes)
Reuse coconut water bottles thank me later (1 upvotes)
I don't mean, to seem like I care about material things, like a social status. (5 upvotes)
I could be in Maine by the time the green line gets here (7 upvotes)
Bitches crazy  (5 upvotes)
Whenever I go out there's a 1000% chance im ending my night at Beantown tacqueria  (6 upvotes)
Any anti-anxiety prefs besides weed? Was thinking a nootropic or some script (1 upvotes)
I'm starting to dabble in stocks. I have no idea what I'm doing. Wish me luck  (0 upvotes)
I just took a poop so big that it tired me out  (5 upvotes)
My uber driver is using a Morgan Freeman setting on his gps. What a time to be alive. (39 upvotes)
Trying to poop with a tampon in  (3 upvotes)
What are the best PCs under $500? And why? My mac crashed and I need a new computer asap (2 upvotes)
It feels so weird to use a stall that someone just walked out of because their bare ass was touching the seat less than a 30 seconds ago. Like that seat hasn't had any cool-down time.  (12 upvotes)
Anybody listened to the slowed down version of the weeknd? (-1 upvotes)
Should I add and message a girl I have a crush on on Facebook if I don't know when I'll see her again? (6 upvotes)
About to buy Pokemon Red after watching full house all morning. Am I in 1996 or 2016? #qtc (7 upvotes)
PSA there is a club penguin app. And it is a game changer.  (10 upvotes)
I'm still in bed lol (3 upvotes)
Anyone else have neighbors who practice instruments for hours and hours? I just want to chill and have a quiet afternoon  (2 upvotes)
help can someone please tell me where to buy a 3DS charger around here (-1 upvotes)
When you break up with your boyfriend and you realize you lost all your friends  (9 upvotes)
Sexual tension is rough. She's so hot... And so my type.. But I'm with someone. I'm a dick right?  (3 upvotes)
Stop wearing Canada Goose (6 upvotes)
Cheeto fingers turn to dorito fingers. (4 upvotes)
When watching crimes shows I sometimes think about what a terrible witness I would be. Like I don't think I could describe my own mother to a sketch artist   (5 upvotes)
getting an IUD and am supposed to get it while I'm on my period but I got my period 2 weeks early so now I don't know if I get it now or wait till I was supposed to get my period. Men have it so easy. (2 upvotes)
Shotgunning 3 beers before going out last night was a great idea... (2 upvotes)
Fuck you sinus drainage (2 upvotes)
La Vie Boheme (5 upvotes)
In female shopping stores they should have like a super smash bros corner or just a gaming area for guys. #thinkingselfishly  (14 upvotes)
Oh another Sponge Bob image. Super cool nerdarios (-1 upvotes)
The em dash is the greatest typographic mark of all time (2 upvotes)
The wheels on the T go *unintelligible screeching* (142 upvotes)
Pro tip: have a page requirement for that essay? Struggling to write quality material? Highlight all text, right click > font > advanced tab > spacing: Expanded by: 0.2 pt > press OK. You're welcome (2 upvotes)
I hate shared bathrooms so much on weekends...its like the toilets turn into Jackson Pollock paintings  (10 upvotes)
"How do I find out if a girl is interested? Great question. I usually just assume they're not" (18 upvotes)
Bong Hits 4 Jesus (22 upvotes)
Nationalism lead to both world wars (3 upvotes)
Anyone have lots of "school friends" but no "weekend friends" (30 upvotes)
I genuinely tear up whenever I see the scene in Rugrats in Paris where Chuckie doesn't have a mom to dance with (17 upvotes)
When you realize that your roommate is a complete piece of shit (4 upvotes)
You know it's real when he's not grossed out when you throw up from food poisoning and he just wants to take care of you  (10 upvotes)
Think I like girls too.. (18 upvotes)
Number one reason I can't get out of bed in the morning: I'm too comfortable. Number one reason I can't fall asleep: not comfortable enough to. Hmmmmm (13 upvotes)
Would a girl purposefully make something up to make her bf/ex jealous?  (1 upvotes)
They feel when you pull into a parking space and notice there is a sign in front of it saying "Reserved for JOHN CENA" and next thing you know you're getting rekt (5 upvotes)
The fact that the guy sitting across from me at the BPL and I keep making eyes at each other is making studying very difficult this afternoon but I also don't want to move.  (6 upvotes)
Feel like someone threw a brick at my face and hit me straight on. It's gonna be a good day. (9 upvotes)
When ladies squat  (7 upvotes)
Deleted tinder last week for many reasons but now I just want to get it back. Someone talk me off the ledge (-4 upvotes)
Smoking up a girl who has never smoked before yields adorable results (16 upvotes)
I wonder if, in the history of the universe, a political Facebook argument has ever actually changed someone's opinion. I swear people just argue craving the attention of those who think like them (14 upvotes)
Not hungover thankfully but definitely too exhausted from last night to do anything productive (9 upvotes)
I wish i became hungover instead of insatiabley horny (-4 upvotes)
If you could be told right now who your future spouse will be, would you want to? (4 upvotes)
I really want a girlfriend, but I really need a casual fuck buddy until I can get a girlfriend (11 upvotes)
I miss the way we'd chill on the hillside  (2 upvotes)
Where is the Bernie Sanders rally today? (1 upvotes)
My internal monologue.  (61 upvotes)
When you don't want to study so badly that you resort to reading your Venmo feed.  (15 upvotes)
I want cheese  (8 upvotes)
Quick way to lose 10 pounds?  (7 upvotes)
Any meal plans or restaurants that do meal plans for weight loss? And weight loss ideas for food?  (2 upvotes)
Healthy, casual places to eat?  Preferably where they have nutrition info available  (4 upvotes)
Best places to eat alone and work on laptop? Other than panera, pavement, Starbucks....  (7 upvotes)
Dear Yak, I hope your day makes you as happy as this Corgi  (37 upvotes)
If I get married, I'm just giving my mother and mother in law a firm wedding budget and letting them plan it. Less stressful than trying to do it myself and please everyone.  (7 upvotes)
Junior year has me thinking every girl I get involved with has a small probability of being my wife  (34 upvotes)
Booty had me like  (64 upvotes)
sometimes I feel like my guy friends are flirting with me but then they'll mention girls they're trying to hook up with & im just left confused (48 upvotes)
Thinking about just doing random housing next year in the off chance I get accidentally adopted by a good group of people  (68 upvotes)
Tfw you want to make out with significant other in the morning but you both got garbage breath.  (26 upvotes)
"Happy 20th Birthday Pokemon!" From a boy who wants to quit college and become pokemon master because midterm. (58 upvotes)
Hangover shits are the worst kind of shits (20 upvotes)
Why do all my friends keep falling for each other? Stop it guys don't ruin the group with your feelings!  (9 upvotes)
Im just trying to fucking vote in a primary as a United States citizen and once again I am denied the ability to. (3 upvotes)
For you, I would do what I can but I can't change the way that I am. (1 upvotes)
Even my dreams are unsuccessful  (13 upvotes)
Anyone wanna go get brunch? (4 upvotes)
Anyone who subscribes to the alpha male/beta male theory of human interaction is almost definitely an asshole who doesn't understand why they're an asshole (15 upvotes)
When your professor starts writing confusing shit on the board and they know nobody understands it. (41 upvotes)
Anybody at umb who's good with accounting can u help me out please (0 upvotes)
DAE BC IS DUMB?!?! (1 upvotes)
Confirmed: BC doesn't know what the Roman numeral for 4 is. Thought you all might like to know. (220 upvotes)
I know an Indian girl who always talks about white colonialism, reparations and stuff like that. Yet, she's sucked the dick of basically every white guy in our extended friend group. (1 upvotes)
Where's everybody going out tonight? Couldn't find a decent place to go to yesterday.  (-1 upvotes)
The sexual tension between me and my friend is so thick you can cut with a knife.  (64 upvotes)
Im calling bullshit on all these roomate walks in on you masturbating yaks. Lock the fuckin door idiot (8 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"Pennsylvania State University - University Park"
Location(40.7961, -77.8628)
I still play with dollies (0 upvotes)
Bill is out there telling vets to shut up and listen. Classy Bill (2 upvotes)
Whats lit (0 upvotes)
It makes me sick to see how much people like worship alcohol.  (3 upvotes)
the succ (0 upvotes)
We're loved everywhere! We are! (1 upvotes)
I wish SPD was about toking it up rather than binge drinking. It would be a much more peaceful and chill holiday.  (4 upvotes)
Fuckity fuck fuck fuck you fucking fuckers (3 upvotes)
Sorry I don't want to drink because I'm depressed and don't want to make it worse? You bitching at me doesn't help at all either. (1 upvotes)
When you are the only stoned person in a sea of drunks  (0 upvotes)
Have an oral midterm on Monday and the prof still hasn't put the prompt on ANGEL like wtf (7 upvotes)
Look son, degenerate people are out. (4 upvotes)
State College: Irish this weekend, Chinatown next weekend. (14 upvotes)
Watching a drunk kid across the street -- with a police car and ambulance called in. What a waste of resources.  (12 upvotes)
when you don't drink and feel like a total outcast to the point you don't want to be here  (13 upvotes)
Wow two fake profiles on grindr right now so awesome (2 upvotes)
How the fuck did I get herpes if I'm a virgin  (3 upvotes)
Ayy lmao  (13 upvotes)
Is Downtown crowded? (2 upvotes)
Pooping at the moment  (9 upvotes)
Pro tip: If she likes alot of cum, go a week of masturbation without finishing. The results are amazing. (8 upvotes)
I think there are state high girls in disguise at the party.  (8 upvotes)
So the huge old spice guy is addicted to porn. That explains why he's so huge. (3 upvotes)
S.o. to the kid in front of me during my exam. You helped me get the first 2 right (5 upvotes)
The amount of dudes that "are hard" is crazy. I'm a pretty sheltered white dude and I'm harder than 90% of the people here easy. It's not a competition, but Jesus you just sound so stupid (0 upvotes)
Toon tards  (8 upvotes)
If I wear all green, how much will I pull? (2 upvotes)
That time of the year again where people look at me weird or drunkenly yell at me for not drinking (12 upvotes)
Roommate just asked if I yak about her. You could have cut the tension in the room with one of knives she hasn't washed up (21 upvotes)
Fyi bri doesn't fuck like a dead fish.  (4 upvotes)
Unfortunately my main jacket is mostly green.... (-2 upvotes)
Patrick has the right idea. (13 upvotes)
Moms cookie recipe said to make with love but it didnt say how much so i put a whole bunch in and now everyone at the bake sale is kissing (3 upvotes)
v this guy giving out spoilers  (1 upvotes)
I wish our school wouldn't destroy the beautiful memories of THON with absent minded drinking. (6 upvotes)
RIP Han Solo (17 upvotes)
Temple kids don't see anything wrong with the water in Flint (4 upvotes)
Ben Franklin has fucked more hoes then you.  (14 upvotes)
Jesus Christ why are there high school kids here?! (32 upvotes)
I prefer my war heroes uncaptured (2 upvotes)
Dear drunk people,  STAY OUT OF THE FUCKING ROAD! (30 upvotes)
Is PSU know how helpful ? (0 upvotes)
Anyone in cedar brook apartments have a blow dryer sos  (0 upvotes)
As a liberal, I have to hand it to the RNC for not actively trying to win the nomination for one of their candidates. Too bad the same can't be said about the DNC.  (5 upvotes)
Fuck temple (8 upvotes)
I wonder if I'm going to go on Yik Yak after college (10 upvotes)
The whole thing about not speaking ill of the dead is bullshit. Some people were awful people and the world is a better place without them.  (0 upvotes)
I like walking around with my backpack full of books so the cops stop me.  (4 upvotes)
Even the boy genius will get his nut on st pattys (15 upvotes)
Temple kids put their degree on their rearview mirror so they can park in the handicap spots (23 upvotes)
Based on Tinder I can say PSU 1st, WVU 2nd, Pitt 3rd, Temple 4th, and IUP 5th (20 upvotes)
Up this if you've been stopped by the cops today (3 upvotes)
When your jam comes on but you're drunk af and fall down trying to express that you like the song  (3 upvotes)
3 exams next week. Time to study :) (15 upvotes)
What is this day (-2 upvotes)
When you tell her to hurry up but she keeps Stalin.  (27 upvotes)
If you invited friends in from out of town, please jump off the highest building (6 upvotes)
Who's seeing Weezy? (3 upvotes)
Just called cops on entire floor at Meridian II  (20 upvotes)
Quitting smoking today. Any advice? (1 upvotes)
The best way I can think to spend this weekend:staying in, playing videogames with my buds, a little cards against humanity. Icould never get into the party scene, and I'm glad I have friends be with. (11 upvotes)
Just took a deep clean shower to wash away last nights sins.  (5 upvotes)
Are the bars packed right now? (0 upvotes)
What should i get from big bowl  (0 upvotes)
Why can't I find anyone that can handle hard alcohol? (1 upvotes)
Gotta love spending my State Patty's working on an essay  (3 upvotes)
Guys with kilts.  (5 upvotes)
I should really go drink but holy shit my bed is comfortable (22 upvotes)
If Hilary Clinton cant satisfy her husband. What makes you think she can satisfy America? (5 upvotes)
"Fuck you" - my liver (0 upvotes)
haha this is au  (-2 upvotes)
No wonder why Asians are richer. They hit the library while white boys hit the bars and get wasted. Talking about work ethics. (34 upvotes)
boutta take my 4th jger bomb up my asshole #turntupstatepattys (9 upvotes)
Yeah, go ahead and send that 12th unanswered text in a row - Tequila  (4 upvotes)
Is there an art supply store downtown? (1 upvotes)
*Takes 20$ out of atm* *blacks out* *wakes up with 40$ in wallet* (1 upvotes)
Do you have a dream? Perhaps it is the wrong dream.  (3 upvotes)
Anyone else not going out this weekend?  (13 upvotes)
State Patty's Day the movie: 50 Shades of Green (5 upvotes)
Gonna take loop bus to library, bus is packed with idiots in green. (5 upvotes)
I'd honestly prefer a regular weekend where parties are at night then go to a daylong on State Patties Day (19 upvotes)
When your stomach echoes in the library<<< (1 upvotes)
Any time I have my lows in life, I think about how at least I don't go to Temple and immediately feel better. (12 upvotes)
As a girl with short hair, there is no greater confidence builder than when I get a haircut; I feel sexy, edgy, like an entirely new person.  (-2 upvotes)
IUP kids want to stop chanting in the apartment next to me it's next level annoying  (8 upvotes)
You go ahead and send that 12th unanswered text message in a row - Tequila  (7 upvotes)
Is the fire in university gateway real? Cuz I'd rather not leave, I gotta pee (1 upvotes)
Can we play tag on the HUB lawn? (13 upvotes)
I live on an all-guys floor and a group of temple girls just took half the bathroom stalls. WTF (14 upvotes)
When you don't have any partys to go to today   (0 upvotes)
Any skinny asians boys want to chat? (2 upvotes)
Shout out to Temple girls for being slightly uglier than PSU girls, so us second and third tier guys get some. (27 upvotes)
"The chicken nuggets taste the same the second time" (1 upvotes)
So many whores out right now (3 upvotes)
My friend has consumed over 25,000 calories in drinks and snacks over the last two days, he wonders why he doesnt lose weight... Dont drink and eat like an animal each weekend dude (8 upvotes)
I'm a skinny Asian and can confirm I have the loudest belly growls (1 upvotes)
TKE is weak!! (1 upvotes)
TKE is weak!!!! (-4 upvotes)
Where's it hype?  (1 upvotes)
Bout to go for a run... im kinda scared. (23 upvotes)
S/O to Temple for letting us bang their girls all weekend (52 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
"University of Florida"
Location(29.650278, -82.343889)
My hometown yak is a new level of dead (0 upvotes)
Peace is a lie. There is only passion. Through passion I gain strength. Through strength I gain power. Through power I gain victory. Through victory my chains are broken (2 upvotes)
Eat 66% of your Chipotle and then give the rest to someone on the street, poor or rich in appearance. Do this for the rest of your life and be ok with it. THEN you are allowed to vote Bernie.  (0 upvotes)
I like him so much it's incredible, I hope forever is in our destiny  (1 upvotes)
Amber..we went on one date.. Stop with the double texts (-1 upvotes)
Damn, Amber at it again with the alerts!  (8 upvotes)
Who else is now realizing they completely forgot how to drive? (2 upvotes)
Biggest lie ever (3 upvotes)
When a dude riding a canoe/tricycle mechanism cut you off in traffic....Oh Gainesville (0 upvotes)
I just wanna be an attractive guy (-2 upvotes)
Ate a bunch of cookies. Fuck. (-1 upvotes)
"Who's this Amber chick and why is she texting you all day" -Overbearing girlfriends today  (9 upvotes)
Visiting from Miami! What's up?! :) (-1 upvotes)
How does one snapchat? - an ugly guy (0 upvotes)
Where do cute boys look for girls? I need them to find me  (2 upvotes)
I'm going to need people to stop kidnapping children because these amber alerts are really annoying.  (10 upvotes)
Damn amber alert woke me up this morning AND woke me up from my nap  (16 upvotes)
2 in one day? Turning them off.  (5 upvotes)
You think a vagina is ugly? You merely adopted it. I was conceived in it, molded by it. I didn't see the light until I was already a fully developed fetus (5 upvotes)
Up vote if your in St. Augustine for spring break! (-3 upvotes)
Anyone need a ride to sofla? (1 upvotes)
I thought it said ASS (7 upvotes)
I am still in love with this boy, ugh (1 upvotes)
Anyone looking to by some shrooms? (5 upvotes)
Is Chem 1 easy over the summer or naw? (0 upvotes)
Bouta see if i'm still leaking (0 upvotes)
Goddamn this class.  (0 upvotes)
Wtf am I going to do if the gym is closed (9 upvotes)
has anyone taken STA4321? is it a bad idea if I would be taking calc 3 with it and not before it? (0 upvotes)
I miss Gainesville :( (10 upvotes)
He broke my heart and he didn't even say sorry (5 upvotes)
Loot! (5 upvotes)
Cabana beach? (-1 upvotes)
Cats >= Dogs (0 upvotes)
Had a bee stuck in my apartment for two hours but got it to safety outside.  (5 upvotes)
Where my gators at in the 561? (0 upvotes)
Tinder match said she could tell I had an 'amazing personality' and said yes to lunch date. Then, all of the sudden, she begins to ignore my texts and snaps for absolutely no apparent reason. Fuck it! (2 upvotes)
First night of spring break I slept for 11 hours and just woke up at 2pm. No regrets. (23 upvotes)
how do you go about getting instructor permission for a class? do you email them or actually go see them? (-1 upvotes)
I never understood the porn music videos. Like im trying to fap, not get hype. (11 upvotes)
I keep checking on my herd while I'm away for Spring Break. Miss you gators!  (11 upvotes)
Low key keeping my chipotle receipts in case I get E. coli so I can get free tuition (16 upvotes)
People who don't know how to accelerate or turn without blocking traffic for 10 seconds should be egged (4 upvotes)
Do you guys ever just sit down and deeply think about life? (3 upvotes)
I wish I could get drunk with a complete stranger and spill everything I have been feeling for the last 6 months.  (2 upvotes)
Pretty sure I'm the last one to leave from my floor, I could literally poop with the door open  (7 upvotes)
I go thru stretches of never using yak, to always scrolling thru it and responding to everyone. (2 upvotes)
Had such a wet dream last night. If only it was for real (1 upvotes)
Left or right? (1 upvotes)
Why are people still in Gainesville  (5 upvotes)
Looking for a latina still in town to cuddle with over break (-1 upvotes)
Anyone else still here!! (1 upvotes)
I'm a moderate conservative, but I hate the hardcore Christian conservatives  (13 upvotes)
Any gators in the 321 ? (1 upvotes)
How do I go about making out and cuddling with the guy I'm dating? He's very respectful and wants to get to know me so he's taking it slow but I want to kiss him for more than 10 seconds  (6 upvotes)
Make America Kanye again  (7 upvotes)
I wish I was drunk rn  (-1 upvotes)
Is it normal to get all tingly and excited just from holding hands?  (12 upvotes)
"Role one up and let's get highhhhhhh. I am trying to get frieddddddd." New chorus to the song Hello by Adele  (0 upvotes)
Ain't no such thing as 'I can't' (1 upvotes)
It's funny when trump makes fun of Rubio sweating  (5 upvotes)
Found this underground waterfall while exploring  (20 upvotes)
I didn't get kissed last night (5 upvotes)
I don't see how the GOP wins against either Democrat when they run Trump. (3 upvotes)
Now I'm irie (0 upvotes)
Do you forgive someone for cheating if you're only 5 months into a relationship?  (3 upvotes)
I should've realized my boyfriend was bi when he wouldn't stop staring at his dick when I gave him a hand job (-1 upvotes)
Go to Daytona Beach this week (1 upvotes)
Bernie got mad beef with Wall Street lmao (10 upvotes)
None of my gainesville coupons work at home :( (8 upvotes)
Dont go hard af on lat pulldowns, the injury will not heal (1 upvotes)
"I never had sex with that woman" -BillClinton. "I invented the Internet" -AlGore. "I killed BinLaden" -BarackObama "I have supported LGBT rights my entire life" -HillaryClinton  (3 upvotes)
Omg it is literally perfect outside  (19 upvotes)
Spring break 2016 (63 upvotes)
IF YEEN GOT HATERS YEEN POPPIN (5 upvotes)
I need a show to watch on Netflix! No fiction/action. Something alone the lines of Parks and Rec, Kimmy Schdmit, Love etc. I am literally watching people flip houses right now  (3 upvotes)
Wolfgang is such a savage first name. Don't know why there aren't more guys named that. For sure calling my kid Wolfgang.  (7 upvotes)
Ride the barrel and get pitted  (1 upvotes)
God gave me a penis and a brain, but only enough blood to run one at a time. (44 upvotes)
Is there a cheap place to rent a bike in Gainesville? And how much? (6 upvotes)
When my laptop moves but my legs didn't (13 upvotes)
Hey everyone  (0 upvotes)
How is it living in a 4br with stranger? (1 upvotes)
As a guy, is rubbing my nipples in public socially acceptable? (11 upvotes)
Can you leave Publix deli meat out overnight and still eat it or should I pass (0 upvotes)
 (-1 upvotes)
Thoughts on Mons Venus? (3 upvotes)
Anyone here take finasteride for hair loss? (3 upvotes)
The library is closed :( (0 upvotes)
Take a shot every time Rubio says con artist and "party of Lincoln and Reagan" at this press conference  (1 upvotes)
Is there anywhere on campus that is printing today?  (2 upvotes)
Who has battlefeild for for Xbox 1? (-3 upvotes)
Is it just me or do others get really teary eyed when something really emotional happens in movies? (10 upvotes)
Yak back home is live af (10 upvotes)
Being here over spring break sucks. At least I have alcohol and Netflix though (24 upvotes)
I don't wanna paaaaaaaack (2 upvotes)
I've heard Fuller House is absolutely awful. Can anyone confirm?  (2 upvotes)
First time using the bus!! Woo (-2 upvotes)
Everyone who is now done with Midterms and is currently on spring break, go watch this and smile a little! (1 upvotes)
Mmmmmmmm oh my god that free Chipotle burrito was heaven. Guac, double steak, and it was still free. I had tears in my eyes fam. (35 upvotes)
I'm home now, 80% of the yaks here are requesting weed  (10 upvotes)
Starting October 13 youll need to be on the latest version to post or reply to a Yak. Keep up with your Herd and update now! (10000 upvotes)
